Bloodlust made sense for some of the Horde races, but not for a shaman, imho.  Shaman didn't seem like the type to incite a bloodlustDerp lolWhat was it you said earlier?

&gt; You know you made someone mad when they say things like "kid" or "cute" to try and be condescending lol.Well, technically, Horde had Shaman since before Warcraft 1, since it was a shaman that started the process of bringing the orcs in league with the Legion... 

But you misunderstand me... Horde having shaman makes sense, shaman being the class with Bloodlust doesn't make sense to me.  Of all the classes, shaman lore always seems to be the most peaceful and calm. They attune to the elements, they commune with the spirits, and they.... incite bloodlust in their comrades?  Maybe if it had a different name, like something related to fire, but the actual aspect of a shaman inciting bloodlust just seems to go against the class itself.

I think it having an elemental name/feel would have fit better. They harness the chaotic powers of the elements, names like good ol' "Windflurry", which (now) does something similar to BL fit a shaman well... it's just the actual name/idea of "bloodlust" that doesn't seem to match up with how shamans act the rest of the time.Right, but the actual spell itself doesn't indicate anything to do with fire.  They could have easily given it a name like "Fiery Rage" or something like that and had it fit the shaman class more.  Bloodlust, to me at least, gives a feeling of "Desire to KILL," and whenever the idea of falling into bloodlust is brought up (outside of the shaman ability), it's an insatiable desire to basically murderlate (yes, that's a word now) everything.  That concept just doesn't seem to fit blood lust.

Things it could have been named to fit the Shaman motif better:

* Fiery Rage: Invoke the rage of the fire elementals to increase haste by 30% for you and your allies.  

* Boiling Blood: Boil the blood of you and your allies, increasing haste by 30%. 

* Inferno: Attune to the fire elements, invoking an inferno to increase the haste of your and your allies by 30%

* Might of the Firelands: Channel the might of the Firelands, increasing the haste of you and your allies by 30%.

The debuff, instead of "sated," could be "Overheated"I get that, but at least Devotion Aura fits a paladins motif.  I posted this on another response, but they could have easily named it things that would fit the shaman motif a lot better: 

&gt; Things it could have been named to fit the Shaman motif better:

&gt; Fiery Rage: Invoke the rage of the fire elementals to increase haste by 30% for you and your allies.

&gt; Boiling Blood: Boil the blood of you and your allies, increasing haste by 30%.

&gt; Inferno: Attune to the fire elements, invoking an inferno to increase the haste of your and your allies by 30%

&gt; Might of the Firelands: Channel the might of the Firelands, increasing the haste of you and your allies by 30%.

&gt; The debuff, instead of "sated," could be "Overheated"

All those would fit the idea of a shaman much closer, in my opinion.

&gt; Granted, this was after the whole "demon-blood" incident, but the fact is it is simply an ability port from one game to the next.

Which sort of makes sense for the Orcs, but Tauren and Trolls?I just typed it out in /say

\/s r g r y r&gt; didn't play any significant role in killing him

That part is really important.  Her entire existence as the Banshee Queen prior to the fall of Arthas was retribution for what he did to her (and her people, but really to her).  The one time she was able to take him on, when it was HER chance to fight him... she failed, and hard. She nearly dies, has to flee for her (un)life, and still would have been killed if not for the timely arrival of the airboat.  

She failed at her very purpose.  It basically broke her will. How can she even go on as the Queen of the Forsaken if she cannot do the one thing she's devoted her undead life to do?  And then it was taken from her by a group of "heroes" and a human paladin.It should be noted to anyone - if you're able to do all 5 timewalking for the event, you get a normal level HfC cache, and you have a chance of having the Timewalking gear upgrade to 675 when it drops in the dungeon. Before buying anything, make sure you complete all 5. Last WotLK TW weekend, I bought a piece, then got a drop in one of the dungeons that was better, and the piece from my cache was also better. If I had waited until I was done before going to buy anything, I would have saved a few tokens.It is and isn't.

Gems do not scale down, so if you have some epic gems, you can get older gear with sockets and put +10 of your primary stat, which is huge if you get enough of them.  The set bonuses are also still there, but you have to make sure they still apply. For example, the WotLK paladin tank set bonus from ICC gives a damage reduction while Divine Plea is active.. only there is no more Divine Plea, so it's worthless. You are a rogue, I'm assuming by your flair, and the 2 piece T6 increases the haste from SnD... except SnD no longer grants haste but attack speed, so the 2 piece has no affect anymore.Yeah, I'd forgotten about the trolls propensity for bloodlust... Tauren seem to usually be in control of their rage... it's more like "Channeled Fury" than a lust :)

&gt; I suppose I'm not trying to convince you why Horde Shaman have bloodlust because it fits the lore. As I said before, the name nods back to its older routes.

Yeah, I understand why they have it from a game perspective, I just don't understand why it was ever a shaman thing, or why it was named what it was named for a shaman thing. For how many shaman abilities have something to do with elements in some sense or another, it just seems thrown in.The question wasn't what is unique in and of itself, but a unique RPG element. 

Mages don't stealth, they go use arcane magics to render themselves invisible. (And from a game perspective, invisibility is completely different than stealth)

Hunters don't stealth, they use camouflage to blend into their surroundings. (And from a game perspective, it operates differently. They get no bonus or different abilities for being camo'd, and when they move they have a much bigger chance of being seen) 

Night Elves don't stealth, they meld into the shadows. From a gaming perspective, again, completely different. They move at all, and it breaks.

The end result is the same (kind of, all three of those act differently than stealth does), but from an RPG standpoint, they are entirely unique from each other.  So really, could say all of those are unique RPG elements to their class (and race in the case of the Night Elves)Totem twisting was what it was normally called.  There was an ICD on the windfury effect, and the buff would last for a bit.  So, a shaman would drop windfury, buff would appear, then would drop another air totem (usually Grace of Air for the agi boost).  A good enhancement shaman would twist between the two and would be placed in a group with all rogues and warriors for that.When Wrath came out, it was not liked. WoW saw the first ever loss in subs after the first month. Cries of "rehashed content" and "incomplete and insignificant raids" along with how "it's ridiculous that guilds are able to complete the first tier of raids in their T6 gear."  It sold more boxes than any other game until D3 finally broke the record, yet saw a loss in subs, then stagnated for a majority of the expansion.  People talked about how much they wished we had TBC back.  Touted as the "best" expansion in WoW.

When the Pre-Cataclysm patch hit, subs increased, causing WoW to hit it's high point of 12 million subs. Within months the subs plummeted with cries of "impossibly hard heroics" and "not enough content," even though it saw the addition of more content than any other expansion through the revamping of old Azeroth.  People talked about how great Wrath was.

When the pre-MoP patch hit, subs went up once again as people came back in droves.  Although people complained about "stupid kung fu pandas," the zones were praised for their artwork and the raids were well loved.  People then started leaving because "required dailies suck" and "heroics are way too easy."  People talked about how great Wrath was and how Cataclysm was pretty awesome if you ignored the stagnation of DS.  Now it's praised for how well it did patches, the amount of content it added, and the versatility of the raiding structure.  

WoD came and people came back in droves, after completing the leveling content, which was largely praised for being some of the best the game has had to offer, people started leaving in droves due to a lack of things to do outside of raiding.  People have praised the 5-mans as they were at launch, but hate that they served no purpose after the first couple of weeks.  People now talk about how awesome the content was in MoP and that the only problem with all the dailies is that so much was gated behind those reps.

Point of all this: Yes, it has happened every expansion since Wrath.  The last expansion we had that did not see a drop in subs after the first couple of months was TBC.  Wrath comes in a close second, but like I said above - it sold more boxes than any other PC game to that date, selling 2.8 million copies in the first 24 hours, yet with those sales, it only saw an increase in half a million subs after the first quarter and then dropped in the second quarter by a quarter million, not rising again until the pre-Cata patch.  Every single expansion, starting in Wrath, has seen people coming to the game in droves and then leaving. While the numbers of each one have changed, the trend has remained the same.  It's not to say that WoD, MoP, and Cata didn't all have problems, but to say that it's WoD or MoP that caused the exodus from the game is naive.I find the simple "How do you leave a guild?" question works quite well tooMe up all night honking me horn to porn, porn, porn!That would not likely go over well with non-raiding altoholics.  Even at the game's prime in terms of outdoor world content (and just talking amount, not talking quality), doing every daily out there did not take a significant amount of time.  A lot of people that have a lot of alts like to go out and do those things on multiple people.  Making them account-wide would significantly decrease the amount of things we would have to do in the game.That would not likely go over well with non-raiding altoholics. Even at the game's prime in terms of outdoor world content (and just talking amount, not talking quality), doing every daily out there did not take a significant amount of time. A lot of people that have a lot of alts like to go out and do those things on multiple people. Making them account-wide would significantly decrease the amount of things we would have to do in the game.

The thing is, dailies are an activity to do. Other than the debacle that was gating VP gear and high end profession items behind rep in MoP or the shoulder/head enchants prior to that (which later became account wide anyway), dailies aren't a required activity to do on each character.  I mention those in particular because that was the only thing that ever had a "you have to do it" aspect of dailies.  Past there, dailies have been, in past expansions at least, the prime non-raiding thing to do at level cap (outside of PvP and farming badges/points in heroics).  

Take WoD for example - if you did Tanaan, which takes an hour or less depending on your gear and which areas you do, then what would you do for the rest of your play time as a non-raider (or even as a raider, if you've already raided that week)?  The problem can also be expounded when you look at what dailies are usually for: reputation.  You can have a thousand dailies available every day, but if they are account wide, then you'd also have to make rep account wide, (or make rep rewards account wide). If that was done, you can bet there would be even more complaints. Did a faction's dailies on the wrong character? Now the character you want it on is behind a day on reputation.

But if you make rep or rep rewards account wide, currency account wide, dailies account wide, we rapidly approach the point where "characters" don't matter (we're already partially there, with things like titles account wide).

Really, I think the best bet is a three tier system:

Tier 1: Account wide. Cosmetic items only.  

- This would be for things like mounts, pets (which would be not trade-able once purchased), tabards (cosmetic only, none of the tabards with effects).  These are all things that do not impact the power of your character.  

Tier 2: Character Specific - Current Tier gear/crafting/power items

- This would be basically like was Valor Points and Conquest points are. They purchase items that directly increase your characters power. Gear, consumables, buff items, etc, for the current content/tier.

Tier 3: Account Wide - Lower level power items.

- This would be like JP and honor. It purchases power items, but lower tier. Could be the same "currency" as tier 1, but the idea is that when you have a new tier with new items for purchase, the old items downgrade to this and the points become account wide. It helps people gear alts, but since it's a tier behind, you don't have to worry about it being too much of a benefit.&gt; Those things all get really boring after a VERY short time.

And there is the problem.  When you make things only doable once per account, then you are effectively limiting a player in what they can do each day... which has already been a massive problem in WoD.  Even what you mention:

Pet battles - Trainers are all account wide, Celestial Tournament is account wide. iirc, the only "daily" thing involving pets that isn't account wide are the Tanaan legendaries, but if you have the two "failsafe" teams for them, that takes about 15 minutes to do.  Also, a problem for those of us that are "out" of pets to level.  I have over 100 level 25 pets of all breeds and varieties. I have maybe 4 semi-rare pets left to get (and at least one of those isn't rare as much as I'm lazy). With the menagerie, you don't even have to level it, you likely have so many pet tokens built up that you can just buy their way to 25... or it's pet battle weekend in which case you can level from 1-19 in a single Draenor master battle.

Dungeons - They provide almost no benefit to anyone over ilvl 630, which you can get in 10 minutes in Tanaan. But even if they revamp them in Legion and make them relevant again, you have the very real problem of queues if you're DPS.  What will you do while you wait? Not dailies, if you've done them on a character already that day.

Professions - Not really an activity that takes a lot of time. Especially in WoD, where you don't need to farm, but even before that, professions usually consisted of "log in, do your daily CD for materials."  Even when there were more things to craft that didn't use the daily CD, it wasn't really a lot of "gameplay" as much as "hit crafting button and wait for things to finish crafting."

AH gold farming - Not something everyone enjoys or can do. Also, I wouldn't consider that "content" as much as "the result of content."  

Grinding for mounts/transmog - Totally fun, I agree.  Problem is that most of them are found in raids, which is a week long lockout.  Other problem with that is the very basic issue that people have been saying about WoD: the recommendation of things to do in a new expansion should not be to go back and play the old expansions' content.  It's fun stuff, most of the time (really, screw the final boss in MsV if you're not a pet class), but it's still old stuff.

&gt; Usually, that goal is "I wanna get 700 ilvl", and that's extremely time consuming.

If you are the type to focus on one toon until you get your ilvl up to a certain point, then the issue I brought up isn't one for you.  Many altoholics are like me - they don't focus on one at a time.  I had decided at the start of this expansion that I wasn't going to be raiding, so my ilvl goal is typically "as high as it can get in LFR for that tier."  That doesn't take a lot to get.  My normal routine involves playing 2 or 3 alts a day, going out and doing stuff in Tanaan, though I'll admit Tanaan isn't as fun of a draw (not an alt problem, that's a WoD problem).  Prior to WoD, I would go out and do dailies on 2 or 3 alts every day, it was what I usually spent my play time doing.  Account wide dailies would limit that, and I'd hit the point of "I don't have anything real to do" very fast every day.&gt; Exactly, I have like 9 toons, all level 60+. My top 5 are 100, but I focus on one character at a time when I'm gearing because otherwise it's too time consuming. I feel no real progress if I try to gear all 5 consistently.

I have 11 toons at level 100 (one for every class), and while I don't gear them all at the same time, I'm usually gearing 3 at a time: One is my "primary main," the one that I start the expansion with; one is my "secondary main," the one that I play when my primary main has done what it can do for the day; one is my "Wife Main," the one that I play with my wife and gear up with my wife (usually a tank so we can do anything we want).  But I don't like any of my toons to get too far apart from each other gear wise because I hate that feeling when I do something on a geared toon, then try to do it on an undergeared toon and it's harder enough to be frustrating.  So, it's usually steps. Like in WoD, it's been gauged by their progress on the Legenday. When my first three got their rings, the second three were starting the final stage, the three after that were starting the second phase.  The final two were just starting the first stage.  By the time 3-6 are done with their rings, 7-9 will be starting the last stage and 10 &amp; 11 will be starting phase 2. That way, everyone is close to each other.*Soft little fleshy-things? Here? Nuisances, nuisances!*&gt; It took them some time, and we have no idea if they would've been able to control any of the other Aspects. Deathwing was very deeply connected to the Old Gods, through his place as the Earth Warden.

I'd even go further and say that they never really *controlled* Deathwing.  Control isn't really what they do as much as corrupt.  They drove Deathwing mad, but he was in control of his own actions.  They do the same thing to Nozdormu - they drive him mad in the future, getting him to think he can subvert his own death, which causes him to  eventually transform into Murazond and to form the Infinite dragonflight.Yeah, it's actually confirmed in the game itself in the dungeon journal for Murozond:

*Now living outside of time, Murozond was once the great Dragon Aspect Nozdormu the Timeless One. After the titans showed him his own death, the tormented Nozdormu was tricked by the Old Gods into trying to subvert his mortality. As a result, Nozdormu shattered the timeways and created the infinite dragonflight... jeopardizing the very future of Azeroth.*[Mount Planner by Telsa](http://telsa-productions.co.uk/telsa-wow/web/mount/home)

This is what I use. You can look up your character and it'll give you a bunch of "routes" for mount farming. You can skip the ones that you can't do yet, or if you don't want raids.

Also, depending on your profession and amount of gold:

Engineers have two copters they can make

Tailors have multiple carpets

Engineers can make (and anyone can use) the motorcycle (ground only) and the Sky Golem (flying, and also lets you herb without dismounting)The first time I killed an obvious bot, back in TBC, I was working on a warlock quest killing yetis in Winterspring and he was farming the mobs, which was making my quest take longer. After I killed him 3 or 4 times, an alarm must have gone off at wherever he was housed out of, because he suddenly became very real and very good at killing me back.  I think they had someone coming in and taking control after so many deaths in a certain period of time.&gt; It seems we get fewer instances with each expansion. In WoD we got 8, MoP had 9 (but also scenarios), Cata we got 14, Wrath had 16, BC had 16. Vanilla had 20.

It's interesting when you actually break down the numbers.  Vanilla had 20 instances, but those were spread out over 60 levels, so it's not really a fair comparison.  TBC saw 16 (15 at launch, 1 added, all new)), Wrath saw 16 (12 at launch, 4 added, all new), Cata saw 14 (8 at launch, 5 added, 4 reskins), MoP saw 9 (all at launch, 3 reskins), WoD has 8 (all at launch, 1 reskin). It shows that every expansion has had fewer at launch, and the total number has gone down each expansion (especially if you consider the reskins of Cata and MoP).  However, it could also be argued that MoP actually saw more than the two prior expansion, since it has 13 scenarios that were added during the expansion (11 if you count the alliance/horde counterparts as single scenarios and not two separate).  

They said that they "made a mistake" not making 5-mans matter in WoD, I'm hoping in Legion they truly correct that.From what I've found on my own warrior, it seems like Glad does more DPS at lower gear levels, but as your gear improves, it doesn't scale as much.  I've personally gone Fury, but it took quite a bit before I was comfortable with the rotation to where I felt like I was doing competitive DPS.  You do need a decent amount of crit, it seems, since the spec is so dependent on enrage from bloodthirst crits.I partially disagree.  Yes, it is True that mechanics have changed a lot and gotten more complex (in most cases). However, given the game at the time, they were not simple.  Classes did not have as many ways to deal with the mechanics that existed then, and MMOs as a general rule were not as complex then.  Not to mention, a lot of the mechanics that existed in those older areas really mattered back then. 

I wouldn't say that mechanics in 5-mans have gotten that much more "complex" for the most part.  And whether they were interesting is completely subjective. Sure, we have some interesting "complex" type fights like the second boss in Grimrail, but is a council style fight like the second boss in Everbloom that much different from the council fight in Magister's terrace?  What mechanics do we have now in 5-mans that are so much more complex?  I'd say a fight like Murmur and his bomb, or Vorpil and the add kiting teleporting fun, the MCing of Blackheart... I could keep going, but there were plenty of fights that had a lot to pay attention to back then... and that's one expansion.What makes the current fights more interesting of mechanics to you? I would argue that there were plenty of fights in TBC and beyond that had interesting mechanics, or at least as interesting of mechanics as we see today.Tank pulls entire room... tank dies... tank blames healer... Have to explain to tank that mobs put debuffs up that you can't heal through.&gt; Or your players could know "My 4pc is meh, I'm not going to bother using it, and pass all of the pieces along so people who do care can roll their WF/Socket stuff."

But that's still a different scenario.  If little Jimmy doesn't want/need his 4-piece, then there's no issue with the system as it is.  The issue is when Jimmy *does* need his 4-piece, it *is* an upgrade, but Raider Ron with his 4-piece completed gets it over Jimmy because it's warforged or has a socket.  

Granted, I don't know a guild that would honestly give it to Ron over Jimmy in that circumstance, but apparently it does happen given the responses in this thread.That entire situation, though, is an issue that has existed in the game since the beginning and has nothing to do with issues like Warforged/Sockets being random.  If a raider is flaky, most guilds are going to drop that person to the bottom no matter what the loot is because why would they give Flaky Frank a piece of gear when he won't be around the following two weeks most likely.  And if Frank is mad at this, he can go join a social guild that has more lax rules.I hated reforging... but that was when we had things like hit and expertise. It was frustrating as hell to get a new piece of gear and need to reforge so I wouldn't miss anymore.  With that gone, I wouldn't feel as compelled to go reforge every piece of gear every time I get a drop so I'm not under hit/expertise.&gt; Problem was, they really didn't give a ton of incentive past a certain point, either, though it could be argued that point was very late into the expansion for non-raiders and casual raiders.

I would argue that early on, they had no incentive. The problem at the start of MoP was that scenarios did not guarantee anything dropping, and what dropped was lower than heroic ilvl, which made it terrible.  They later upped the ilvl to match heroics and you could get JP/VP, so they had more point, but up front it was terrible...

&gt; I'd like to see them make 5-mans more relevant. We know they can design magnificent dungeons, and there is plenty of story to be told. 

I think the badge/JP/VP incentive was always good.  I still don't follow the logic of getting rid of those... But, past there the issue will always be "how do you keep them relevant."  There's always going to be the problem of "once you've outgeared them, there's not much point in going there."    The problem in WoD was that you could outgear them without even doing them - LFR was easier to get into, dropped better gear even in the first tier, and you didn't need the heroic gear to get into LFR.  MoP at least you needed heroic 5-man gear at the start of the expansion to hit the ilvl to get into LFR.Gotcha. 

I think 5-mans have never been the place to finder interesting mechanics, personally. However, some things that happened in older dungeons were indicative of the way the game worked at that point.  For example, a fight like Kargath at the end of Shattered Halls or the final boss on Mana Tombs (I choose those because you can do them in Timewalking now) - when we see it now, it seems silly. But when you realize that tanks (other than paladins) could not hold threat on more than 3 mobs at a time, and threat was a much harder thing to deal with then, you realize that having periodic adds come in during the fight was actually a big deal. Tanks had more trouble picking up adds and holding them back then, and you couldn't let the adds overwhelm the group because once there were three adds plus the boss, the tank would have trouble holding threat.  It's a "derp" mechanic now, but back then only the really skilled warriors and druids were able to tank more than 3 at a time effectively.&gt; Basic scenarios were mostly just for the experience of completing, or just for fun. The heroic scenarios were worth doing, which are what I really meant. Still, they were enjoyable, and I thought they had a lot of appeal. Apparently not many others did, else we'd still have them.

Yeah, but didn't they not even put heroic scenarios in until the pre-SoO patch?  I was gone from the middle of Landfall until SoO released, but I thought that heroic scenarios weren't added until much later?  Maybe I'm wrong.

&gt; I do think the introduction of mythic dungeons is a good step, and the gear definitely needs to be below raid level, but they should also be a viable placeholder.

I agree and disagree.  I think that the "way too easy" catch up mechanics of places like Timeless Isle and Tanaan are a mistake for the game.  They clearly have the ability to scale dungeons, as we've seen with Timewalkers and Challenge modes.  Make 5-mans scale you to the "appropriate" gear level, so they're always slightly challenging.  Put the 5-man gear and LFR gear equal ilvl (so it's not "LFR bypasses 5-mans," and have the gear that drops in 5-mans scale with the expansion to keep you geared a tier behind.  

If that's too much, replace the idea of Baleful gear in Tanaan with "final boss drops" in the 5-mans. Using WoD as the example, it would go like this:

Level 100 - quests drop ilvl 600-605 gear.

Level 100 Normal 5-mans - ilvl 615 (required 600 to enter)

Level 100 Heroic 5-mans/LFR - ilvl 630 (requires 610 to enter)

BrF releases - Heroic 5-mans still drop ilvl 630 gear, but the final boss now drops a "Foundry Chest," which drops LFR 655 gear, or the gear in 5-mans scales to 655 (the same as LFR, but under BrF normal)

HfC releases - 5-man final bosses now drop "Hellfire Cache," which drops a 675 ilvl piece matching LFR.

Get rid of Baleful gear from Tanaan... or make Baleful gear, instead, be Baleful Upgrades.  It can be used on existing gear to increase the ilvl of the gear, similar to how you could use coins in MoP.  Have restrictions (can't upgrade raid gear, for example, so raiders won't just increase their previous tier). The key would be incentivizing people to still go into the 5-mans.&gt; I have to manually form mythic dungeon groups but nobody talks in them unless we wipe.

See, I've had the opposite experience. Maybe it's because I was doing mythics in the "appropriate" gear (i.e. 660, which they said it was designed for), but we were talking, planning things out for the pulls, because we needed to. I'd probably experience the same thing you have if I went back in now with a 30 ilvl increase.&gt; Regardless, I remember not having catch up gear options, and I liked working for what I got.

Thing is: we've had catch up mechanics since TBC.  When you hit level 70 in TBC at the start of the expansion, gearing took forever (along with heroic and raid attunements).  However, as the expansion continued, they removed or reduced attunements and added more and more badge gear. The first badge gear wasn't all that great, but then they added the "troll theme" badge gear, which was upper T4 equivalent, letting you go right into T5, then they added the T5 equivalent badge gear with Sunwell, allowing you to skip straight to T6. (Along with MgT's gear being better than many things out of T4 raids)

Granted, badges were harder to get back then since heroics were so much harder, but it was still there and still easy to play catch up as the expansion continued.

&gt; I'd rather see them float somewhere between LFR gear and normal raids, but that would require reworking the gear gap.

The problem is the tier system we have going on.  Mythic dungeons falling between LFR and normal raids works fine when you have one tier of raids, but then what do you do when the next tier comes out?  The whole reason they added all the catch up mechanics is players tended to not like coming in later in the expansion and having to go back and run all these old raids, often times without being able to do it with a guild since their guild was working on progression, to gear up for progression.  If dungeons can't fill the role of catch up, then something will - in WoD that has been Tanaan and LFR. But if something else fills in the catch up role, then it's at a loss of the 5-man.

But, I was also talking about *heroic*, not *mythic*.  I think they can have heroic dungeons matter if they scale not just the gear you get, but also the toon - a la Timewalking.  Scale me down to 615 ilvl when I do a heroic. I'll still be stronger since I'll have better itemization and sets bonuses and trinkets, but it'll be fun and challenging still.&gt; The blatant gear grab like Timeless Isle is here to stay, though. The system won't take a step back, which is a good thing in it's own way, and the game has gotten so big they almost have to have a way for alts and new players to get up to whatever gear level is current.

See, I think it can go back, it just can't go as far back.  In all honesty, I think that the system they started in Wrath and continued through MoP was great and with a little tweaking could keep their idea of not progressing too fast outside raiding:

You have two types of "points" you acquire from dungeons - valor/justice (or whatever they want to name them if they want to make it different sounding).

Top points buy gear that matches the current raid tier. I'd even be fine with those only being obtainable through raids (and not LFR, because if reddit has taught me anything, it's that they can't make raiders feel forced to do LFR). 

The "lesser" points buy gear for the previous raid tier. They drop from 5-mans and "lower" tier raids.  There has to be something for purchase for *every* item slot (that's one of the problems with the old system - you'd have people with heroic 5-man helmet because they couldn't get a helm for that slot using points).

You can then run heroics and lower raids and purchase gear for catch up, it's not as fast as TI/Tanaan, but it's less "go out and kill random mobs."

And if they do want to have zones like TI/Tanaan, have those drop upgrade tokens like the Empowered Apexis fragment that will raise the item level of the gear you buy using points. Gives people reasons to do both.

As for TBC: I was never a fan of the PvP gear. We actually had a strict rule against it except in certain slots (like prot paladin weapon, for example).  We'd get warlocks coming in with the "appropriate" spellpower but they'd be at 11% hit and not enough crit to go destro, but they were too bad at affliction to manage it (just one class example, I was the warlock officer for my guild, so I experienced that first hand way too often).  But, TBC's entire setup was also different - it wasn't "expected" for a person to be able to run BT by the end, the game still had the attitude of "raiding is for the elite, not everyone will do it."Exactly. And especially with ^most classes no longer needing to worry about things like haste breakpoints (I know it still makes a difference in some, but it's not like it was pre-WoD with haste breakpoints for an extra tick on your DoTs), it wouldn't be as necessary to reforge if you got that one piece with a lot of haste on it.

I hated reforging, and thought it was a terrible addition to the game... at the time. With it gone, but with the primary reason for it existing also gone (hit/expertise caps), I see no reason why to not bring it back.Yeah, I haven't tried them since I've gotten more geared, but doing it at 660 required CC and paying close attention to the mechanics. My first one was Auch, and that third boss that summons all the imps was awful because the imps kept one shotting the healer if we couldn't interrupt him fast enough.  But, like I said, with higher gear levels, it's likely much easier.It's not disingenuous, it's truth. Weapons won't drop, the artifact weapon is the only weapon we get in Legion. Augments for the artifact doesn't change the fact that the artifact is still the only weapon. There's been a lot of recommendations to start with War of the Ancients. I disagree, but only because you really need to read Day of the Dragon first - it introduces two of the main characters from War of the Ancients (Krasus and Rhonin). It's a real fast read.

I posted this in a thread awhile back, but it might be beneficial:

This post has the order of the stories:

https://www.reddit.com/r/wow/comments/3h4lgb/the_complete_wow_book_reading_order_lore_timeline/

It's long, as it includes comics, short stories, etc.  

Book wise, if you're looking at WoW specific lore, there's a few that are what I consider the essentials.  I recommend you start with picking up [Rise of the Horde](http://www.amazon.com/World-Warcraft-Rise-Horde-No/dp/0743471385), it gives a great background on how the Original Horde came to be.  Then get the [Warcraft Archive](http://www.amazon.com/WarCraft-Archive-WORLD-OF-WARCRAFT/dp/1416525823) it has four books that all relate events to after WC3/before WoW. After that, get [The War of the Ancient](http://www.amazon.com/WarCraft-War-Ancients-Archive-Warcraft/dp/1416552030/ref=sr_1_1?s=books&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1442601028&amp;sr=1-1&amp;keywords=war+of+the+ancients+trilogy). At that point, you've read all the essentials of the pre-WoW/current WoW material.  All the books past there can really be connected to specific events in the game (in which case, see the list on the thread I linked earlier.Mainly because of how neutered the spec was if diseases weren't on a target (either due to not spreading there yet or due to being dispelled).  There was a lot of complaints back then about lack of burst... You had to spend two runes to get your diseases up before any of your actual hits did anything.

However, I think a lot of that would be fixed now with all the ways of instantly applying your diseases and how diseases spread easier now (especially if using NP).Depends on if you need the healing/shield or not. Typically, you want one blood rune on CD and two death runes on CD.  But if you aren't taking hits (either because it's a low damage fight, or you're the off-tank for that moment), it's better to spend the death runes on blood boil to get the stacking buff that makes your next DS stronger.    Granted, that won't happen on any fight where you are being attacked (as the DS is the better choice there), but some fights it will if you aren't the primary target (say pending a tank swap).  That's when it feels weird.  

Just as an example, looking at a fight like Zakuun. If you are the first to tank him, you'll be using DS... but if you are the second tank, your DS is largely wasted since you aren't taking hits. Blood Boil is your best option then, since it will build up your DS buff. Then, when you taunt him after Soul Cleave, your first DS is going to be buffed quite a bit (which will be good since you likely have really low resolve at that point since you weren't taking nearly as much damage), giving you a stronger shield.  It feels weird to be blood boiling on a single mob.&gt; Instead of summoning a single ghoul, it would be awesome if they procced weak disposable pets you didn't have to control. I don't want a pet class, but it could be cool to have a mini-swarm spawning and dying around me constantly.

I've thought it would be cool in Unholy worked similar to Demo Locks. Demo locks have their main demon, but they also periodically spawn imps that attack.  Unholy could have a chance of summoning a ghoul every time they use a certain ability, or every time a disease ticks, etc.  They could even have a similar glyph where they can summon a bunch at once (not as strong as Army, but still fun), but while that is on CD, they cannot summon more (giving more burst but less DPS in the long run).&gt; BRING BACK BLOOD/HEART STRIKE!

Totally agree.  It could even *functionally* be the same spell, just have a different name/animation.  I think the problem was that they were going the ability prune and knocked it out without realizing how bad it would feel to be "thwumping" your target over and over again.  

If Blood Boil was replaced with Heart Strike and it had a fighting animation and still spread diseases/refreshed diseases, it would be fine IMHO, if only because it would *feel* like I was doing something more than just shouting down my target.Good to know. My post was just made with what I have seen other DKs do in those situations, not from experience. It's also only been on LFR and normal mode fights where there's not need for DPS.  What I have seen while healing those situations is DKs stacking their SoB while not the active tank, then when they taunt and get that first hit on them then DS for a massive increase.  But, like I said, not personal experience using it in those situations, just observations from watching other DKs.Banshees might get weird with shadow priest's apparitions flying around too... and the banshee doesn't really seem to fit the unholy DK motif since it's a "spirit" rather than a "raised body."  

I think if the main minion was defaulted to the jumping ghoul thing (cannot remember what it's called) rather than the current default ghoul, then the "imp swarm" for unholy DKs could be the current default ghoul (since they are smaller and are the fodder of the Scourge anyway).

I also wish DKs had talents that buffed pets more. Look at warlocks - they get a talent to make their demons stronger version and they get a talent to summon greater demons permanently. Why not something similar for DKs?  Be able to summon an abomination to "tank," a nerubian for DPS/utility, etc?Forsaken males and Tauren males. For no other reason than the fighting animation. Forsaken males look like they are the nerd from high school trying to play baseball but cannot figure out how to swing a bat. Tauren males just *seem* so damned slow when they fight.I hate how goblin armor looks. At least on my male rogue, none of the armor sets look good to me! As a transmog whore, it bothers me that the only thing I've found that looks good is that cowl that turns your eyes red and blanks out most of your face.But if you play a male troll spell caster, you look like you're casting a DBZ kamehameha every time you cast a spell :DCollectMe

It's a mount/pet collector addon. You can search for pets you don't own, but the real glory of it is that it creates a "random mount" and "random pet" macro, which you can set up per character (you can also make profiles), so you can have specific mounts it will pick based on your character (much better than the default "favorite" which is account wide.  It will default to flying mounts if you can fly, ground mounts if you can't, but you can set it to use flying mounts on the ground too.&gt; As a rogue I get that combat and sub are viable on some HFC fights but not others so how do you manage this in terms of equipment / enchants? Obviously you have 2 sets of weapons but do you have 2 sets of Armor with 2 sets of enchants?

Ideally, yes. However, it really depends on the level of content you are running.  Min-maxing to the point of two sets of gear won't make that much of a difference in LFR/Normal, it will start to make a difference in heroic, and really matter in Mythic.  Personally, what I've done is keep two sets of weapons with appropriate enchants for the two specs, then I enchant my other pieces with whatever is going to be the best spec for a majority of bosses, since that matters more than anything else.... or I'll enchant based on the "best middle ground."  Eventually, you can have two full sets of gear, but that's not going to be up front. (I do purchase an extra ring from the legendary so I have one enchanted for each spec).

&gt; My rogue is only 686 at the moment would it be better to just stick with the one spec rather than switching depending on the fight?

Again, partially depends on the content.  Something easy like LFR, I don't even bother switching, I play combat the entire time regardless of whether it's the best spec. But, I recommend having the multiple specs if you're planning to progress (which I'm assuming you are given your hunter's progress) if not for any other reason but to get used to the strengths, rotations, and proper CD usage for each spec.  Especially with sub, since it's not as intuitive.


I can't answer the last question, since I don't have mine, but if you're seeing that on a majority of logs, it probably really just is that powerful.

Edit: The thing you have to remember on the multiple sets is that one set with invariably fall behind. You likely aren't going to be given a copy of the same ring so you can enchant it for the other spec if someone else in the raid needs it, so to me it has always been best to try to gear for the middle ground until you have enough gear to do a True "multi-set."Best bet would be to run a simcraft in one spec with the best gear you have for that spec, then run it again in the other spec with the gear for the other spec, and see where your weights are.

However, going with the "basic," the stat priority is:

Sub: Agi&gt;Mutli&gt;Mastery&gt;Crit/Vers&gt;Haste

Combat: Agi&gt;Haste&gt;Multi&gt;Mastery&gt;Crit&gt;Vers

So with that in mind, I'd likely enchant for Multi, since it's #2 for combat and #1 for Sub.Kinda how I've always felt about taunt...

Boss: I'm going to go kill that healer now.

Tank: YOUR MOTHER WAS A HAMSTER AND YOUR FATHER SMELLED OF ELDERBERRIES!

Boss: Now wait, that's not nice, I'm going to get you.

Tank: YOU HAD BETTER, OR I SHALL HAVE TO TAUNT YOU A SECOND TIME!Well, they are no longer Aspects, but they still have powers, and very strong powers.  Before they became Aspects, they had strengths in their own accord (the five of them, including Neltharion, were able to defeat Galakrond when they were still proto-drakes).  

But the dragons haven't lost their powers 100%. Case in point: Kairoz and Chromie. While not as strong as they once were, these two were still able to weave the timelines enough that they could find moments in time for Garrosh's trial, Kairoz was able to create the Hourglass, Kairoz was able to find the timelines the bring all the counterparts into the trial, find the version of Draenor he wanted to bring Garrosh to, and open the portal to bring him there.  

All that from a dragon that was a "normal" dragon.

But if you really think about it, it makes a certain sense.  Nozdormu knew of his future death all along, so what would still drive him to insanity?  After the events of Cataclysm, he lost a majority of his power (we know the Bronze still can manipulate time, but not like they could, that's evident from the Timewalkers, Kairoz, and Chromie). They can still see through time

So, you have a former Aspect gone crazy with the idea that he can undo what he did. He can stop himself from binding the timeways to Deathwing's defeat, and therefore stop himself from losing his power, and therefore have full access to the timeways again to be able to subvert his own death. 

Only he can't, and it drives him mad. It doesn't stop him from trying, but his infinite failures (pun intended) just make him crazier. His last straw is essentially using the Hourglass to stop access to the past altogether, preventing us from ever obtaining the Dragon Soul. This action opens up Nozdormu's vision (pre-Deathwing) of the timeway Murazond is hiding, which this causes him to send us to the future to finally kill him. 
I love most of those, they're kinda awesome ideas.  The key to all of them is that they have to be purely cosmetic/fun. The second they provide any benefit (and none of your ideas do), they become "mandatory" and people get pissed if they can't get them.

I really wish they would not put things in with limited time, like the old brewfest mount. If they add it, it should be in for good. Especially if it's a random drop.Personally, I'd be happy if they updated the gear drops from those places to fit modern itemization. The brewfest trinkets this year were almost pointless unless you were a fresh 100 because they were itemized so poorly for how the game plays now.Well, we don't really know how much of their power is gone.  If you read *Dawn of the Aspects*, you get the story of how they got their powers, and it showed that they were quite powerful even as proto-drakes.  They didn't revert back to proto-drakes when they lost their "Aspect" nature, so it can be assumed that they are still more powerful than they were then.  We've also seen some (not a lot) of them showing themselves as still very powerful even post-DS -&gt; Kalec and his dealings with Jaina, the Kirin Tor, all the stuff related to the theft of the Focusing Iris, and what he went through during *Dawn*. Alex during Garrosh's trial. The Bronze and Infinite Dragons and everything related to Kairoz freeing Garrosh. 

&gt; If we assume this is the state he is back at, I don't see how he could do all th things necessary to create the twilight dragons and send his hordes back the various times that we encounte rthem.

I don't think we can assume that. Nozdormu was able to see the timelines just fine even when the DS had a large portion of his power, he just wasn't able to manipulate it.  But it would make more sense to assume that - Nozdormu as an Aspect was able to manipulate the timelines quite well, even to the point that he was able to hold the timelines together against an Old God long enough to send Rhonin, Krasus, and Brox back to the War of the Ancients.  Nozdormu/Murazond having lost his powers is able to see major events and send his Infinite dragons there, but they aren't able to manipulate it quite as effectively as Nozdormu the Aspect could, hence why they were stopped over and over again.  If he had his full power as Murazond, he'd be able to find the tiniest little moment that would alter history, like going and killing that level 1 Dwarf who would later participate in the fight against Deathwing (I know, levels don't exist in the lore, but you get my point).  But Murazond (sans the power of an Aspect) cannot see those tiny intricacies of the timeline, only the major moments in history.Start encounter, exit boss, move to peon in front of boss and move up one square, exit, return and go into warlock. Warlock has strong attacks that hit at range. Spam on the other boss, if you can't reach, spam on the peon in front of the boss.  

When medivh cheats, switch back to your boss to move out of the fire, move right back to the warlock, keep spamming.

Usually, by the time the other boss gets to yours, he will be mostly dead. If the warlock dies, switch to a healer and move to where you can hit the boss, move back and forth between healing and attacking the other boss.  I've rarely failed with this strat.Another 2-pet strat depending on your pets:

Jeremy:  Mechanical Dragonling (1,2,2), Darkmoon Tonk (1,2,2), Leveling pet (or Plushie if you need A Really Big Adventure:

Judgement: Dragonling: Thunderbolt on CD, breath until dead.

Honky: Decoy round 1, thunderbolt on CD, breath until dead.

Fezwick: Bring out your Tonk, Shock and Awe, Ion Cannon.  If, by chance, your dragon dies before Honky is dead, then simply hit it with a missile and it should die.  I usually switch in my leveling pet/plushie when the dragonling dies.

For Christoph: A fox (2,2,2), Iron Startlette(1,1,1), and level pet/plushie at level 5+.

Start with fox, dazzling dance, howl, Flurry until Syd dies (shouldn't be much).
Mr. pointy comes in, Howl. Your fox will likely die here, but switch to your Iron Startlette.  Wind up, Wind up (attack). Mr pointy has the debuff from howl and should die instantly. 

Otto comes in, bring in your level pet (or plushie, if it needs levels), switch back to starlette, wind up, supercharge, windup (attack). Should one shot Otto.
I think i used your strat until I got my Starlette leveled up, it worked well, just took awhile and a bad crit would sometimes kill me off.You're still talking three expansions ago, so even if it was at the end of that expansion, there have been three in between that and WoD. Not exactly a strong argument that things have gotten much more complex.

And you're talking about one of the more complicated fights in WoD 5-mans. Most of the 5-man fights in WoD can be boiled down to "tank and spank with one or two extra things:

* Skyreach: 1st boss - tank and spank with avoiding wind on the ground. 2nd boss - tank and spank with standing in beams to reduce big damage. Last boss - Tank and spank with adds and getting out of bad on the ground. (3rd boss has more mechanics, with quills, screech, the armor debuff on the tank if he doesn't use active mitigation, and the adds).

* Everbloom: 1st boss - tank and spank with adds and getting out of the bad. 2nd boss - council fight tank and spank with interrupt needs. 3rd boss - tank and spank with avoid bad on the ground. Optional and final boss have more mechanics to worry about.

* Auch: First boss - tank and spank with stay out of the bad and LoS big attack. 2nd boss - Tank and spank with get out of the bad and adds. 3rd boss - tank and spank with adds and AoE debuff. Final boss - depending on which form he goes, usually tank and spank with add kiting and stay out of/avoid the bad.

* SMBG: 1st boss - tank and spank with add and get in the safe zone. 2nd boss - tank and spank with get out of the bad and kill soul/get back to body. 3rd boss - tank and spank with stay out of the bad and get in the bad. Final boss - tank and spank with adds/avoid the bad.

* Slag Mines: 1st boss - Tank and spank with avoid the hit and interrupt. 2nd boss - tank and spank with adds. Final two are more complicated (especially on heroic).

* Iron Docks: 1st boss - tank and spank with stay out of the bad/stop attacking when debuff is up. 2nd boss - triple tank and spank with avoid the bad and don't attack when debuff is up. 3rd boss - tank and spank with adds and avoid the big attack.  Final boss - slightly more complicated, but is really tank and spank with the run back/LoS bombs.

* Grimrail: First boss - tank and spank with "make guy ram wall" and avoid the bad. Final boss - tank and spank with get outta the bad. 2nd boss is complicated obviously.

None of those fights have particularly complex mechanics.  There are maybe 1/2 dozen bosses in heroics that have mechanics that could be considered semi-complicated.


Now, if you want to look at TBC again, I pointed out the one, but there are plenty of fights with more complex mechanics than just tank and spanks:

* Broggok (BF): Started with four waves of adds with no resting in between. He put up poison debuff and dropped rings of poison on the ground to kite out of, which would consume the room if your DPS wasn't high enough to kill him in time.

* Keli'dan (BF): Large room of adds at the pull with no rest after. Had a flame nova that would one shot anyone in range if you didn't get out of it.

* Mennu (SP): Totems would drop throughout the fight that had to be killed quickly, except for the nova totem which had to be avoided or it would explode and likely kill anyone in melee range.

* Hungarfen (Underbog): Constantly spawned mushrooms that required constant movement from DPS and the tank. Would envelop in a mushroom that would heal if you continued attacking.

* Black Stalker (Underbog): requires spreading out due to chain lighting, summons adds, levitates people pulling them out of range, puts AoE DoTs on targets. 

* Pandemonius (MT): AoE knockback periodically, spell AND melee reflect during the fight. 

* Shaffar (MT): Constant add summoning, which will overwhelm a group. Freezes everyone in place, making threat generation hard for a tank. 

* Shirrak (Crypts): AoE bombardment that has to be constantly kited from. Pulls ranged to him if you try to run too much (and has an AoE melee to boot).  AoE slow casting effect that is stronger the closer you are to him.

* Maladaar (Crypts): Disorient, steals souls, which reduce your damage and have to be killed, summons his avatar which mortal strikes and armor debuffs the tank. 

* Ikiss (Setthek): Arcane explosion that has to be LoS'd around the pillars. Slow &amp; Polymorph (which makes the LoS very difficult)

* Steamrigger (SV): Constant add spawning that heal boss. 

* Kalithresh (SV): spell reflect, runs to the items that require them being killed before he absorbs it or he enrages and will likely one shot the tank.

* Kargath (SH): Required strict positioning due to the adds and his bladstorm, melee had to run in and out due to sweeping strikes

* Blackheart (Slabs): MC's the entire group, requiring everyone to use CDs up front or risk the group wiping due to killing each other.

* Vorpil (Slabs): Constant adds that required the tank to kite around constantly, banishes players, which could spell disaster if it was the healer.

* Murmur (Slabs): AoE bomb that will kill anyone near whoever has it, pulls players in to him then explodes if you stay too close, silences, strict range requirements for melee and ranged.

* Capacitus (Mech): Polarity effect on players, requiring players to position close to those with the same polarity to increase damage done and decrease damage taken, reflective shields, bombs on the ground.

* Sepethrea - disorients, flames that pursue people, reduces threat on her arcane target. 

* Freywinn (Botanica) - summons adds then goes immune and heals. (was problematic when threat was a bigger issue)


I know that was way more than you wanted to read, but the point of it is that they all had some interesting mechanics that, at the time, were not easy to deal with.  Any fight with adds was more problematic due to how threat worked then (unless you had a paladin tank), you didn't have these awesome short term damage reduction CDs like we have now (remember, things like Shield Wall were on a 30 minute CD rather than 3), and the fights were just as involved as a majority of the fights today... and the mechanics mattered a lot more to boot. You couldn't ignore the mechanics in TBC heroics even if you were T5 geared (maybe you could T6), you especially couldn't ignore them if you were pre-raid or T4 geared.&gt; WoW has crafting and plenty of it.

The crafting this felt worse this expansion than past expansions because everything for skill ups from the 600-700 range (meaning everything for WoD itself) was purely based on the daily CDs. Alchemy was the only exception.  This meant that there was no "power leveling" of your profession as there was previously. You were tied to a daily CD.  While technically there were more choices in item slots, the 3 slot limit meant that characters could not, with the right profession options, have more crafted items equipped. For example, in MoP, my engineer/alchemist hunter had crafted goggles (Engineer), a cloak, chest, gloves, and a trinket. When 5.3 launched, I could get a weapon from a blacksmith.  They also removed any perks to professions (stronger shoulder enchants, sockets for BS, LW enchants, stronger flasks, engineering enchants, etc) making them feel very shallow.

&gt; Garrisons which didn't work because of the instanced nature of it but there are things you can collect to pimp your garrison.

What is there to pimp your garrison?  You have a few statues you can put up based on specific achievements (not many, either), and you have a small option for the number of buildings you can choose (some of which were so strong at launch that not having them was a detriment).  

I would also argue it wasn't instanced nature, but required nature of the garrison. You had no choice but to do your garrison.  Prior to 6.2, it could have been argued that you only had to do the couple of required garrison quests, but you could leave it at level 1 with no problem, but with 6.2, a level 3 garrison was mandatory to go to Tanaan (and hence progress your toon).  They also made it far too strong with how much gold you could make either directly or indirectly (gathering, profession items, gear drops), which made it more lucrative to cycle between alts doing your garrison than it did to go out into the world.

&gt; 707 Guardian druid here that has never step foot in a normal raid this expansion.

Still very limited.  If you're at 707, I'm betting that your gear is Empowered Apexis, everything from Kazzak, and 3 crafted items maxed out, right?  Prior to 6.2, you have a much harder cap in gear, since 655 was the highest you could get other than a few 675 pieces if you somehow managed to farm enough apexis and craft a few pieces to upgrade 4. 

But even with that gear, it's a very mind-numbing progression.  You have one world boss, the same set of daily areas every day, and that's it.  This is a good point, but I'm afraid you'll be ignored by people that only remember upgrades at the end of MoP.  People forget that VP gear from before that point was the same ilvl as normal, not heroic raids.  If a person was fully heroic geared, VP gear was pointless to them as well.WoW has been experiencing massive increases and declines for years.  I'm not saying WoD has been great, and that's not my argument, but subs leaving is not a good proof in point.  First off, one thing you generally have to look at is the "hype increase" that has happened multiple times.  Secondly, you have to consider that people leave for a variety of reasons (for example, I left during MoP because of an intense cycling season that didn't let me play much, I left during Wrath because I was dating a girl who didn't game and found myself playing less and less).  Finally, just looking at subs doesn't tell the whole story.  If you want to look at numbers, they are much more interesting and complex.  

For example, Wrath is considered by many to be the pinnacle of WoW, it's most successful expansion.   From a "number of subs" perspective, that would be True.  However, it was actually not.  Wrath sold more boxes (i.e. games) than any other expansion, breaking records for first day sales and for total sales that held until D3 released (it sold, for example, 4 million boxes in the first 24 hours of its life).  However, it only gained 500k subs from where TBC ended. It technically saw the first ever drop in subs, but that was due to China not allowing its release for a long time, so the East market plummeted for a period.  Over the course of the expansion, it only gained 1 million subs (compared to 3M in TBC and 8M in Vanilla). For an expansion that sold more copies than any other PC game to date to only rise 1M subs and to see a drop for a majority of the expansion, that was a failure.

Cata launched with 12 million subs and dropped down to just over 9M through the course of the expansion (a 25% drop).  But, the drop was smaller if you exclude the "pre-cata increase" of 500k (21.7%).  MoP launched at 10 million (the pre-MoP hype increase equaled Wrath's total increase), but dropped through the course of the expansion down to 6.8M. That's a  32% drop from its peak, but only a 24% drop from the pre-hype numbers.  WoD has seen the largest decline in subs, for sure. However, the pre-WoD hype launched the numbers from 6.8M to 10M, and as of the end of Q2 it's down to 5.6M.  That's a 44% decline... however if you consider that 3.2 million people signed up for WoD, it's misleading. If you look at the "pre-hype" numbers, it's only a 1.2M sub drop, or a 17.6% drop.

The point of all this?  Every expansion since Wrath has had the same trends, and the numbers of those trends have gotten wider every expansion:  

Trend 1: Sub increase for the launch of a new expansion:

    Wrath: 500k
    Cata: 500k
    MoP: 1M
    WoD: 3.2M

Trend 2: Subs go back down

    Wrath: 0 (Technically 25k, but I already mentioned the East market issue)
    Cata: 3M
    MoP: 3.2M
    WoD: 4.4M

It's been a consistent trend.  There's so many reasons for it. New games garner interest (whether long term or short term), real lives happen (I know I can't put in the play time I did 8 years ago)... but mostly its that there are only so many things they can do to keep that many players interested.  The game has been essentially unchanged in its core since it started.  While a lot of major changes have happened, the game has been a "go get quest, collect items and kill bad guys to finish quest, turn in quest, level up. Do dungeons and raids for harder experiences and get gear. Continue ad infinitum until you have no more gear upgrades to get."  When they have tried to change the motif up, player response has been mixed at best.Actually, Wrath's sub numbers prove the start of the decline.  It only gained 500k subs when it launched, then despite selling more games than any other PC game before it (a record that held until D3 came out), it didn't gain any subs through the course of the entire expansion until the pre-Cataclysm patch hit and it gained a whopping 500k subs.  It saw the worst turnover of players, they were just constantly being replaced by new players.  Vanilla rose 8 million players, TBC 3 million, then Wrath rose... 1.  I mentioned this in another response, but that is actually quite wrong:

Wrath went up only 500k subs when it launched, then it stopped rising. It stayed at 11.5M subs for the entire expansion, only rising at the very end another 500k.  The sub's numbers were not "consistently rising." They were stagnant. And this was with a game that sold more copies than any other PC game to that date (and that record held until D3 came out).  Wrath saw atrocious turnover of people leaving the game, but it saw new people coming in at the same time.  

So, there's your *fact*. From a numbers standpoint, Wrath was the first time WoW failed.I'm not a raider either. I can't say I enjoy the 6.2 progression, but I can't say I hate it. It's just mind-numbing. I have one option for progressing my character - Tanaan dailies. The rep is maxed, it's just farming apexis crystals to upgrade the gear slots I haven't upgraded. 

Enjoyment or not enjoyment isn't the issue, though. It's options. You can enjoy Tanaan, and there's nothing wrong with that. But what if you don't?  In prior expansions, I had other options. New 5-mans that dropped higher level gear, Timeless Isle (which had upgrade tokens like Tanaan), farming VP to upgrade existing gear, and of course raiding/LFR.  

There were also more options of things to do to progress your character from a non-gear perspective. Dailies, while they had their issues in MoP with the "required" feeling of them, provided a lot of choice for where to go and what to do. There were generally half a dozen factions you could do dailies for, and each "daily hub" would take a decent amount of time to complete.  In WoD, pre-6.2 there was a single daily and past there it was "farm mobs for rep" as the only way to work on progressing your rep. 6.2 added a daily style hub, but it's one zone worth and takes maybe 1/2 hour (it's not like you "choose" which faction you're going to devote time to each day, it's all of them).That's not upgrades though, that's moving from one type of gear to the other at the same level.  You couldn't, for example, purchase a higher tier of PvP gear than the PvE equivalent by converting VP to conquest or JP to honor. 

The crafting mats purchasable by JP only existed in Cata. It was a nice incentive, but doesn't address the original response of "Other expansions had weekly currency caps that you could fill to buy kinds of gear upgrades that mattered to the very end of the expansion."  Purchasing crafting mats also didn't help much on the upgrading of your gear, since all of the crafted gear used daily CD mats, which could not be purchased with JP.

&gt; One could also convert VP into JP or Honor to buy the BoA leveling gear, that is mostly what I did.

Still does not upgrade your gear.  That BoA gear is now purchasable with gold, both the gear itself and the upgrades for the gear.  Yes, it was a nice incentive, but you could make the same argument for it being an incentive now to run things for gold to purchase the BoA gear.

Also, with the JP conversion to mats - you can do the same thing with garrison resources. The same argument could be made that you can run dungeons for garrison resources and purchase mats that way.&gt; unless you were competing for server firsts or something rep rewards were absolutely not a requirement to succeed.

It wasn't just a problem with feeling like it was a requirement to succeed. It effectively limited your progression in ways the game had not before.  Starting in TBC, you had multiple options for progressing your character (and they overlapped). You had dungeons (regular and heroic), raids, badges/JP/VP, and reputation.  Crafting items had strong crafting recipes available through various means (reputation, world drops, raid drops).  MoP basically got rid of "repuation gear" by making the VP gear gated behind that rep and put all the strongest crafting items behind the same rep.  For a raider, it meant that you did need to do those dailies to get those items, for a non-raider it left only those dailies as the effective means of progression.

Also, I disagree with the idea of only looking at it as a server first issue.  Guilds like to progress, whether it's for server first or the last on the server. You were going to be a hindrance to your raid if you were the only one not doing those dailies. It may not have been a hindrance as fast, but it was still a hindrance.  In some cases, it even hit the point where by the time you unlocked the items you needed (due to the reps gated behind other reps), you might not need them anymore, which then goes back to the problem above of losing one of the gearing options.

I'm not saying I hated it, I didn't. I loved MoP (I just got bored of it very fast). But that was the bigger issue with the reputations.

Edit:

The other complaint of dailies was the lack of options for rep gain.  Every expansion prior had multiple ways of getting rep. Dailies, drop turn ins, dungeon grinding (either the tabard version or just specific dungeons). MoP had none of that at launch. They later added the "champion one faction" thing, but that was just for the first daily of the day and not for multiples.  Having it gated to where you had a hard cap on how much rep you could get per day was frustrating for a lot of people.I go to Highlands every day!  For the pet battle there lolThat's been a pretty consistent trend in every expansion.  Even when the overly glorified Wrath was ending, people were so excited to finally be leaving Northrend and to fight something other than undead.  When you spend a couple years in the same zones, you are ready to leave, even if you're having fun with it. Then you move on and start to miss it.

It's like that old girlfriend. Maybe she was great, maybe she wasn't, but once she's gone, you remember how awesome she was and want her back.&gt; There were also dropped patterns and BOEs in raids, the BMAH, and PVP for gearing

The dropped patterns also required drops from the same raids, so again, if you're talking about having alternate gearing mechanisms, it was "dailies or raiding."  

BMAH? I'm sorry, but having a random assortment of items appearing like that was not a gearing method.  You could go weeks without having something show up, and then you only got it if you had more gold than anyone else wanting it.  And PvP should *never* be considered a viable alternate to gearing for PvE content.

&gt; Your points are True, but for the vast majority of guilds, they weren't wiping because someone didn't have their mediocre stat allocation helm/trinket/gloves from rep

By that logic, the only people who should have a right to complain are the absolute world first guilds.  Gear helps, regardless of what else is bringing a group down. If the only option I have to get that gear to help is through dailies, it's a lack of alternatives.  In every expansion prior, you had more options. They reduced the options in MoP. If you didn't do dailies, your VP was literally worthless until they added the gear upgrade mechanic, which didn't come until the end of the expansion.

&gt; Realistically, that was only even a problem until what, 5.1(?), when they added the first catch-up mechanics and became progressively more trivial as the xpac wore on.

What catch up mechanics?  5.1 added in a new daily hub with new gear gated behind dailies, but it did not replace all the gear that was available before. 5.2 added the Isle of Thunder, but same problem with 5.1 (and to make matters worse, badge gear there was gated behind the raid rep, which left non-raiders with no options). 5.4 was the first real catch up mechanic they added where it trivialized the rep gear.

In fact, if you look at the gear options, the launch reps gave you helm, neck, shoulder, back, chest, bracers, gloves, belt, legs, feet, a ring, and a trinket (along with two reps needed to get your enchanting maxed out and reps needed for the raid level crafting gear).  Landfall repeats only four of those slots (ring, boots, belt, trinket), but effectively only repeats two since you could only have one ring and trinket of the prior rep. The Thunder Isle reps repat two slots that were already repeated in Landfall (belt, finger), giving you only one slot that you could fill.

That means if you wanted to progress your character outside of raid drops, you'd still need, of the launch factions: Shadowpan (head, 1 trinket, weapon enchants if you were an enchanter), Klaxxi (neck, legs, blacksmithing plans, weapons), Golden Lotus (shoulder, chest, leatherworking plans), August Celestials (wrist, hands, bracer enchants). Plus rep with the Landfall faction and Thunder Isle faction. 

You can knock off the enchants and plans, since those could be crafted by someone else, but even then, if you wanted to take into account someone who could afford to buy everything off the AH: that only filled the slots for helm, boots, gloves, and chest, leaving every rep still needed if you wanted to fill any slot over heroic 5-man level.  Again - it was a lack of options.  Once again, in prior expansions, there were options outside of reputation factions.

If you're talking about the commendation for faster rep, you still had to get revered on a character to buy it, and especially in the case of the factions locked behind Golden Lotus, you still had to get revered with Golden Lotus first, then start on one of those factions.

And it still did not solve the problem of *valor point gear was locked behind reputation.*  That was the complaint, plain and simple.  In the past three expansions, you had rep gear and you had badge/JP/VP gear. Two options for gearing.  In MoP, one of those options was removed. You couldn't use your VP unless you did the dailies (and doing the dailies without getting VP was also pointless). &gt; Why should those players be able to gear as fast as someone who spends the effort to raid or PVP successfully? Of course the good stuff is time gated, that's the way MMOs work. I don't get how that is even a complaint.

They aren't... I don't even get your point there.  Both raiders and non-raiders have access to the dailies, the non-raiders do not have access to raid drops.  There is no correlation there.

&gt; And in regards to PVP gear, just because you don't like it as a gearing strategy doesn't make it less useful.

No, it's a poor design choice.  Getting PvP gear for PvE was a way to skirt the system by having easy access to poorly itemized (for PvE) gear that just had higher levels.  It's a symptom of the problem - PvE players would not feel like PvP was a good alternative gear choice if acquiring PvE gear had more viable options.  See Wrath and Cataclysm for examples here.

&gt; And while unreliable, the BMAH was absolutely a good way to get otherwise unattainable gear, and I spent shitloads of gold there.

It's a way, but not a *good* way.  That's like saying "farming for world drops is a good way to gear up."  No, it's not. You can get gear that way, but it is not a gearing mechanism. 

&gt; Additionally, you've completely neglected to mention LFR.

I include LFR in the "raiding" category.  Anyone that only does LFR sees LFR as part of their progression. 

&gt; I'll be honest, I don't quite understand your point of view. 

It's quite simple: Prior to MoP, there were a lot of gearing alternatives. MoP reduced those alternatives. Why?  What was the benefit of gating VP gear behind rep?  For three expansions, those were two separate gearing options, then suddenly they combined them.  I've yet to get a justifiable reason as to why that design option was good, or better than having reputation gear be separate.  With that method, you could farm rep if you wanted to buy rep gear, or you could farm points/badges if you wanted badge gear, or you could do both if you wanted to go for both.  MoP removed that option.

&gt; I'm saying that the dailies absolutely were not mandatory unless you were doing cutting edge content.

Technically, nothing is mandatory. But it doesn't change the fact that they removed options from the game for no discernible reason. They created a system where to use the badges you were acquiring from doing heroics or raids, you *were* required to do dailies. There was no alternative there.

&gt; sure there weren't a whole lot of alternative paths to epics right away.

Correction: there were not alternative paths. If you were not a raider or a PvPer, then you had *one* option to obtain epics: doing dailies. OK, and for two slots you could craft gear. But that was it.

&gt; But, why is that even a bad thing? 

Because it's removing options that had existed for at least 6 years prior to that.  Because people like to be able to progress their characters, and taking away options to progress characters (options that existed before) isn't good.

&gt; And realistically, the "problem" only existed until 5.1.

What happened in 5.1 that solved this problem?  As I pointed out previously, 5.1 only added more reputation locked VP gear (and only two of those pieces would fit slots that were "repeat" slots of what existed in other factions.  They didn't remove or reduce the faction requirements of the VP gear until 5.4.

&gt; That's no reason to condemn an entire xpac.

I haven't?  This one aspect I think was a poor design choice. I thought MoP was pretty great, except this design choice was not.

&gt; in a larger sense, every single xpac has followed the same formula. In the x.0 patch, gear is difficult to obtain outside of serious play. As new content and tiers are added, so are catch-up mechanics.

Three flaws with that statement:

1) We're not talking about "difficulty" in acquiring gear. VP gear has never been difficult to acquire. We're talking about gating VP gear behind factions - which made acquisition of VP gear *require* doing dailies.  That had never existed in the game prior.  

2) MoP did not follow that mechanic.  Prior expansions had VP gear downgrade to JP gear with each new tier (or the badges for that gear became easier to acquire with the new badges that came out). MoP did not do that until 5.4. That means you went through the first 10 months of the game with still needing to obtain the same amount of VP as you did at launch (and required the same rep grind).

3) MoP did *not* add any catch up mechanics until 5.4, the final patch. Prior expansions added catch up mechanics starting at the first patch.&gt; The people directly below them are the ones who kick and scream, and in my opinion, ruin the community.

See, I agree with you.  But likewise, I don't think that "staying silent" is always the right choice.  I don't, and never have, been a person who went to the forums and bitched and moaned about how I hated this or hated that.  But feedback is, and has always been, important to Blizzard.  

And I don't think you're being fair to some of us who do give that feedback. You can give feedback and not be "kicking and screaming."  Like you state at the bottom of your post "The elemental shaman is not fun to play anymore."  That is feedback, would it be fair to accuse you of kicking and screaming?

&gt; From the perspective of the person who constantly criticizes WoW's problems and lives in an echo chamber of thousands of others with the same voice, you might have to sit back a little bit and consider a different perspective.

If you look through my posts, you'll see that I'm far from a person who constantly criticizes WoW's problems. I've been called a fanboy more than anything else.  There is a large difference between being able to identify an issue and "constantly complaining."

&gt; To me and players like me, we get 99% of the same game for 50% of the effort. That extra 1% of the game (The "I do more damage than casual players and like people to see my armor" percentage) contains so much extra effort within it that I don't think it's worth tearing the game apart to improve it.

I'm not sure if you're intending it, but you come across as a massive dick with that statement.  You've effectively dichotimized the game into two types of people: People who are fine with what they get (like you), and people that complain and want to look better than everyone.  

There's more types than that. I am one of them.  My guild was not a heroic guild. We struggled through most normal modes.  But I like to do the best that I can do when I'm there.  If I know that there's a trinket that I could acquire that would help my healing, and I don't acquire it, I feel like I am letting my guild down. Did they expect me to do the dailies every day for that trinket? Absolutely not. But I did. Because I knew that I could do better with it.  

I don't care what *you* think of my gear. I don't care what *you* think of my achievements (in fact, I think achievements were a terrible addition to the game). I don't care if *you* know if I'm good or not (I've been accused of being an elitist prick and a noobish scrub, sometimes in the same thread).  What I care about is being the best that I can be, and how my gameplay impacts my guildies.  I would gem, reforge, and enchant appropriately to max myself out, because **I** cared about my gear, how well I did, whether we were downing the raid or not. There's a lot of us out there.

&gt; There are a lot of players like me, we don't complain about things because it's not necessary for me to do every single thing the game has to offer. But a lot of people did and do complain, and I think that a lot of the negative things that WoD brought are a result of Blizzard assuming these chronic complainers represent the voices of more people than they actually do.

I disagree.  I think it does not give Blizzard enough credit to think that they look at the "chronic complainers" and assume it represents the people.  In fact, it's something they comment on quite often - the vocal minority.  But I also, as stated above, know that Blizzard values people giving feedback... both good and bad.  You can enjoy the game, you can not want to complete everything, but you can also point out the things you do not enjoy.

&gt; But the garrison was brought about because so many people hated dailies. 

Garrisons were a thing before the dailies were a complaint.  Halfhill was the introduction to the concept of the garrison.  I do not, for a second, think that they created garrisons and nixxed dailies because of the complaints in MoP... largely because by the end of MoP they had found that balance of "required" versus "just for fun."  Again, I don't think it gives Blizzard enough credit for their design ideas.  Not only that, but what the Garrison does isn't, at all, related to what dailies did.

**What is my point**

I think you've made a judgement on me that I do not deserve.  I did not personally hate dailies.  I did them, I enjoyed them.  I would actually have preferred dailies over what we got in WoD because I like direction every day. I like being told "here is a list of things you can do today."  

What I did not like about the MoP system was that they removed an option that had existed before.  In TBC, Wrath, and Cata, you had options for getting that gear. You could run dungeons for badges/points so you could purchase them that way, or you could do various quests/grinds for reputation for wholly separate gear.  In MoP, they took away that choice.  Instead, if you wanted that gear, you not only had to do both, but you had no choice on how you did it.  For me, it wasn't a question or issue of "dailies are required."  Of course they aren't. It was a question of "why did you remove my options."

You see, I don't really care about the debate of "should you need that gear."  That's a personal thing.  You, personally, felt OK not min/maxing yourself, as did your guild. That's great for you. You had the option of not doing so.  I, personally, felt the drive to min/max myself. I had options on how to do that removed from the game.  Did it kill the game for me?  No, I absolutely enjoyed MoP. It wasn't my favorite expansion, but it's up there. But that does not mean that I have to look at things I did not enjoy about it and say "well, that just sucks and I'll have to deal with it."Oh, absolutely, I'm not saying VP gear was worthless. It was just always worthless for a fully heroic (now mythic) geared raider.Completely agree.  The comment I made was in response to the comments that had been above.  Tezzeret had commented that with no VP, as a Mythic raider there was nothing he could do to progress and used VP gear upgrades as the counter.  Froderick had responded with questioning when VP could be used to upgrade gear other than in MoP... I was just pointing out that VP gear (prior to the end of MoP when you could upgrade current gear) has always been worthless for the heroic (now mythic) raider.

For everyone else, it's been great, and I'm sad that they decided to get rid of it.I know I'm late to the show, but this is just what seems to happen on this sub.  I've been called a fanboy and a whining complainer in the same thread before, just because people like to argue whatever you have to say.  I was in another thread talking about the MoP dailies issue (basically saying that the format at launch wasn't very good and I disagreed with the combining of rep gear and VP gear into one thing rather than having two separate options). This dude made this massive post about how people like me, the "constant complainers that kick and scream about everything they don't like in the game" are why the game is going downhill.  I was like "soooooo... I shouldn't give feedback on things I don't like?

As for your original post: I completely agree with you.  I'm glad they made it better than it was at launch (the 20/10/5 for different sized fish), but I do hate the "5" requirement... I get random sized stacks from my fishing net all the time, so even if I'm not fishing, I'm having to deal with having all those random sized stacks.  I like the hook, but that is only useful when I'm actively fishing, I'm not going to waste a hook when I'm out in the world and run across a random pool and stop real quick to fish up what's there.That would be fun at first, but then you'd just be wanting some quick fish and you'd get annoyed at it.  It would largely depend on the need for fish that expansion.  I could only imagine how annoying it would be if it was like in WotLK where a fish feast was the most commonly used "raid feast,"  it was annoying enough then to fly around to find all the fish needed for the feast, if I had to do a mini-game on top of that, I'd have said screw it to my raid and just got food for myself.&gt; And have the daily fish eggs drop from actually fishing, which is so easy to do right beside the quest giver.

They were going to do this, but the backlash was too great.  A lot of people, myself included, have been using mains to help alts level up fishing. I can fish for larger fish on my main (still working on the damn achievement, but I get bored fast), send the fish to my alt, then they filet the fish for the eggs.And what about fish you get with your tuskarr fishing net?  Or when you're out in the world and you run across a pool, do you use a hook for that one pool?Running across random pools while out in the world.  I'm not going to waste a fishing hook on a random pool (nor do I normally just carry them on me unless I'm specifically going out to fish)... but even if I did:

Tuskarr fishing net. I usually send my oil rig boats out with fishing nets equipped so I can get extra fish and a chance at the turtle, but I can't "hook" those to get auto-filets.&gt; It's unlikely that Worgen would join the alliance due to Gilneas having no reason to wall itself off, it'd also be able to call for aid from Lordearon if the Worgen threat was still a thing.

Maybe not.  Just because Arthas was gone doesn't mean the Scourge wasn't going to become a thing in EK. The grain was already poisoned before he became a DK and the LK. Gilneas walled itself off against the Scourge, and Worgen were created/summoned (depending on which version of the story you read) to help battle the Scourge. That likely still would have happened.  The bigger difference is that if there was never the Forsaken, then Gilneas might never have been breached, since by the time that happened, the Scourge had been effectively defeated, it was the Forsaken coming in from behind in boats that caused them to ~~flea~~ flee to the Alliance.

&gt; Again it's hard to say since Arthas going to Northrend is one of the most influential events that shaped Azeroth.

I'd say overall, it would be bad. Since the Infinite Dragonflight attempted to prevent the Culling of Stratholme, it can be assumed that in some version of the future, if Arthas doesn't become the LK, it changes enough to come to Murazond's version of the future (the End Time, which does not appear very good).So, it really depends on what your "end goal" is.  If your goal is just to get into raiding and *see* the mechanics, hunter is by far the easiest class to just pick up and do well (just learn how to turn off growl on your pet and when it is a bad idea to use barrage).  

However, that means that you'll be experiencing the fights ranged and on a class that can never convert to tanking.

If you ultimately want to tank, then I do not recommend a ranged class, no matter how easy. There are a lot of different things that happen when you're ranged versus melee.  Being a melee class will help you learn what it is like to be in melee range and dealing with melee mechanics.

Recommendations, in order:

Paladin: Gives you three options (Tank, heal, DPS).  They are very easy to pick up for DPS and tanking.  However, they are not typically the "strongest" tanks or DPS, so if you're going for progression eventually, other options *might* be better.

Death Knight (Frost): Easy to pick up, get experience on watching runes for when you ultimately switch over to tanking. However, tanking is a bit more difficult than paladin tanking, which is why it is #2 instead of #1.  Would be lower than a warrior, but they start at 55, which will speed up your leveling if you weren't planning to boost.

Warrior (Arms): Extremely easy rotation (sometimes boringly so), but can switch over to tanking.

Monk: Gives you three options (tank, heal, DPS). They are harder to pick up and master, but I find them a TON of fun.

Druid: Gives you four options (tank, heal, melee, ranged). I, personally, find the druid the hardest to get the hang of, which is why I put it last. But druid TANKING is very easy (almost as easy as a paladin), so it's not too hard to make the switch.

Rogue (Assassination/Combat): Ok, so I put this on here because it is a pure melee DPS class. Both specs are easy to pick up. However, you'll be faced with having to reroll if you ever want to tank.  Sub might technically be better DPS in many encounters, but it's a steeper learning curve.  Always in the Vale.  There's no better option. You can port to all major cities, including Shattrath and Dalaran.  From Dalaran, you can take the portal to the Caverns of Time for southern Kalimdor, you can go to Org/SW and there's a portal to Ashran to get back to Draenor if your Draenor hearth is on CD, or the portals from Cata to all the different Cata places.  

They have banks, repair vendors, an AH if you're an engineer (and of course you can just portal to a major city if you're not).

Really, I can't think of any reason it's not the best place.Incorrect.  Feral bleeds still snapshot certain things: Savage Roar, the buff from stealthed rakes, Tiger's Fury, Bloodtalons.  They all increase the damage of your bleeds *when applied*, rather than updating dynamically.I was going to suggest this same thing.  OP, use this site. It not only gives you all the mounts you can collect in raids/dungeons/world drops, but it will build "routes" for you based on what you already have to give you an idea of the most efficient "route."Really depends on what you are wanting to do.  

While leveling, Blood is extremely powerful. Sure, it's a "tanking" spec, but you are damn near invincible. This means you can pull much MUCH larger groups than you could as unholy/frost.  This will not only speed up your leveling, but will speed up any type of farming for stuff you want to sell for gold.  It will also give you the option of fast queues for tanking.

However, frost is another good option due to the its burst damage, meaning you can kill things super fast.  

Unholy is the only "bad" option in my opinion. Not because it's a bad spec, but it's more DoT based and a good portion of its damage is the pet and being able to "enrage" the pet... but when you're questing, it can be harder to get enough stacks to be able to enrage your pet.Undermine Journal is the only site I've heard of that shows prices for things on various realms. If it's not updating right now, it's probably/hopefully a temporary problem. 

I'm not sure if it shows price comparisons per realm, but it does show the price on the realm you are looking at and then "total US prices," so you can see if the realm you are looking at is over or under the US average. (Not sure if it shows EU as well, I've only ever looked for US)Maybe something similar, but not Algalon. He was specifically tied to Ulduar and activated in Ulduar via Loken's death, then his "purpose" was fulfilled.  

He wasn't "sent" by the Pantheon. It was a distress beacon associated with Yogg's corruption. By killing Loken, we activated the beacon indicating that Yogg's corruption was overtaking the world.

However, unless they bring the Old Gods back in, I doubt that the Titans will get involved. They don't seem to do much against the Legion, their constructs, Watchers, and everything in Azeroth seems to have been about the Old Gods.Correction: Run to Frostfire, since you're Horde :)OP, I know others have said it, but frost is pretty strong for leveling.

But if you want to go arcane, some recommendations while leveling:

1) Spec into the frost shield (or whatever it's called, one of your early talents). It's a 35 second CD, but provides a LOT of damage absorb. Cast it before you pull (and if it's something larger, wait to pull until the CD is up, so you can cast it again as soon as it gets knocked off).

2) Get the greater invisibility talent. It drops your invisibility spell to a 2 minute CD, which is great for getting out of tight spots.

3) Pick up the arcane nova talent. It will make you lose your frost nova, but it turns it into a large damage spell, instant cast, with two charges, that knocks up mobs. Great for burst damage to kill things faster, and will interrupt spellcasting or make things take longer to get to you.

4) Your level 90 talent should be mirror image for leveling.  When you cast it, it does a LOT of burst damage, but more importantly your images take threat from you while they are active. I use it as a defensive cooldown to prevent mobs from hitting me if I'm in a bind.

5) One near mandatory glyph is Glyph of Slow. It causes your main attack to apply slow on the mob. It will help prevent them from getting to you very fast.

6) When fighting, your first two Arcane Blasts will hit like a wet noodle. That is because when you attack, it puts a buff on you that increases the damage of your next Arcane Blast.  My "normal" rotation while questing is "Arcane Blast (applies slow), Arcane blast, missiles (if they procced)/Arcane Nova, arcane blast, missiles (if they procced), arcane blast.  Usually that will kill things before they can get to me.  Your instant cast Arcane Barrage consumes your stacks of the buff, but the damage is increased based on the stacks, so don't use it unless your stacks are going to fall off or you think it will kill the mob. If you do it too early, you'll end up with a weak arcane blast again.  I will only use Arcane Barrage when I have 4 stacks or if the stacks are going to fall off before I can get my next arcane blast or Arcane Missiles off.

7) Polymorph is your friend.  If you have two mobs you are going to pull, polymorph one of them so you can kill the first with no intervention.Edit: Or I'm wrong. I guess I was still thinking of MoP's system. My apologies. Deleting my original post.Already deleted. I was thinking of MoP's system. Yep, I was mistaken, was thinking of MoP's system and the Mythic instance lock. I've already deleted my original response.Yeah, it can be frustrating.  I had to make some special weak auras to show what buffs were snapshotted on my bleeds to make sure I don't accidentally overwrite a really strong one with a really weak one.&gt; they're using their limited knowledge of time to travel around and try to bring the villains of the past to justice.

I'm not sure that is accurate.  If you look at the CoT instances, two of them stand out as situations where we aren't so much "bringing villains of the past to justice":  Hyjal and Escape.

In Hyjal, we don't directly see the Infinite's role in there, but the fact that we have to go in to make sure that we succeed in Hyjal infers that in some way the Infinite was trying to make us *not* win that war.  The only people that hurts in the mortal races, but all of them.

In Escape, they are trying to prevent Thrall from escaping Durnholde. If he doesn't escape, then the New Horde is never formed, but Thrall could not exactly be considered a Villain.

At the time, I was confused as to why that would be their goal... every event they stop is one that had dire consequences of the future. But when we face Murazond and learn more about the Infinite, it makes a lot more sense.

Murazond is, of course, Nozdormu's future insane self.  His description in the Dungeon Journal says, basically, that the Old God's trick him into thinking he can subvert his own death and he goes crazy about it.  Now, look at what happens in Dragon Soul - When we kill Deathwing, Nozdormu cries out that he will bind *all* timelines to that moment, so it can never be undone... but in defeating Deathwing, the Aspects lose their... Aspect-ness.

So now you have Nozdormu, no longer an Aspect, but still with some powers over time. He is driven crazy by the Old Gods into thinking that he can still subvert that death.  He cannot manipulate time like he once could, but he knows the major events that would change history enough to prevent that future demise.  Remember, in Murazond's End Time, Deathwing was still defeated (though we do not know how), only he was still just a dragon (not the monstrosity he becomes at the end of Dragon Soul).  

* Thrall's Escape from Durnholde:  If Thrall doesn't escape from Durnholde, then he never re-connects to the elements, becoming a powerful shaman. This means he cannot become the vessel for the Earthwarder's power to wield the Dragon Soul. This means that Deathwing isn't defeated in that way, which means the Aspects do not lose their powers.

* Black Morass: If Medivh never summons the Orcs to Azeroth, it means that Thrall never comes to Azeroth (see above for the repercussions there). It also means the Alliance is never formed to fight the Horde, it means Deathwing (as Prestor) is never confronted, the Demon Soul is never found by the Dragonmaw and eventually destroyed, possibly that Deathwing doesn't go as insane and bent on world destruction as he was by the time of the Cataclysm.  This could be one way that he is defeated in Murazond's future - He doesn't go back to Deepholm to become more corrupted by the Old Gods, and with the loss of the Demon Soul, he's weaker himself and so is able to be defeated.

* Culling: By preventing Arthas from becoming the Lich King, the mortal races never have to face the Scourge in the way they did with Arthas.  The Burning Legion isn't summoned back to Azeroth because they don't have a champion as strong as Arthas to lead the Scourge the weaken the forces.  Silvermoon successfully defends itself.  But, as a result, the Mortal Races cannot fight against Deathwing when he returns. They still manage to kill him, but without the Aspects losing their powers.

All of these end in the same future: Deathwing still gets killed, but without Nozdormu losing his power.  However, they all result in a MUCH worse future. Without those events, the races of Azeroth do not unite the way they did, which results in the Burning Legion eventually winning.  That was why Nozdormu stops the Infinite: he can see that stopping those events leads to a MUCH worse future, despite his own death that will come from it.I think, especially now, that changing the ease of leveling fishing for alts that way is a much worse system.  The OP's idea makes sense to me, and I don't really see why it would be a bad thing: just have them filet up to 5 at a time. If you filet one, you get the mean from one. It's a much simpler system, IMHO.What the other guy said, he may have been tied to other Ulduar like places.

I see it like this: it's clear the Titans have set devices in the world to "protect" it.  Those devices seem to be controlled (or watched, if you will) by the Watchers they set up in those worlds.  If one of them falls, then it sends out a beacon, which then sends Algalon to assess the world and determine if it is beyond saving.  If he assesses it is beyond saving, he re-originates the world.  However, it's all automated.  

We haven't seen anything similar before or after Ulduar, despite coming across a LOT of Titan creations, so it could be something where he was set up for that one specific place.  It's possible that he could make a return, but I think more likely is that the pillars we are going to be trying to find in Legion will be connected to something completely different, possibly worse.  Like a "if the pillars fall, the world reoriginates automatically" type thing.It does, but they've been strangely absent in every Legion encounter we've ever faced. 

Where were they when the Legion invaded 10,000 years ago?

Where were they when the Legion came back in the Third War?

Where were they when the Legion came to Draenor (in the Original Universe)?

Where were they when the Legion came to AU Draenor?

 I have a few theories on the Titans, none of them good:

1) The Titans are not as benevolent as we think.  They go around creating or reforming worlds as they see fit, leave stuff behind to "keep it orderly," but then don't really care what happens.  (This theory is partially killed by the Aspects coming into being, since the Titans came back to give them their power)

2) The Titans have been killed/imprisoned/otherwise detained by something greater.  Maybe we haven't heard from the Titans since the Aspects because Sargeras defeated them.  Or maybe they have been imprisoned by Old Gods or the like on another world.  Or maybe they just have too much else going on in the universe to worry about us.  Azeroth is only one world in millions. While to us, it is of the utmost importance to survive, to them it's just another world.  They could be fighting a battle similar to the one with the Old Gods on Azeroth and coming back to "save" us just isn't a big deal.  (This could also be a potential future expansion - go save the Titans on whatever world they have been imprisoned).

3) The "Clockmaker" theory that is often applied to the Biblical God. Basically, they create worlds, they created the inner workings to keep them going, but then they leave it be. Maybe they'll tinker here and there (ie the Aspects), but overall they are watching what happens. If the world fails, they recreate it, but they don't directly intervene.  Essentially, they'll come in to fix it back to the original once we all die, but they won't intervene in the interim.  Similar to theory 1, but in this theory, they care, they just won't intervene.

4) The Titans are actually evil. This has little weight, but we assume they want us to live. However, we are corrupted versions of what they made. They might not *want* to save us, they might just want us to die since we are just corruptions of their world.

5) The titans are planning to let us lose so the Legion with come toe to toe with the Old Gods.  Sargeras and the Old Gods pose the biggest threat to the Titans. As was the case in Godzilla: *"Let them fight."*&gt; I doubt the titans take using their artifacts that they used to create the world lightly.

But why not? Look at how often we've used/abused Titan artifacts with no repercussions. Uldaman, Uldum, Everything outside of Ulduar. We destroyed one of the artifacts in Uldum after almost activating it and it didn't garner a response. We've fought their Watchers, destroyed their keeps. The closest we've come to them actually returning, or anything of the like, was with Algalon, and that was because Loken set up a failsafe in case he died to send out the distress that the world was corrupted.If I remember when I get home tonight, yeah!

Edit: I mean, sure I'll share, not yeah I mind lol!&gt; Uldaman was basicly a place where the titans threw their stupid shit.

The Troggs were imprisoned there, sure, but the Earthen were still in there, along with multiple Guardians. They clearly cared enough about it for that, even if the Troggs were deemed a failure.  

We will see Titan stuff, for sure, it's just a question of whether it will be more artifacts or *actual* Titans/Watchers/etc.It's highly possible... kind of falls into the "Clockmaker" idea.... You'd think they'd be keeping tabs on the big things of the universe, like where the Legion is targeting... and as far as Azeroth goes, in a 10 year period of time, we've killed multiples of their Watchers (Uldaman's watchers, Halls of Origination's watchers), fought with Ulduar's watchers, who were also corrupted by an Old God.  You'd think at that point, they'd maybe be going "there's seems to be a lot going on back on that world, we should go take a gander at it, make sure the babsitter didn't burn the house down."Sounds about like my life when I get home from work.

"How did my dogs manage to do that in the time it took me to put my laptop away, change, and turn the oven on!?!"1) Can't answer, the only one I've seen it on had a level 3 shipyard. Sorry :(

2) Required. You have to collect a sea chart to get it, which means you have to have it. HOWEVER, you don't have to finish leveling it, just take the risk at failure. I was able to get it on two toons with a 75% success.  However, you do risk losing ships if you fail a mission.

3) Nope!  Every ship you build has a random crew and a chance up upgrading automatically to rare. (This changes to automatically rare, chance of epic once you get a level 3 shipyard).  You cannot control the crew, but the crew is important.  There are time decreasing crews, XP increasing crews, and gold increasing crews. The first two are largely worthless (shortening time from 8 hours to 4 realistically still means one mission per play session).  Gold crews can net a lot of gold on the right mission, but the missions aren't as valuable. The best crews are the "increased chance of success" crews (Pandaren &amp; Undead for Horde, not sure for Alliance).  If you get a crew you don't like, best option is to decomission the ship and try again.  Having those crews really helps on missions.  Past there, you can purchase the attachments for the abilities they have once you pick up the plans (once per account) from rares in Tanaan. They are 500 resources each.

5) Not really. Although you can get other things: a battle pet, the ability to have the BMAH in your garrison, and Baleful gear that is BoA you can send to alts. Keep guild hunting. I have a single alliance toon on a server with no other alts (the rest of mine are Horde). I accepted all the "mass guild invites" that I would get and stick around for a bit. I finally got into one that is truly social. People talking, people helping out... one even came to my low self from Nagrand just to port me to the Vale so I could set my Hearth there.  They do raids and such, but don't care if I don't. It's made me greatly enjoy that server!&gt; Why does this mean that the Mortal Races can't fight against Deathwing?

Well, each successive war on Azeroth has brought death, but it has also brought unification and strength.  The Orc wars brought human kingdoms together and brought humans into alliances with the dwarves and high elves.  The battle for Mount Hyjal brought Night Elves into the Alliance.  The Horde was formed almost purely as a response to wars.  However, take out the Scourge as a "True threat," and you don't get Silvermoon entering the fray, which means the High Elves never join the forces of the Alliance, never lose the Sunwell and become the Blood Elves, never get betrayed and therefore join the Horde.  Sylvanas never encountering Arthas means she is never killed and turned, she never becomes the Banshee Queen, the Forsaken are never formed.  Without the Burning Legion invading in full, the Night Elves never join the war or unit with the rest of the Alliance.  

Enter Deathwing.  Instead of two solidified groups (Horde and Alliance) fighting against him, he has multiple small groups (Horde without Blood Elves/Forsaken, the human kingdom of Lordaeron, a separate human kingdom of Gilneas, the Alliance of Stormwind (which is much smaller), the Night Elves (alone).  Alone, each group would likely not be able to fight Deathwing as they did united.I'm not sure where you're getting that I'm salty, or why you'd downvote my answer.  You asked why you would fish just one, or why not just use the bladebone hook. I answered your question. There are at least two reasons I've given you as to why you might have a single fish.  Your response (the original post) does not answer anything to the OP's suggestion.

Can you please tell me any downside to being able to filet a single fish?I honestly just did my shipyard enough to get the sea chart, then was done with it. I'd love the ring, but it's such a rare mission that I'm not going to spend a bunch of time trying. I got the int one, and if another pops (I maybe check it once a week), I'll do it, but besides that, meh!Here's what I use, I was mistaken on the them, I had to steal my feral ones from Pawket, I couldn't figure out how to make them myself for that particular snapshot for some reason.

http://www.fluiddruid.net/forum/viewtopic.php?f=11&amp;t=5034

If you follow the directions, it's pretty easy to get them to work.By that time, it would be too late.  Uniting didn't happen overnight. You have to remember, Deathwing comes back years after the war against the Legion, and a lot had to happen for us to be in the position to be able to defeat him.  

Shamanism had to come back, and strong, for the wielding of the Dragon Soul.

Heroes had been toughened through countless battles, both against enemies and against the two factions.

Forces like the Knights of the Ebon Blade and Knights of the Silver Hand would not have been around.

You'd think they'd be stronger, but they'd be separated. A single stick breaks with ease, but tie them together, and you cannot shatter them.

The High Elves would be in full force, but they were also typically a "keep within the walls of Quel'thalas."  They only came out and joined the mortal fight because Qual'thalas was overrun by the Scourge.  By themselves, they'd be boned.

The Night Elves still immortal did not make them stronger in battle, it kept them from aging and dying to disease. They'd still die just as easily to Deathwing, and given the propensity to keep away from all other races prior the the Legion's war, they'd be easily defeated by themselves. 

But, like I said in the prior post: they'd win, it would just be at much more horrific losses, leading to the future we see in End Time - Deathwing is broken on Wyrmrest, but everything has been wiped out.  We'd win, but not before he is able to release the Cataclysm (which we *barely* manage to stop).I didn't say that there wouldn't be Titan stories, but I don't think it will be the Titan's themselves.  

At Gamescon, what he says is that we will turn to "the big guys in the sky, talking about the titans," then a few people cheer, but then says "no no no, we will scour the broken isles for the pillars of creation. These are titan relics that were used to shape the world when it was young, when it was first born. It's only with these relics that we can close this massive gateway that looms at the heart of the tomb of Sargeras."

That, to me, says it'll be more Titan story in the way we've been having them: relics, constructs, artifacts... but not the Titans themselves.  

Unless there was another part that I'd forgotten?I'm not understanding.  Why does that make it a factor? Sleeping would fit more with the Green than the Bronze....When I was new to this sub, I was not familiar with what was here.  If it wasn't on the "hot" page, I didn't see it.

"But then search for it, that's why there is a search bar!"

Sure, but just for the sake of argument, I searched "new and need help" just a second ago.  Of the 25 results on the first page, if sorted by "relevance," I find:

Most recent thread: 3 months old

4-6 Months old: 6

7-11 Months old: 8

1 year: 4

2 years: 5

Oldest thread: 4 years

So, why would I want to trust this?  Even three months ago, the game may have changed a lot (If I'm new, I don't know when information has changed, something I've found the hard way in subs like the GW2 sub), if I'm returning, I know there could have been a big change just a bit ago, so a majority of those posts are probably outdated.

Now, yes, I can sort by age, I can filter out older posts, but now I can't figure out if the post is a good one, so I'm going through a lot of posts with only a few upvotes, and most of them with comments in the single digits.  So, now I'm reading through 18 different posts trying to find out which ones actually have good answers... 

Or, I can simply type out a quick post and say "I'm new to wow and need help" and hope I get some answers myself.

Edit: Not to mention, even when you do find a post that has a lot of good information in it, I can't ask followup questions. It's likely either archived or no one wants an older post resurrected. If I'm asking my own question, then when I get a response, I can thank the person, I can ask follow-up questions.

Edit2: Love the downvotes. Don't like that I'm right? Why don't you give me a legit argument?Which is my point.  People come and ask "the same questions" and this guy complains about it. But it's not like there's a great search function to find the answers they want.I think that's a bit of a stretch.  He was active whenever it was necessary.  His job as the Aspect of Time wasn't to interfere with the timeline, so it would make perfect sense for him to only need to take action when someone sought to destabalize the timeline. Why else would he do something with the timeline?  

But even then, every time there was something going on, he was there.  We don't really know much about what he did between being empowered as an Aspect and the War of the Ancients, but he was there in the War of the Ancients, there after with the blessing of the World Tree. He was there in the fight against Deathwing (the first time, in the destruction of the Demon Soul), he *was* missing during the fights against the Infinite during TBC, but we find out during Wrath it was because he was battling the Infinites at the Bronze Dragonshrine all throughout time and had gotten lost in time trying to hold the True timeline together and trying to figure out a way to stop himself from eventually becoming Murazond (from Twilight of the Aspects). He's there for the final battle (and everything leading up to it).  

And even past there, he had his name prior to being an Aspect, when he was very active. And it wouldn't fit with the rest of his flight, since even the parts where he was missing or appeared inactive (even though he wasn't as stated above), his flight was extremely active.  I just doesn't fit.

The idea of "sleep" being the basis of his name just simply doesn't fit. Sleep fits absolutely perfectly for Ysera and her flight, since she was literally in hibernation for most of her time as an Aspect (one of her titles is even She of the Dreaming), but not Nozdormu.You should see how it looks on a male tauren. 

They look like they have a spiked collar on, and not in a good way!

http://imgur.com/pvSB1uNI've been where you're at, OP.  On my main server, I've been in a guild since Wrath and I had all my Horde toon slots occupied, so when my wife wanted to try leveling an Alliance, I made toons on another server. Well, she didn't like it, but I really wanted to level an alliance toon up, so I was going it alone.

Best thing to do is to search for a guild.  I joined a lot of those "Social" guilds that would accept anyone. I eventually got into one that is very active. They are very new to the dungeon/raiding scene (their raid nights are for LFR, not even Normal), but whenever I'm on, there are 20-30 people on talking and having a good time.  It took a lot of tries, but I found a social group that makes the server fun for me!Yeah, I get that. Maybe talk with your friend first? Explain just what you've explained to us - leveling is very lonely without people around and you want more "social." I have a buddy who doesn't ever raid and barely do dungeons, he left my guild for a "social" guild and it's been fine.There is, but unfortunately you cannot get it if you are in a guild (which is dumb). I'm not sure what the chat channel number is, but you type:

    /join [Channel Name]

Likewise to leave

    /leave [Channel Name]

Easiest way to see what channels are available is to go to your chat box, right click where it says "General" and go down to settings. That will pull up a box of everything that should show in your chat box.  Go to "Global Channels" and it will show all the channels available in the zone you are in.

I've found just searching for a guild in trade usually works, but I'm pretty sure if you are guildless you automatically join the looking for guild channel.Emerald Proto-whelp - great for soloing just about anything in the world. Shield that lasts for 5 rounds, heal that will almost always get you back to full. Main attack is strong against flying (great for world pests) and doesn't have the best weakness the Anub Idol has.  Not a lot of "strong against dragons" attacks out there.

Terrible Turnip - has an ability with no CD that cannot reduce a creature below 1 HP. Perfect for capturing pets since you don't have to risk it dying (Molten Corgi has a similar ability, but it has a CD).  Can also do the Sunlight ability, which increases max HP, making it easier to get pets to the 35% mark for capturing.

Lil'Bling and anything with the eletric storm ability (like Mechanical Yeti). Yeti puts up storm, bling comes in and throws up "make it rain" for damage every round and then has a multi-round charge through similar to the Anklerender that increases damage taken by the creature.

Anklerender (as Andis1 said). Great damage!That as a level 100 heavily armored tank who can face the blows of Archimonde himself, a low level bandit can interrupt me if I'm trying to mine something....  Really, much like in Skyrim when you get attacked by bandits after slaying a Legendary Dragon, it bothers me that the fact that I'm extremely powerful doesn't hold sway on lower level things.  Like, WHY would that Defias bandit think "I'm going to take on this uber geared obviously stronger than me dude."

Edit: That's all fun and games, but the real annoyance in the game is anytime I get a quest to collect parts of animals. Unless it says "perfect" or "pristine" or something, it bothers me that I don't get, for example, four hoofs from every giraffe I kill.Leveling my first Alliance toon (Have 11 Horde 100's, but never have finished leveling an Alliance).

Praying my shipyard's oil rig missions will bring me back a turtle (Tuskarr fishing net x2)

Still going for the DS, Firelands, and Ulduar mounts

Farming things to sell so I can bank more gold before Legion since I'm sure they'll not make gold as stupid easy to get.Not "best" necessarily, but 40 was where you got Shadowform, so there really wasn't much difference between being shadow, disc, and holy.  A lot went disc at the time due to the wand talent, since mana was so terrible at that point.Half a joke, but also half True. For a long while, spellpower increased the damage of arcane shot, and when hunters had mana, mana regen was nearly as important as everything else.  I saw a good number of hunters that would equip spellpower melee weapons with +mp5 for that reason.  It wasn't the best thing, but it actually did increase their damage if it was enough of an upgrade over what they had...

It *was* completely viable for a hunter to put the mana regen oil on their melee weapons.I started when TBC launched (about a month after).  I had no idea how to level as a warlock at the time, so I made this macro:

    /petattack
    /castsequence Immolate, Curse of Agony, Corruption

Then I would wand spam until it was dead.  Did that ALL the way to level 70.  If a single DoT fell off, it would restart the sequence (didn't know anything about DoT clipping or refreshing at the right time, etc.)

Edit: leveled as Demo, so I still have plenty of screenshots of Haadhun my felguard tanking mobs while I'm wanding away.TBC for me

I went from being a complete and utter noob (see [my post here](https://www.reddit.com/r/wow/comments/3oif9m/what_is_something_ridiculous_you_did_in_wow/cvy3ng8), to being the warlock class officer for a progression guild, getting the Hand of A'dal title, and being "properly" attuned for BT.  I made friends in that raiding guild that became friends IRL and lasted way beyond when the guild split up.  I've enjoyed, for the most part, every expansion, but those were my glory days.I'm pretty sure that was part of the same set of quests to which I am thinking.... from Crossroads in the barrens.  Giraffe hoofs, strider beaks, lion claws, raptor heads... HOW DO YOU NOT ALL HAVE THESE!!!

At least they've modified those quests in more recent expansions and had it be "get a *pristine* [animal part]," and the junk that drops is a "ruined" part or whatever.Uh, unless they just changed it today, it works everywhere. I use it all the time. I specifically go grab it when I first go to Shadowmoon to pick up that flight point for the later Legendary segment that's right over there.It wasn't that it was a huge boost, they reduced how much it gave when they did the stat squish, but it still worked with the exact same stats over level 90, which was why it was great.Why can't warriors succeed in business? 

Because they charge too much.

Why did the customer complain about the warriors customer service?

Because he kept shouting.Technically, he said all loot goes to you, yes, so you were in the right...

However, a lot of people have a general understanding that extraordinarily rare items, like mounts, are still free roll unless specifically stated.  I know that I specifically state that if I'm every running lowbies through anything that drops a mount.

The best bet, in the future, is to set the loot to master looter to prevent this from happening. 

tl;dr - Technically, you were in the right, but it's a special item that should usually warrant more discussion up front.What TryingNewThing said: It's never too late.

You find this problem in every expansion. Whatever is the "main hub" for players is where you'll find everyone. In TBC, it was Shattrath, in Wrath it was Dalaran, in Cata it was Org/SW (the other major cities were barren), in MoP it was the Vale, now it's Garrisons/Ashran.  If you think there aren't people on, pay attention to trade chat while you're in Org. You'll likely see that there are a lot of people talking in trade, it's just that they aren't in Org.

Find yourself a guild. I have 11 Horde toons on one server and decided to level an Alliance for the first time. I made one on a new server, knowing nobody except my wife (who rarely plays due to school).  I accepted a random guild invite I got to a "social guild" with hundreds of members. While I do not know anyone, they are active, talk a lot, and run dungeons, heroics, and are starting to try to raid. It's been fun, and I'm getting to know everyone.  

Once you get to WoD (level 90-100), you'll start seeing a few more people, and once you hit level 100, you'll see people a lot.  Had a rogue in my last TW TBC what was doing something like 10k. Had the glaives, legendary cloak, full DS heroic, fully gemmed, and some other gemmable pieces.  It was obscene.

I usually pull 3-4k on my "TW geared toons," it's tons of fun (until you get Mana Tombs and the tank gets incapacitated and the mobs run at you and you get one shot).Right, I was specifically responding to the prior person who said "only works in shadowmoon valley(draenor)"

Not sure if he was saying that's the change they'll likely make, or if he was saying that the item has that restriction. I was saying that the item doesn't currently have that restriction.Apparently, sometime in Alpha or Beta, there were datamined soundfiles that indicated that OUR Maraad was married to Yrel, but she died.  The theory was that in the AU we enter, Maraad never existed, so when he meets Yrel, and she shows no recognition of him, he realized that he did not exist in this version of Draenor, and keeps his past with her a secret... 

You can see glimpses of this with how he acts to her, and especially his saving her at the cost of his own life.  She had lived this long without him, but he could not bear to lose her again.

Really, though, given his history in our world, it's no surprise that he never existed in AU Draenor (don't think of it as Alternate Time, but Alternate Universe).  He was with the Draenei before ever getting the Draenor, he has been a Vindicator for a LONG time, and no one recognizes him.  

This whole universe is different. If you read the Garrosh short story when he arrives on Draenor, you find that Kairoz picked this Draenor because it was close, but not identical, to the ones from which the Orcs came. On face value (in that story), it meant one in which Garrosh was never born.  But there are other differences - Ga'nar is ever mentioned in our history (though the other brother, the leader of the Thunderlords, is), Maraad didn't exist, there's a lot of different Naaru involvement: for example, D'ore is found in Auchindoun in our universe as a Dark Naaru that died in the crash in Draenor, but they seem to not understand the concept of a Dark Naaru in AU Draenor; K'ara, the Dark Star in AU Draneor, is never mentioned prior to WoD, O'ros in the Exodar would have existed in Draenor before the wars, but he never makes an appearance in WoD...

You could probably keep going with other examples... Overall, when Blizzard was announcing WoD and answering questions about it, they said that they really did not want a lot of confusion on meeting past versions of our same selves.  So, if someone came over, they just had that particular person not exist (either due to death or simply never existing) in AU Draenor.  We meet people like Velen (MU Velen didn't come through) and Drek'thar (MU Drek'thar didn't come over), and we don't meet people like Maraad (AU Maraad never existed) and Garrosh (AU Garrosh never existed).At least in some turn based/random encounter RPGs, if you get high enough level, things are less likely to attack you and more likely to flee if you do go into battle.I just know of the sound files where you find out they were married, but then they dropped that storyline.  I think there is a theory (or is it confirmed?) that Yrel is related to Velen, but I'm not in a place where I can look that up.

&gt; it's a big disappointment knowing that the only real link from WoD to Legion is Gul'dan. Sure, Gul'dan is a big, interesting villain, but it would have been fucking awesome if Yrel, Durotan, and Grom were to come to Azeroth to aid in fighting off the Legion.

Completely agree, but not surprising.  I feel the same way about WoD and Pandaria.  Where are the Shado-pan? I mean, the entire reason that we held a trial for Garrosh instead of flat out killing him was because they "more than anyone else" have suffered because of Garrosh...  Yet Garrosh escapes and I don't see Taran Zhu and the Shado-pan coming through the portal to help track him down and "bring him to justice."  Have trolls and/or fishing nets, they will bring you fish and ship upgrades (potentially).

They are pointless if all you have are epic boats (similar to follow XP missions if you don't have a salvage yard). However, you might lose a ship, or you might need to clear one out to potentially have a better one pop up in the same spot.A big part, beyond what /u/Phil977 and /u/Vikt22 said was that it felt like end game content was lacking.  See, in Cata, they did a LOT of work revamping Old Azeroth. They redid almost (if not every) zone, revamped the questing experience to flow better, or completely redid zones from the ground up.  It was a TON of content......

But it was content most players never saw or only saw in passing while flying to another area.  The result was that there did not feel like there was a lot of end-game stuff.  Buying accounts is against the ToS, so they absolutely did do something wrong.

However, reporting them won't do anything. At best, they lose the account, but it doesn't recover it (and could risk banning it if Blizzard thinks that it was sold by the OP).You absolutely do not need to start with the RTS series to get a good chunk of the lore, though it can help... but it's playing a 15 year old game, and it feels like it (especially if you've never played it).  Source: I didn't play WC3 until the end of Cataclysm and was fine.

However, if you want lore, look up the Nobbel87 list that /u/SmooshyXz mentioned. He is the absolute best at lore.  If you don't have the time to watch those (some are quite long), go to wowpedia and start reading pages (avoid wowwiki as it is outdated and often wrong).

Finally, the best source of lore is books:

This post has the order of the stories:

https://www.reddit.com/r/wow/comments/3h4lgb/the_complete_wow_book_reading_order_lore_timeline/

It's long, as it includes comics, short stories, etc.  

Book only wise, there's a few that are what I consider the essentials.  I recommend you start with picking up [Rise of the Horde](http://www.amazon.com/World-Warcraft-Rise-Horde-No/dp/0743471385), it gives a great background on how the Original Horde came to be.  Then get the [Warcraft Archive](http://www.amazon.com/WarCraft-Archive-WORLD-OF-WARCRAFT/dp/1416525823) it has four books that all relate events to after WC3/before WoW. After that, get [The War of the Ancient](http://www.amazon.com/WarCraft-War-Ancients-Archive-Warcraft/dp/1416552030/ref=sr_1_1?s=books&amp;ie=UTF8&amp;qid=1442601028&amp;sr=1-1&amp;keywords=war+of+the+ancients+trilogy). At that point, you've read all the essentials of the pre-WoW/current WoW material.  All the books past there can really be connected to specific events in the game (in which case, see the list on the thread I linked earlier.&gt; In terms of the trade between the individuals, they didn't do anything wrong.

Yes, they did. They purchased an account. that is not allowed. 

[Read the Terms of Use](http://us.blizzard.com/en-us/company/legal/wow_tou.html)

"**Ownership/Selling of the Account or Virtual Items.**

*Blizzard does not recognize the transfer of World of Warcraft Accounts or BNET Accounts (each an "Account"). You may not purchase, sell, gift or trade any Account, or offer to purchase, sell, gift or trade any Account, and any such attempt shall be None and void.*"

The person who bought the account was violating this. Even if it was given to him, or "traded" to him, he's violated the Terms of Use.I'm not seeing the point you are making? What do you mean?

The OP asked if they should report the person who bought the account, you said they shouldn't because they did nothing wrong.  They *did* do something wrong - they bought an account.  Regardless of from whom they bought it from, they bought an account, which is not allowed, therefore they did something wrong.

What does it matter who they thought they bought it from, or if they were doing anything wrong between them and the "wife."  They were purchasing an account against the rules.Exactly what /u/d3s4hype said - Embers *are* your resource. The difference between a good destro lock and everyone else is properly managing your embers. Some will simply build up to four them spam them down, but rocking your chaos bolts or Shadowburns when you have the right procs, knowing when it's OK to burn a chaos bolt or wait for Havoc to be up, etc, is what sets the good apart from the rest.Because they purchased an account and he thought that reporting them for that would help them get the account back. I guess I was thinking that the OP was asking if reporting the purchaser would be a valid way of getting the account back.  

I wouldn't say that "cheating" the buyer would be a douche move - if I found out anyone in the game had bought their account, I'd report them even if I wasn't involved. It's the same problem as buying gold from third party sites - there are *some*legitimate sales/trades out there, but for every legit person selling their account, there's dozens of stolen accounts being sold.  Perpetuating the sale of accounts only keeps the problem going.

(this, of course, assuming the "wife" really did sell it, and not the OP, if the OP did sell it himself and then is wanting to report the guy, that **is** a douche move)Gotcha, that makes a lot more sense :)It's largely going to depend on how easy gold is to make in Legion.  I think prices are going up on tokens right now because people aren't needing the gold (and therefore there isn't a large supply of people buying tokens off the store).  If we find ourselves in Legion without the easy money making we are finding in WoD, you'll get a lot of people who are now used to the lifestyle of "I have all the gold I want" suddenly sapping through their stores.

That, and you'll likely see a lot of people needing to buy mats if they dumped their gathering profs due to the garrison and we find gathering needed again in WoD... those people will be more likely to need to buy gold.Heroics.  

Seriously, you get like 200 your first time running a random and 50 (I think?) for each one after.Very much this. In fact, I would even recommend hopping back on your level 100 alliance and doing it with him/her so when your new Horde hits 90, you can fly in Draenor right away.

Past there, I would say download the Storyline addon. I'm leveling my first Alliance toon and have found it really forces me to slow down on quests and read the quests. My only complaint is people that have long dialogues when I talk to them before I can select the quest and turning in multiple quests at once... but besides that, it's been great for helping me really experience leveling on my newest toon.To be fair, I did say "something like 10k" :-PPeople are downvote happy in this sub. I agree with you :)This was in LFR, so you don't typically get that in LFR. If it was an organized group, absolutely...  

However, in LFR, my experience as a healer has been "heal anyone in range."  I know on that particular fight, I was in range of healers constantly (I always keep healers in range in case I need to pull out my moth and rez one during a fight)This is the basic guide: [Draenor Pathfinder Guide](http://www.wowhead.com/guides/achievements/draenor-pathfinder-how-to-unlock-flying-in-draenor)

For the treasures, easiest thing to do is download two addons: HandyNotes and the HandyNotes Draenor Treasures extension.  That will put up icons for all the treasures on you map so you can see exactly where they are. It will also tell you what they are (great for if you need specific gear while leveling, or are looking for resources, etc) and will show you rares. If you have TomTom, you can select a treasure and get a waypoint arrow for it to help get it.  It won't give you location as far as up/down, but most of the treasures that are hidden (like in caves) have notes on the icons telling you where they are.

edit: link formattingIf you do the garrison campaign and the legendary in time with everything, the process was a lot smoother.  It wasn't just that we took out their weapons plant.  We've stopped them at every turn. We took out their ogre allies, we've killed all their warlords, we've stopped their plants to release a Breaker... over and over they failed at their plans. Then, at the end of the Legendary questline for BrF, Gul'dan (who had been trying to convert the orcs to the Legion since he failed in the intro cinematic), arrives and calls out Grommash for his failures, encases him in magic, and Kilrogg drinks the blood.  

It wasn't as much "he shows up out of the blue" as much as "Gul'dan uses our many wins to take control.Except that sets your favorites account wide.  What if I don't like using certain mounts on certain characters, either because it doesn't fit the class or (more importantly) it looks dumb on the race?  Have you ever seen a tauren or troll on a nether-ray? The look ridiculous.  

I'm not sure on GoGoMount, but I use CollectMe and you can set your favorites per character instead of per account.

Edit: spelling a hurdI know others have mentioned the in-game Favorites/Favorite macro button. I personally hate it because it is account wide (I like to look right for my class and race).

I personally use the addon "CollectMe".

It let's you set mount favorites *per character*, so if you don't like your troll riding a netherray because it looks dumb, you don't have to.  It has a "random mount macro" button it can create for you that will select any random mount of your choosing. It automatically chooses a flying mount if you can fly and a ground mount if you cannot (and you can set it to pick a flying mount if you are in the water so you can fly out, or keep it a ground mount).

It also does pet stuff, but I mainly use it for mounts.I can't find the think, but it was answered at some point... it's because the mount that you summon is attached to a specific faction (i.e. it's different if you are alliance or horde), so in order to use it, you have to have a faction.  Has something to do with the code for the mount and it's connection to the specific faction.I don't think I would call it lazy. To make a reskin of a mount for a whopping 12 levels (really, less than that, since if you have the mount, you likely have all the heirloom gear and will get out of there before 12 levels as it is).  If there were more "faction neutral" starting areas, it would make more sense, but it doesn't seem like a good usage of time to design a faction-less mount for just those few levels for that one single race.You're talking about something they added in, not like they took something away.  You'd have an argument here if they had originally added in the mount to pandaren, then decided that it didn't fit and took it away.

Before: No one could level 1-20 with a mount.

After: Pandaren still cannot level 1-12-ish with a mount.

And again, it wasn't excluded from Pandaren because of the leveling experience for Pandaren, or because of the Wandering Isle. It's because the mount that gets summoned is a faction specific mount. You don't have a faction yet.  You'd have the same problem if you pulled a neutral panda experience and got to level 20, were able to buy mount training... you wouldn't be able to mount any faction specific mounts.I completely agree. But your prior statement had nothing to do with that, though, it was commenting on Archimonde's appearance seeming sudden.

I completely agree us just fighting and cheering alongside Grom is crap.  But the events leading up to Gul'dan taking over and HfC and the arrival and fighting of Archimonde I feel were played out quite well.So did MoP, and Cata, and even the glorified Wrath.  Every expansion has had salty people that hate this or hate that for  whatever reason.  Am I saying WoD didn't disappoint people? No, I'm not. But's that's the trend. 

There's also a lot of people (and I'm sure I'll get downvoted for not joining the circle jerk of hate about WoD) that have enjoyed the expansion (see DrEskimo's post just below this one as one example), as there have been a lot of people that enjoyed MoP, Cata, and Wrath. 

What's natural is to actually think for yourselves. People came back to WoD thinking it was going to be some massive and drastic change from what we'd had, but the game has remained essentially unchanged in its core for years and years. To fly back thinking "this is going to be amazing and new" is naive. To look at Legion as a realist and think "Am I going to enjoy these features?" is what people should do.I said early in the expansion that I never thought the Iron Horde was the True threat.   I thought it was going to be Gul'dan, and the Iron Horde was there to essentially get us to Draenor. I was right :-P

I don't think Grommosh was ever *actually* intended to be the final boss (I think they said that for the hype).  It's even alluded to at the start of the Legendary line when Khadgar tells you that Gul'dan is the most dangerous thing he's ever encountered.

Also, I'm totally going to steal "My spiky red fist of justice" because that was awesome.This has been a problem in every expansion, though.  I mained a warlock through T6 raiding in TBC, but she was benched in Wrath because they had killed Affliction, which was my preferred spec as our malediction lock in TBC.  Then in Cata I tried destro and they had made it so clunky it wasn't fun anymore.  I didn't enjoy the lock again until MoP, and it was the first character I made, my first max toon, my RAIDER. 

Felt the same thing on my paladin. I was a tank/healer in TBC, Wrath, and Cata and LOVED it, then MoP came out and I hated the changes to tanking so much I just couldn't play him.

Every expansion, there seems to be classes I love and classes I hate playing (I'm lucky that I have all 11 at max level). I don't think you can blame WoD for that, but the fact that they are trying to change the game and classes so you don't feel like you're doing the same thing you were doing 10 years ago. Sometimes, those changes will go over well for you, sometimes they won't.&gt; Most disappointing thing is the lack of people to play with

I felt that way, largely due to most of my guild being gone (Can't blame WoD, they left during MoP, came back briefly then left again).

Then I made a new toon on a new server. I joined one of those "social guilds" that spam invite anyone.  Turns out, they are a lot of fun, very social, and like to do stuff together.  I've actually enjoyed leveling on that toon more than I did on my 11 toons on my main server.The cycles themselves are different, not just the driver.Kind of... I've seen each one of those classes run different talent setups. I mean, sure, on mythic they're going to only use the ideal talents for the fight (but that was the case in older talent trees as well).  They all seem quite different to me when you have a shaman dropping a storm elemental and one having lava blobs fly out of their totem, a warrior throwing a ravager down versus one that doesn't... a lock dropping a cataclysm versus one with their doomguard... or one using a doomguard and summoning a second one vs one using their terrorguard (or whatever the "better" version is called, I usually go Grim-Serv).My bad, knew that didn't sound right. Meant a *Breaker*, the Magnaron they rez during the Garrison questline.

Edited :)&gt; I disagree that tank is higher skillcap, the fights are different from a tank POV, but not necessarily higher skill

Generally, people that feel like tanks are a higher skill cap are going all the way back to Vanilla and *maybe* TBC (excluding paladins). Back then, having a tank that could generate threat fast enough to not neuter DPS while still staying alive, and being able to to tank swaps (when you couldn't taunt swap) was a really big deal.  It was hard to find a good tank, and harder to keep one.  

I've been tanking on and off since TBC, and it's gotten progressively easier.  The only real difficulty of being a tank over DPS or heals is that often times as the tank, one small mistake can wipe the entire group.  For DPS and to a lesser extent heals, that kind of pressure only really exists in mythic.It's been a long time for me for Worgen, but I thought they just got thrown into the Nelf areas once they were done with their intro zone?  I still LOVE their intro zone, though!

Forsaken, OH YEAH.From the ones that I've done:

Horde side:

Forsaken&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;Blood Elf&gt;&gt;&gt;Goblin&gt;Troll=Orc&gt;Tauren.  I just HATE the tauren starting zone. 

I've not done all the alliance, but those that I have done:

Worgen&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;&gt;Night Elf&gt;Gnome&gt;Draenei.  

Reason for Forsaken - it has a very detailed storyline that continues through their first two zones, and part of it picks back up in later zones (Western Plaguelands) and a dungeon (Scholomance).  Their third zone (Hillsbrad) is VERY unique in that you "become" a quest giver and meet stereotypical NPCs representing types of players (The Elitists, the Dumass, and the Heirloom guy), then you quest around finding them in trouble.  It's all in all a wonderful story.

Reason for the Worgen - Very unique starting area and really gets you to understand why the Worgen came back into the Alliance when they did.  It's a LOT of fun, IMHO, and it compliments the Forsaken story as you see the "other side" of it.&gt; This is where the two timelines split. 

Not to be nitpicky, because that was a great post, but it's not exactly a "timeline split" right there.  There are other differences in the two worlds... for example, Garrosh had been born in our universe, but he was never born in AU. Same with Maraad - though not explicitly state, the fact that no one recognizes him despite how much he did in our universe (he had been around as a Vindicator in Shadowmoon Valley and in their travels before that in our universe) indicates that he either never existed or died very young in the alternate Draenor.  When Kairoz brings Garrosh to Draneor, he says it is not exactly a copy, but was close to it - perfect for what he needed to create his army.&gt; Defeating Archimonde on Heroic difficulty or higher will reward players with a mysterious fragment of dark power that begins a quest which will lead to the Grove Warden mount.

One thing I wasn't sure - is it everyone gets it, or just one drop per group? Or personal loot chance type thing?I'm not sure your point.  I'm *agreeing* with you.  I'm saying that when people usually talk about tanks requiring more skill, it's usually because they're thinking back to the days when that *was* True.  Key operative there: WAS.  Back in Vanilla/TBC, they did require more skill to be good.  And no, that's not my "opinion," that's something that is and was talked about a lot... heck, just recently Preach had a long video about threat and tanking and the "old days" I'd recommend watching. 

But I'm saying that was *then*, and that tanking has gotten easier *since then*. I think they changed that (don't quote me on that) back in Cata.Make the regular mount a "casted" mount, keep the temp broom as instant.

I like it not just because of the instant cast, but it's a lot cleaner looking and because if I'm out searching for stuff it doesn't take much screen. the closest I have to that is the cloud from Lorewalkers.Well, you'll need your garrison at level 3, at least, and your shipyard in order to truly progress in PvE.

The short answer is this: Do Proving Grounds to get access to queuing for heroic 5-mans in whatever roles you want to play. You need Silver to queue.  Level up your garrison to level 3, get the quest to go to Tanaan. Start doing Tanaan stuff for Baleful gear. Baleful gear is default 650 ilvl and has a chance up upgrading to 675 ilvl (and  695 with the next patch).  While doing that, you'll want to start your legendary questline (which requires 4 specific heroics 5-mans to do).  You can start queuing for those when your ilvl is 610. At 615, you can start queuing for LFR (Highmaul), then there is LFR (BrF) and LFR (HfC).  HfC drops 675-685 gear.  

If you want to be a real raider, you'll want to find a guild, but you'll need one that is OK with accepting lower geared people and is working on Normal HfC if you want a shot, because otherwise you'll be way behind the curve.

If you don't care about real raiding, then LFR is just fine.God I hope so... I had no plans of doing real raiding in WoD, but I want that mount.You literally don't have to do anything else in your garrison other than upgrade it to level 3.  You can even ignore doing the shipyard if you don't care about getting the legendary.They said the best option is going to be mythic 5-mans as they will drop more.  Your best bet will be to do those. If you are in a mythic guild already, the easiest thing will be organized mythic nights.  You'll have two groups already set up between the tanks and healers in your raid, and you likely have at least two other DPS that can dual spec into tanking if they aren't already doing so for the other two groups.&gt; On a positive note, outside of Cata, once we move on people suddenly talk about the things they love.

I even see people talking about missing Cata (and saw it a LOT during MoP)

&gt; I don't remember horrific rage at everything in Classic or BC (Maybe epics being more available in BC but even then they where still hard to come by without doing tons of farming of heroics at least). 

Biggest two things I can remember:

At the start, there was a lot of rage at how quickly raid gear was obsolete.  Especially the T3 raiders were pissed that their *very* hard earned epics from Naxx were being replaced by questing gear in HfC.

Then, "welfare epics" were the big complaint. It wasn't the badge gear, though, it was the PvP gear. A lot of people would get PvP gear to go raid because it was easier to acquire than actual PvE gear with the correct stats. As long as you weren't a tank trying to tank with resilience instead of defense, it worked for getting into T4.I did, I'll need to give it another shot, though... I was doing an RAF with my wife, so I'm pretty sure I missed a lot of it.&gt; Quest gear in HFC wasn't replacing Naxx gear. In a few slots it was replacing T2 stuff from BWL. But Naxx gear lasted nearly till KZ if you had a full set. I remember a lot of the rage about that, but it was more the guys who stopped raiding at MC or only got partway into BWL.

Maybe it was just that, I started shortly after TBC dropped, so I didn't talk to a lot, I just remember people talking about how it felt, and then remember the comparisons in Wrath, where the world first clears of Naxx, EoE, and Sarth were done in T6 gear.

&gt; I still don't think I've ever seen anyone talk about how much they liked Cata. But I didn't play MOP till it'd been out a few months.

It was there, started seeing "I Miss Cata" posts not long after MoP dropped, especially people complaining about dungeon difficulty (or lack thereof) in MoP - more proof of "players don't know what they want."  I ran across it a bunch when I was doing some online research recently trying to find some posts about hatred of Wrath (too bad most of those were on the "old" forums, so they can't be found anymore).Ha, just did some quick online searching out of curiosity, found some great threads.

[Guy complaining about replacing his T2 and T3 gear mid 60's in TBC](http://arstechnica.com/civis/viewtopic.php?f=20&amp;t=259911)

[Some discussion over replacing Vanilla gear](http://www.dslreports.com/forum/r17648129-question-about-Naxx-gear-in-TBC). I especially love them talking about stupid players in Ramparts not using CC or breaking CC. LOL!

[A real good post helping people figure out which gear they will replace quickly in TBC](http://www.dslreports.com/forum/r17588881-Loot-info-and-other-Junk-in-TBC)

I found some others, but can't access them here and too lazy to type them out.  General consensus seems to be T1 geared players would start replacing their gear with blues in early 60's (HFC), T2 in mid-60s, and T3 with level 70 blues, which some exceptions for enchanted things if you didn't have a better enchant yet (and probably certain set bonuses).

Overall, it seems from what I'm coming across that the complaints seemed two fold:

Complaint 1) I can't believe that T3 geared players will have such an advantage!  They are going to be able to zoom to 70 and get into endgame so much faster because they won't have any gear issues! That's unfair!

Complaint 2) I can't believe I'm going to be replacing my purples with greens and blues so fast! All that work for nothing!!!Kind of... in our Universe, he feels regret that he basically condemned the Orcs not once, but twice to the curse of Mannoroth's blood. In this one, he truly felt like everything he was doing was the "right" thing.

But even if I take your premise: that him turning ally makes sense for his character... it doesn't make sense to me that everyone else would accept that.  Yrel watched her mentor and the leader of her people die to protect her people from the Dark Star unleashed by Nerzhul to destroy Karabor at the behest of Grom. She watched her friend in battle, Maraad, die to save her from Blackhand, who was attacking Shattrath at the behest of Nerzhul. On the Horde side, we battled Thunderlords and had to kill the brother of Durotan due to his following of Grom. Both orc and draenei were being killed to fuel to portal at the behest of Grom.  Over and over again, lots of people have died because of Grom's conquest.

And then Gul'dan turns, he says "j/k all, I want to help you kill the Legion" and we're like "yeah, ok, i'm good with that!"

Even if they had put in a cut scene or something showing a fight break out between him and Yrel after we "rescue" him, or before Archimonde's fight... where she reluctantly agrees to let him fight (maybe seeing a vision of Velen telling her how important forgiveness is to the Light, since he of all people would offer that forgiveness), or something... but instead it's just "oh, he's here, and he's fighting with us, despite everything he did before."

Don't get me wrong, I love most of WoD's story (I'm not in the circle of WoD haters), but that one aspect kind of annoyed me.Or, I don't know, on your non-raid nights?  That's what we always did in past expansions...  I mean, isn't the main complaint in WoD the lack of things to do outside of raiding?With one exception: anything that multiple people were eligible for in a cross server raid/party can still be traded.  For example, you are running a raid, and let's say it's set up as need before greed (rather than ML or personal loot). You need on it, but then realize that you didn't mean to need on it. You can still trade that to someone else who was eligible in the raid. You can't trade random items or items you had prior to the raid or anything.

Tagging /u/ctwilson123 so you see it.The point wasn't that he got the mount. It's that he got the mount after saying "I'm going to be mad if that mount drops instead of the other."  If you don't like it, then just move on to another thread.There's been lots of good advice, but I'll give my own:

EDIT: Most of these are what I would consider "passive" gold options. In other words, they focus on as little AH work as possible. They also assume you are getting your ore/herb from your garrison, not buying it off the AH.

**SMALL BUILDING**

* Salvage Yard (Level 3): While it is nerfed from the launch version, even just vendoring the lower level greens and D/Eing the higher level greens/blues will get you a great influx of gold.

* JC Hut (level 2): Unless you *really* need a crafting hut for your actual profession, get the JC hut and put a follower in there. The daily quest gives around 250g.

* Third building can be anything. I prefer a bank for ease purposes, but you can also go to the Ashran bank, so it's not mandatory

* EDIT: Was pointed out that enchanting hut and alchemy station are also great ideas, since the items you get for work orders can be sold on the AH.  Enchanting hut pairs really well with the salvage yard. If you do the alchemy station, make sure you put a follower in the herb garden and set the herb garden to grow just Frostweed until you have a nice base built up.

* EDIT2: I've been told that the JC hut doesn't always give that much, I cannot confirm that, but just warning. It *is* only worth it if you are supplying your own ore, in my opinion, so if you have to buy the ore for the daily quest, the other options are probably worth it.  

* EDIT3: Others have pointed out the Inscription hut as well. I've not personally used it, but if you read some of the responses, it can apparently also give good passive gold. 

**MEDIUM BUILDING**

* Inn (level 3): Use this to recruit followers with the gold finder ability. I also like having a couple with greasemonkey (extra oil for the shipyard) and salvagers (extra garrison resources).  Level 3 gives treasure hunter missions.

* Trading Post: This does two things - First, it lets you get more resources so you never run low (especially useful for the shipyard). Second, you can trade in garrison resources for mats. Those mats can be used for the JC daily, cooking, and most importantly for AH selling.  Pay attention to how prices fluctuate. You don't want to buy the mats that are selling for 10 resources, wait until they are low (I think 4 is the smallest).

* *Optional* Instead of trading post, you can get a barn (level 3). Savage bloods and leather/fur still sell quite well, but that does require you to go farm the animals. That can be difficult as a fresh 100 and takes some time.

**LARGE BUILDING**

* Barracks (level 3): Provides additional 5 followers. This is important for all the missions you'll be using for gold.

* War Mill/Dwarven Bunker (level 2 or 3): Easy way to get follower upgrade tokens to upgrade your followers faster. In addition, it's a free extra roll token at level 3 once per week.  Can be replaced if you aren't raiding after you get all 25 followers at ilvl 675.

* *Optional* Stables (level 2): If you have a gathering profession, allows you to gather without dismounting, greatly speeding up the gathering. 

* Edit: Other option if you don't need war mill/dwarven bunker is the Mage Tower/Spirit Tower. This provides portals to other areas and can let you submit work orders (requires farming ogres) that can potentially give instant mission completion.

**PROCESS**

First priority is to get your followers leveled up and geared up.  For leveling, just make sure you *always* send them on missions, they'll get XP even if they fail.  You'll get garrison missions to get the Hearthstone guide, which increases XP. Use that on "environmental" traits, since those are largely worthless.  Once you get Harrison (see below), put Hearthstone on him and he can power level people fast.  For gearing, the easiest way is to buy the "Frozen Arms of the Hero" off the AH, if they are cheap. That raises their ilvl by 50 (both armor and weapon). Otherwise, there's a person in your main building that will sell tokens for ilvl 645 (500g for weapon and 500g for armor). My recommendation is to work on two or three at a time so you don't buy too many at once.  You *can* get 645 tokens from the war mill/bunker.

Now, start doing garrison missions.  With the level 3 inn, you'll get a lot of treasure missions. Focus on those first, then garrison resources second (until you get capped), then anything you can sell.  Once your follower/your ilvl gets high enough (I think 675, but don't quote me on that), you'll start getting rare missions. Those can drop items that sell really well. The aforementioned follower gear tokens, PvP points tokens, honor tokens, a mount, a pet. Unless you really want them for yourself, sell those on the AH.

While you are doing this, try to find the Harrison Jones missions everyday until you get Harrison Jones (you only have to do each mission once to get him, so if you've done the one offered that day, then don't do it again unless you just want to). Harrison Jones has a great trait where anyone on his team will be boosted to his level/ilvl. This helps with leveling as you can send a level 90 on a level 100 mission with him and they'll get XP for a level 100, boosting them SUPER fast. He also always has treasure hunter, so he fits the treasure hunting need.  If you're trying to focus on leveling someone, and you're using the addons listed below, you can set the person you want to focus on, then sort by highest follower XP (it'll *always* put that person in the group if you set them as the focus), then select a group comp with that follower, Harrison, and whoever else can counter. 

I also recommend doing the Tanaan Garrison campaign. Even if you don't plan on doing any of Tanaan past there, it gives you a follower with a "hard counter" trait (similar to Garona if you've done the Legendary), which will make countering harder missions a LOT easier.

This alone will keep the gold flowing. There's lots of other things you can do, like the shipyard, but that will get you started just fine with little/minimal work outside the garrison.

**OTHER GOLD MAKING THINGS**

Even if you don't need it, do Kazzak once a week. He guarantees felblight drops. While they don't sell as well as they used to, they still bring in a decent amount.  I personally wait until I get a stack before I sell them, but that's personal preference, it just feels better to get a large chunk at once.

**ADDONS**

For this method, there's really only a few addons you need:

* Garrison Mission Manager / Master Plan - I don't know which does which, but I have both. They will help you with setting up your missions so you don't have to search around to find which followers to use. It will let you see which followers to use for max gold/resources (and even XP if you're still leveling them).

* Some sort of auction addon. I use auctioneer, but there's many out there. Just to help you sell your stuff easier.

Edit: Made some changes based on some other responses.

Edit2: Made some additional changes based on other comments. Keep them coming, this can be a great resource for people!Send them on missions, even if they won't succeed (obviously, try to send them on successful missions first), they still get XP for failures.  If you do the addons, you can set an option to prioritize follower XP or XP per hour (depending on if you are setting them and leaving or will still be playing).  Also, Harrison Jones is vital, as well as using the training guide you'll get form garrison missions to increase XP from missions.All great ideas as well. Hadn't thought of the mage tower, but that's a great idea if you don't have a gatherer. I have lots of gatherers, so being able to fly around Tanaan gathering without dismounting is awesome.  What I like about the trading post is the ability to buy mats for either use or sale. Especially if you're on a fresh server and don't have a stock built up yet, it can really help.Agreed!If you have some gold, you can buy the ogre cache's from the AH (1k resources). Run a random heroic once a day for 200, there's also the daily quest from Saurfang/Alliance Equiv (can't remember the dwarf's name).  But easiest to start up is simply going around every zone and killing every rare and picking up every treasure.For Ariok, I think it's Kilrogg on Normal or above. I couldn't get him defeating LFR, but could on Normal.If you purchase the Frozen Arms off the AH, it's optional. Depends on your starting capital. 1000g will upgrade your follower to 645 via the vendor in the garrison, then the Frozen Arms token will bring it to 674. Conversely, you can simply use the Frozen Arms to get to 650, then use the Salvage yard upgrade tokens from there.I've not done the math myself, but it seems to be.Epic mount is great if you're logging in multiple times a day. For me, I have 12 alts, so I only hit the garrison once a day per toon, so epic mount is a wasted ability for me.Just making sure for clarification for people :)If you're still leveling the profession or consistently needing items, having those work orders can be very important.  For example, since I'm not raiding, I'm trying to upgrade all my crafted pieces to full 6/6. That takes a LOT of items. If I'm just doing my daily CD, that's going to take a ton of time.

You also have things like engineers wanting to have access to Walter (if they don't have jeeves), or being able to make the LW huts, etc.I had no idea until recently. I thought they were BoA and was saving them on an alt for if I ever got new followers on someone.&gt; You're trying to make a point here, and I do appreciate that, but people that know their stat priority also know enough of the game that they can deduce that 20 higher fucking ilvls of your shitty stats is better than BiS stats.

Not necessarily. There have been plenty of people posting both here and in the official forums since WoD came out about "how certain stats were so bad that it's better to have something 20 ilvls below" etc etc.  Elemental shamans who think that if it doesn't have multistrike it's worthless. Combat rogues who think if it doesn't have haste it's worthless. Etc etc.  

There are people who go and read the guides, like Icy Veins, and they'll see the stat breakdown. They'll see the order of the stats and think "It MUST have stat #1, it CAN have stat #2, it CANNOT have stat #5."  Then they'll pass on that piece of gear 20 ilvls higher because it has stat 5 and not stat 1.Exactly my point. People will see the priority, but not know the weights, so they'll think Versatility is useless, not "just not as good as the others, but still pretty good."True, but you can also just visit someone's garrison for your disenchanting needs.So for you, you don't need the crafting huts. That's why I specified "unless you really need a crafting hut," and didn't put one in as "mandatory."

I got rid of my forge and only have the enchanting table on two toons now (both are my enchanters, and one is still leveling enchanting).  Most of my toons now run bank/salvage yard and the third is either JC for the free gold, engineering for Walter on my non-engineers, or alchemy for the free DPS potions.&gt; dying is more of a DPS loss than having a relatively less good stat.

I wish all the people who stand in the fire because they'll have to stop DPSing to move would learn that!Wrathion basically engineered the whole thing, but Kairoz doesn't directly work for him.  Wrathion basically used him in the same way he was using the Horde and Alliance in MoP.  Everything he does is ultimately to fight the Legion.&gt; Usually gives 100-175 on average, sometimes as little as 50g after the cost of the ore required for the quest. Simply not worth a small building slot anymore in my opinion.

I've never had it give under 200, not saying you're wrong, just my experience. I don't ever count the cost of the ore since I'm going with the assumption of having run the mine every day and having an excessive amount.

&gt; Harrison Jones has the TH trait 100% of the time.

Thanks, wasn't sure there. Didn't want to say it was 100% since I hadn't paid attention :)What /u/Lama121 said. In *War Crimes*, Wrathion fully admits his role in everything.I'm not really sure, to be honest. I've been steadily leveling them since the xpac launched, and the one I have on a fresh server I only really log in to once a week.Thanks! I only have one max level Alliance, so I'd forgotten.That's not really why people love the WoD dungeon event, it's for the gear cache after you do the mythics.I like dropping a blingtron in a starting area with lots of toons running around. The amount that most of the trash sells for is a huge boon for starting players.It might be the type of thing where they have to manually add dropped items. Would work similar to how transmog works now - if you try to transmog an item within that 2 hour trading window, it'll warn you that it makes it non-tradeable. Same thing with purchased gear (like from Timewalking badges).Not really. If it wasn't like this, then people with plate users would *always* have an advantage. 

Your example is a person playing 3 clothis able to get a full set in a week.

If I had three plate users, I could run through an old raid a few times and get a whole set for *any* class, not just my plate classes. This prevents that. It was a distinct advantage for plate users for farming transmog.That's specifically what they are saying will not happen. It has to be your primary gear type.  So, with the update, if I run a raid on my warrior, I will only unlock transmog for my warrior/paladin/DK, if I run on my hunter, only for my hunter/shaman; etc etc.  It's basically what we have now, only it will unlock for all characters, so where before only my warrior would get that shield transmog unlocked, now my warrior/paladin/DK will get it, but I'll still have to go back in on one of my cloth users if I want to get transmog for a cloth user.I can't access the sites due to being at work, so I apologize now if this is something that you address.  

My only issue with the multiboxer debate is that many of us, me included, use multiboxing casually and without hindering other players.  I typically use it so I can use RaF to level two toons at the same time. If I do any type of group content (not including with my IRL friends), I am either running as tank/healer and have very good macros set up to keep everyone alive without problem, or I am duoing DPS and not holding the group back.  

I understand the issues in PvP (some of which they have partially fixed by disabling things like /follow in BGs, unless that change was reverted), but having restrictions on multiboxing punishes people like me who do nothing that would be a hindrance for other players.Johnny even has heirloom boots and belt and gloves... stuff you can't even get. OBVIOUSLY!Your title and your post are not the same.

I don't want them to lower the price, it deters willy nilly transfers.

What I **do** want them to do is have a sale. If, *for a short time*, they dropped the price or offered bulk discounts, for people that have been wanting to change but cannot afford it.

There's a big difference between a sale and a price reduction. Reducing the price just gives people incentive to just move servers whenever they are not satisfied. Providing a sale allows people to do it one time.It's possible if it's an alt that they've already picked up Bling on a main. I've done that a few times, do Bling when I'm on my main, but then roll an alt and can't pick him up again.You aren't expected to remain. You have the ability to transfer, but it costs money. Or you have the ability to reroll, but it costs time. I know what he's saying. I'm saying that with the clarification, they're confirming that's not going to be a possibility. It's still a massive upgrade over what we have currently.I wouldn't call it a huge advantage.  Warriors have access to 11 weapon types, rogues and hunters have access to 9, so that only gives them advantage by 2 over them.  Most classes are between 4 and 6 (Mage/Paladin/Priest/Lock-4; Shaman-4; Monk-6).  So yes, they have an advantage, but not a huge one over everyone.  It's fairly balanced for most classes, though. They also already had that advantage, so they aren't getting more of an advantage than they already had.What?  

With the clarification, there is no advantage to plate. A cloth user can only get cloth. A plate user can only get plate. A leather user can only get leather.  That was the point of the clarification. Plate has no advantage.Realm balance and integrity.

I joke. But really, realm balance, to a point, is the reason.  Take WoD's launch as an example. I'm on a medium pop server, we had a ton of people transfer to our server because they didn't want to deal with the crowds of their more crowded server.  That kind of stuff does affect things.  

Also, things like economy.  Being able to transfer at will means I could easily load up toons with all the gold and stuff to sell, move to the new server (especially newer servers), unload all the gold/items, then move back. It can throw economies into turmoil.I get that, your original statement didn't come across as that, so I apologize.

It's a personal thing. I personally think there should still be restrictions on what you can get. I wish they would take away the "equippable but non-usable" weapons (like ranged weapons from rogue/warrior for example).That's why just having sales occasionally would be good. If you really want to transfer, do it, but if you want to eventually transfer, wait for a sale. I don't think they need to lower the price, personally, just that they should offer sales here and there.Incorrect.  

WoW went from 11M to 11.75M right after Wrath launched, then dropped back down to 11.5M in the first quarter of 2009, which it held at until the pre-Cata launch where it went up to 12M.  It wasn't a huge loss, but it was the first loss the game had experienced.

From MMO Datas Blog, which tracked all sub numbers industry wide until 2013:

http://users.telenet.be/mmodata/Charts/Subs-1.png

The sub loss in Wrath happened in the first quarter of 2009, not at the end.

From the MMO Datas Blog, which used to track all subs industry wide until 2013.

http://users.telenet.be/mmodata/Charts/Subs-1.pngDrakes and Algalon?  There you're talking about hard modes.  ICC? The very end of the expansion.

The complaint people had wasn't over the final dungeon, or doing hard modes. It was the end game content for the non-serious raider.  Doing drakes is serious stuff, doing Algalon is serious stuff. That is hard mode stuff that was difficult even for hard core raiders.  However, Naxx, Eoe, Sarth (no drakes)? That stuff was a cakewalk.&gt; The 5mans were harder when no one had any gear

I was AoE festing the 5-mans in Wrath in my T5 gear from TBC.  They were easy from the start, with a few specific exceptions (Loki, the trash after the second boss in OK, the gauntlet in UK).  

&gt; And the only thing that made BC 5 mans hard was because class design and tanking mechanics were broken 

Yes, but that was part of the problem.  They made things like CC irrelevant in Wrath, which made the dungeons boring. Even if things could kill you, you still needed no strategy to beat the instances.  I didn't have trash mobs that I feared the way that I feared some of the trash in TBC heroics.  

&gt; naxx didn't become puggable until people already had naxx gear. You are acting like it was fully cleared in a pug on the 3rd day of the expansion, and that's not True. That and EoE wasn't puggable until Ulduar gear on my server. You had to be certain classes to do 10 man 3D burns until you could super outgear it. 

I had my first naxx clear three weeks into the expansion.  Naxx gear was of equal quality as heroic 5-man gear (all 200 ilvl). I'm not saying it was puggable on day three (though it did only take 2 days for the world first clear of it).  EoE though? There was nothing difficult about that fight.  Sarth?  Yeah, 3D burns couldn't happen up front, but that's Sarth's hardmode  0D kills?  Easily puggable within weeks.  

It really wasn't until Ulduar came out that a raid was added that, without activating hard mode, pugging was problematic. And that was 5 months in.  The T7 stuff was largely not a problem (except, like I had said before, the new people on Sapphiron/Kel and if you did hard modes) within a month after the release, which left another four months of "what do I do now?" There was very minimal gearing up process as we'd had in TBC (which, to be fair, was also easy in comparison to the gearing up needed for Vanilla raiding).  That was the problem a lot of people had with Wrath at launch - where was the sense of progression? When I'm able to do heroics and raids shortly after hitting max level, it doesn't feel like *progress*.  It was when they shifted the progression path away from "gear up while leveing -&gt;Gear up in normals-&gt;Gear up in heroics-&gt;Gear up in raids" to "Hit max level-&gt;Start getting into raids as fast as possible-&gt;Gear up through progression raids."&gt; There was still somewhat of a character progression in Wrath, up into ToC. IN patch 3.3.5, you geared yourself up through the ICC 5 man heroics, a little bit of ToC Pugs, while saving your EoF's for Tier gear if you were a casual player. 

But here, once again, you're talking about how the expansion was much later in the expansion.  At launch? That wasn't the same. Hell, Naxx10 gear was the *same ilvl* as heroic 5-man gear.  The only benefit of Naxx10 gear over heroic gear was tier gear.  

They made the model better as the expansion went on, but there was a lot of issues before that.  Even when Ulduar came out, which was 5 months in, it didn't come with anything additional for the non-progression raider.  It took nine months for that to happen (with ToC's release).  Imagine having done 9 months of WoD with only heroics and Highmaul as options if you weren't a True raider... and have Highmaul drop gear that was of equal quality as the heroic gear.

ToC started to make things better, with a new and difficult 5-man (which dropped gear better than what you could get before)... and then ICC was done extremely well with 3 new dungeons that had normal modes that were difficult, even.  By the time of ICC, there were a lot of progression paths for the non-raider, along with catch up mechanics for the raider. But that was at the end, not the beginning.  That didn't come until 13 months into the expansion.Gotcha.  I have 12 toons, so I tend to only get on one once per day, so faster doesn't benefit me nearly as much, but I get that :)[Actually no, sub numbers went up to 11.75M when the expansion launched, then dropped to 11.5M in the first quarter, THEN plateaued before spiking up to 12M in the pre-Cata patch then dropping again.](http://users.telenet.be/mmodata/Charts/Subs-1.png)We're talking two different things.  I was talking about T7 for the pugs, of which I had no issues with, in pugs, except for hardmodes (like 1, 2, or 3D) and Sapp/KT if people had never done it.  With Ulduar, I said I was in a guild group, but we were a rather casual guild and had no issues until Yogg himself.&gt; The only gear that came out of 5 man heroics that was ilvl 200 was the epics that dropped off the final boss. 

Go back and look again.  The blues that dropped from heroic 5-mans was also ilvl 200.  

&gt; And if it was easy as you claim it was, everyone would have had undying and immortal titles by the time Ulduar came out, but that was saved for better Raiders.

You're making a HUGE gap between the hardest achievement in the raid and "not failing."  I never claimed people didn't die, or wipes didn't happen.  Of course they did, that happened in Kara too. Hell, that happens in LFR and I don't think anyone would try to argue that LFR in WoD is harder than Naxx was.  But pugging and clearing the entire place? Absolutely.  

&gt; Wg was also fun as hell. 

If you enjoy PvP at all. I, personally, hate PvP in all iterations. I hated WG, but not due to how it was itself, but due to requiring winning WG to get into VoA.

&gt; And what has changed? You have always gone from. Heroics to raids, nothing has changed at all.

Even before 6.2, you could bypass heroics altogether.  Hit 100, get some crafted pieces and maybe a BoA, and hop right into LFR.  I'm not saying that's a good progress path, but the path *has* changed.  At least in Wrath, there was a purpose to running heroics even late in the expansion: Badges. You needed badges to get the catch up gear pieces, and the quickest way to get badges was running heroics (especially after they introduced LFD).

&gt; I'm not saying the game was even hard it's not a difficulty issue, I just know that everyone I played with had fun having shit tons of stuff to do for an entire expansion.

There was a lot to do, and I've never claimed otherwise.  *However*, the difficulty issue was a problem.  For many people in TBC, raiding was not the path they wanted to take. Maybe the occasional Kara run, but that was it.  If Blizzards statements are to be believed, a small percentage of the playerbase saw Sunwell beyond the trash at the beginning.  For the average, non-raider in TBC, heroics were *the* end-game content.  You had dailies and you had heroics. But the heroics were challenging and took time to complete, it wasn't uncommon to have a heroic take over an hour (and one of the heroic challenges for the questline/title was managing *to* complete it in under an hour, and that was after the first boss).  When Wrath came out (not nine months later when ToC came out, but when Wrath came out), the heroics were not challenging.  On my T6 geared toon, I was clearing it the day I hit 80, on my T5 geared toon I was only replacing a few pieces before running them. On my non-raiding toons, I was still AoE-festing heroics within the first month. That left 8 more months of easy-snooze-fest heroics before they brought in a new one that was challenging. *That* was the difficulty problem in Wrath. Not the raids (though we've talked about T7, especially Naxx), but the non-raids.  And I think it was a terrible mistake to bring in the tabards to get rep and make the shoulder (or was it the head?) enchants BoA - it made doing dailies for reputation almost moot.  It was the first time I found myself leveling alts out of boredom (where before my alts were leveled for their professions, to supplement my main).I agree, however I think the badge system was too strong at the start.  The Badges of Heroism, which dropped from heroics, could purchase ilvl 200 gear, which could make Naxx10 gear irrelevant, the Emblems of Valor, which dropped from the raids, purchased 213 gear, which was Naxx25 level.  It was entirely possible to be Naxx10 geared without ever setting foot in there.  

When Ulduar came out, I think the system was in the perfect place.  The prior badges and methods for obtaining those badges were still there, and they added the Conquest badges.  But they didn't make the catch up mechanic present yet, so you still had to run heroics for the 200ilvl badges and T7 for the 213ilvl badges... but you're right - ToC came out and they added in the Triumph badges and made Ulduar/T7/heroics all drop Conquest. At that point, there was *very* few reasons to run T7 or even Ulduar. Yes, you could go for the weapons/trinkets, but it was a better bet to spam heroics to get into ToC.  

Overall, I liked the system before ToC a lot better, but I've not been a fan of "catch up" translating to "skip."  And I definitely liked the TBC/Wrath model of running old stuff for badges to get up to a tier behind the current tier a LOT better than the MoP/WoD model of "go to this place and get free tokens that give you gear to bypass dungeons and prior raids all-together.In a vacuum? Or in comparison to what happened later?  No, a 25k loss is nothing.  But for a game that had seen nothing but increase for four years?  It was a big deal at the time.

Not to mention, Wrath had the record for first day PC sales, beating out even TBC.  While we don't know what the total sales were (I stand corrected from a previous thread on the matter there), you can make a pretty good assumption that the sales didn't stop at day one.  But to set a record like that (and one that held until D3 came out) and only go up by a small percentage, and so much less than the prior expansion, and with the amount of advertisement they did during Wrath (that was during the whole "What's your game?" ad series), to go down at all, and then to plateua for the entire expansion, it was the first time people started decrying the death of the game.  Obviously, it retrospect, it was nothing compared to what would happen in Cata, MoP, and WoD, but it was a huge deal *at the time*.Again, I'm not saying that pugs didn't die, I never did. But I never had a pug that wasn't able to get through the entire place.  There were wipes, absolutely, but falling apart? 

&gt; But pugs weren't full clearing Naxx in week 3 of the expansion.

Some were, but even then, you had 5 months of Naxx. There were plenty full clearing it with little difficulty within a couple of months, leaving a rather long period of time with nothing else.  And that's not even to talk about the poor setup of having the 10 man raids be a lesser difficulty than 25 man raids and what that meant for the average pugger.Ah, good to know. I have an H/P and a P/S, so wouldn't have even thought about that.Yeah, but how they act is as though they've never even seen the race or the history.... and often times conflicts with the "we know who you are, but don't like you" lore they built up...

Like Loremaster Cho - on Horde side when you're doing the quest where to light the incense so he can learn about your history.  If you're Pandaren - 

*Cho:  I would very much like to hear about your ancestors, stranger. Light the incense and let's reflect on where you came from, hm?*

-Now this right here already annoys me.  He *knows* where they came from - the Wandering Isle. Or you'd think he knows.  He would at least know that they were Pandaren, maybe wonder how they got caught up with this "Horde," at a minimum, but not be looking at them like complete strangers.

After lighting the incense: 

*Cho: Ah, but you're no stranger to your past! A Pandaren from the Wandering Isle. I admit, I thought your homeland was just a legend. Pandaren from the Isle are far more adventurous than those on the mainland... it's in your blood!*

-This annoys me even more. 

First off, he's a LOREMASTER.  He would not think the Wandering Isle was just a legend. He knows very well that the stories are based in truth.  Secondary (and this part, I'm not sure of), it hasn't been *that* terribly long since the Isle last came to Pandaria.

But finally, and this is the big one, others seem to know about the Wandering Isle.  I know, at least, in *Vol'jin:Shadow of the Horde*, there are statements that infer this, from Chen talking to Vol'jin:

*Most pandaren from here see pandaren who gre up on Shen-zin Su as 'wild dogs.'  We look like them, sound like them, smell like them, but we're different.*

He's talking there about the Chiang Sisters, who claimed to be old enough to remember when Liu Lang first departed from Pandaria.  Granted, they were probably lying, but it's clear that they know of the Isle and the people on it, as did many others.  So, to have a Loremaster seem baffled that the Wandering Isle was real just was off.
Sword-Chucks - Almost as deadly to the opponent as they are to the wielder.How is no one talking about banks!?!  

I can put this legendary super rare item into a bank in Orgrimmar, then hearth to my garrison in another UNIVERSE and there it is. 

WHAT IS THIS MAGIC?!?

I mean, at least the Void Storage is explained as some sort of interdimensional storage... but the regular bank?I think the issue I have is the number of times you find instances of Pandaria Pandaren already having pre-disposed biases against Isle Pandaren.  It really came out in Vol'jin's book, since Chen and LiLi spend a lot of time fighting (or in Li Li's case, embracing) the stereotype.  Had it just been people thinking it was a legend, it wouldn't bother me, but to have someone like Cho say he thought it was a legend, but then have a statement like Chen's of "Most pandaren from here see pandaren who grew up on Shen-zin Su as 'wild dogs.'", it just doesn't seem to fit. 

Edit: Also, I couldn't really find a timeframe - how long ago Shen-zin Su started going from and stopped coming to Pandaria.  Some of the stories make it seem like it was centuries ago, some not so much.  Like the Chiang sisters in Vol'jin's book claiming to be old enough to have been there when Liu Lang first departed Pandaria and Chen saying he just "didn't know if he could believe that."  If it was thousands of years ago, he would simply laugh it off, but he doubts rather than simply says it's not True.  Obviously, that's just those two, but to even be able to claim any connection to it indicates to me it wasn't *that* long ago when, at least, he stopped coming.

Now I'm going to have to reroll another Pandaren and redo the starting area just to double check if there were any references I missed to the time frame.I can't confirm or not confirm that.  I don't personally recall him mentioning that (and at least on the Horde side, he seems completely dumbfounded at most of the races).  

I know it was just how it was written, and I'm reading too much into it, but I would have liked it if he had said things to certain races to fit Pandaria. Like looking at the Tauren and realizing they greatly resemble the Yaungol, or trolls and realizing they resemble the legends of the Zandalari, that type of thing.That happens on the Alliance side, but it didn't feel like that on the Horde side.  After you defeat Ook Dookem, you go into his cave and drink his tea so he can tell you a bit about Pandarian history... then you follow him to the stones and he tells you some more (and you defeat a Saurok that attacks), then he keeps talking to you as you go to the incense shrine and you light the incense so he can get to know a bit about your history.  If all you're doing is missions and the JC daily, that takes maybe a minute per character, unless you need to moves mats around for the JC daily.  

It takes me an hour to do full garrison on my 12 characters (mining, herbing, all buildings, shipyard, etc). You're probably doing more than them.  I have a spreadsheet (yes, I'm THAT guy) to know when the last time I went around and did actual garrison stuff.  I do "full" garrison once per week, and rotate every three days on going to pick up work orders or do open crates.  

Log in at the table, finish missions. Master Plan makes that super fast.  I have my missions sorted by reward so I can make sure I get all the 675 rewards that sell well first, then gold missions, then Oil missions (unless it's the 150 oil mission and I don't have any good gold missions). With Master Plan, I right click to set tentative parties, then set them all out.  Entire process takes less than a minute.

If I'm on one of my toons with a JC hut, I'll run down and do the daily.  

All my garrisons either have a bank or they are engineers with Jeeves, so I never need to make a trip to the bank. And since I only do "other" garrison things every three days or so, I don't need to worry about opening crates until it's that toons turn.I think people forget this.  If you were to exclude the jump right when any expansion just came out, the game is pretty much been a on a steady decline, not some plummet like people like to think.  End of Wrath/beginning of Cata (excluding the pre-Cata spike, which is where the game hit the 12M mark): 11.5M. End of Cata/beginning of MoP (excluding the release spike): 9M. End of MoP/Beginning of WoD (excluding the release hype): 6.8M. Current: 5.5M.  That's a 2.5M-&gt;2.2M-&gt;1.3M loss per expansion.  The 3M jump we had right before Warlords made the sub loss seem MUCH worse. Not saying I like having had a downward trend since Cata's launch, but in the amount of time it took them to hit the 12M peak (6 years), we've only lost just over 50% of that, rather than it being "WoW is dead."It's because something hypes up for the return.  Buddy of mine always unsubs for extended periods of time (he's a general game jumper), but he'll come back for specific reasons - he resubbed when BrF came out so he could give it a go, but was gone again once he cleared it on LFR (he's not a raider and never will be). He didn't come back for 6.2, but he's planning to come back for the next patch since he'll be able to "finish" his character out before Legion. He'll be back for Legion and he'll probably make it about 3 months before he unsubs again.  I concur. I do LFR on at least three toons a week, but I will not even queue for Archimonde until I get to that part of the Legendary.  I'd prefer waiting another week for a chance at another tome than set foot there again.It's not as bad as it looks, IMHO.  If you were to exclude the jump right when any expansion just came out, the game is pretty much been a on a steady decline, not some plummet like people like to think. End of Wrath/beginning of Cata (excluding the pre-Cata spike, which is where the game hit the 12M mark): 11.5M. End of Cata/beginning of MoP (excluding the release spike): 9M. End of MoP/Beginning of WoD (excluding the release hype): 6.8M. Current: 5.5M. That's a 2.5M-&gt;2.2M-&gt;1.3M loss per expansion. The 3M jump we had right before Warlords made the sub loss seem MUCH worse. Not saying I like having had a downward trend since Cata's launch, but in the amount of time it took them to hit the 12M peak (6 years), we've only lost just over 50% of that, rather than it being "WoW is dead."It'll be the fifth time I've done it lol!  But the first time was at the start of MoP, and the times after I wasn't exactly reading all the quest texts... and the three years since, I've obviously not remembered it :)I don't think 9-12, but we do have quite a bit of time still. &gt; Outlands should have been part of the game from the beginning. Same with Karazhan, same with Black Temple, same with the Emerald Dream.

Insert "THANK YOU" meme here...

I remember when TBC came out. I hadn't started the game yet, but my buddy was playing and trying to convince me to play.  I decided to do a bit of research on the game to see if I wanted to start playing.  There were a good number of fan blogs I came across that decried all of TBC as content that "should have been in the game already for free," because most of TBC had been uncovered through code digging before TBC was even announced... and especially the people complaining about Black Temple not even being in the release (even though no one could have gotten in) since the files were clearly already there.

Edit: I decided I did want to play, and TBC is, to date, my favorite expansion.I don't know why you got downvoted on this. Until 2010, they gave sub numbers out in two chunks: WoW West and WoW east.  WoW West hit its peak in just under 5.5 million at the start of 2009, then declined to just over 5M at the start of 2010. WoW East was at just over 6.5M at the start of 2009 and just under 6.5M at the start of 2010. Then they combined the sub numbers into one lump sum when they next released date (the Cata pre-patch), when they showed the 12M mark being hit.You could make the same argument for any point in the game, though.  There's simply no way to verify how many people are actually logged in and playing.  For example, when WoW hit the 12M mark, half my guild was still subbed but rarely logged in. We had cleared ICC10, but we didn't have the numbers to move on into ICC25, so it was the occasional log-in and then nothing.  &gt; WoW peaking at about 12 million subscribers is an anomaly among MMO's..Most are lucky to get a few hundred thousand.

Very much this.  When MMOData.net was still active and tracking all sub numbers for all MMOs at the time (went until the end of 2013), WoW was at 12M, the next closest MMO at the time was Aion at just over 4M.  I don't know what has changed since then, but it was an anomaly to hit that high of subs.  MMOData.net ended up closing down because so many games went FTP and it was getting harder and harder for them to get actual numbers from companies.I think with WoW, people just expect more than they'd expect in other games. I think it comes from two parts:

1) People have been begging Blizzard for more transparency in the development process for a long time.  The amount of beta access alone (and I'm not including the MoP beta access for all annual pass people) means people see a lot of the game before it's ready... but a large number of people who get into beta aren't going in to test and make it better, their going in to test it to see if they like it.  But you also have things like MMO-C that datamine information long before it's meant for general knowledge (and no matter how much they preface their posts with "this is datamined information and may change," people don't listen)... then you have the massive number of youtube channels that will broadcast anything and everything.  All of that means we are getting a lot more information about their plans up front, and if those plans change people throw a fit.

2) Entitlement. I know people like to throw that word around a lot, but the amount of people that pull the "I've paid $15 a month for 10 years playing this game...." is insane.  People feel entitled to perfection and feel entitled to exactly what they want in the game.  That's not the case in a lot of other games.  Skyrim is a good example - stuff that they added in later (like dragon riding and personal built housing) was stuff that was originally going to be part of the game at launch. I'm sure some complained, but not like they do in WoW.  Skyrim is riddled with bugs, and Bethesda isn't fixing them anymore, yet it's not decried as a failure.  I'm not saying that Blizzard shouldn't try for better, or saying WoD didn't have problems, but if WoD had dropped in 2006 instead of TBC (in other words - if this was the second expansion and we didn't have 10 years of expectations), not nearly as many people would have freaked out over things like "cut content" and the like.&gt; Not to be a fanboy here, but what does 5.5 million subs mean when x% could be using tokens to "pay" for their time?

Doesn't matter.  Both potential scenarios is the same, and one is even better from a shareholder perspective:

**Scenario 1 (Original Model):**

Person A: $15/Month Subscription

Person B: $15/Month Subscription

Total: $30/Month Subscription Fee. Two Subscribers.

**Scenario 2 (Game Token Model):**

Person A: $15/Month Subscription + $20 game token

Person B: $0/Month Subscription + Gold bought game token.

Total: $35/Month / Two Subscribers.

If people are paying for their sub using game tokens, someone else is purchasing that token from the store. To purchase the token and sell it on the AH, you need to be an active subscriber.  

Edit: Formatting&gt; It's actually a trend right now for companies. Not so much damage control as it is getting with the times.

This. WoW was pretty much the only company that consistently DID give sub numbers.  MMOData.net used to track sub numbers of all MMOs, but shut down at the end of 2013. In the creator's final message, he said the largest part was having difficulty getting numbers from companies.  

People should also remember this isn't the first time WoW did this.  They stopped reporting numbers during Wrath at the start of 2010, after the game saw the first decline in subs during the first quarter after the expansion released. They didn't report numbers again until the pre-Cata patch hit when subs hit the 12M mark.  There were tin-foil hat theories all around saying that they did this because sub numbers kept going down and they were in this massive marketing campaign getting new people in and they didn't want to deter new customers by them seeing ever decreasing numbers.That's me, except Wrath. I never unsubbed during TBC, and WoD has been the first xpac since TBC that I haven't unsubbed.  It's completely and utterly normal.  It's likely the biggest reason why they aren't wanting to report numbers. Even from Wrath, the trend was there - sub numbers decline during the expansion, spike for a new expansion, decline again. Sure, they've been declining more than going up, but it's nothing new.  I've tried that, especially when tanking... but I tend to get more of the same problems.

Ironically, the most frustrating runs have been those that have a good number of "real" raiders - people with a good amount of normal/heroic gear.  They take the perspective of "lol it's LFR" and don't follow mechanics, so while Archi's health is going down a lot faster since their DPS is so much higher, the adds are dying too slow, there's fire everywhere, and the tank gets killed by the demon that spawns on him because none of it goes down fast enough.The elves didn't join much until the second war, but they had taught humans arcane magic before the first war ever started, during the troll wars.  They were around, just not prevalent or full allies yet.&gt; True but doesn't that further validate that sub numbers aren't a good way to measure the revenue of the game?

Absolutely! I apologize, I was not meaning to infer that sub numbers was a good number to use for shareholders.  I think it's a terrible reference point.  


What a shareholder cares about is how well the company is doing overall... i.e. how much money am *I*, the shareholder, going to get from this company?  Sub numbers don't do a good job of showing that, especially with various sub methods out there.  But, when you hear quarter after quarter that the subs are falling, it can decrease shareholder confidence that the money will keep coming in.  Exactly.  I said this is another thread:

&gt; If you were to exclude the jump right when any expansion just came out, the game is pretty much been a on a steady decline, not some plummet like people like to think. End of Wrath/beginning of Cata (excluding the pre-Cata spike, which is where the game hit the 12M mark): 11.5M. End of Cata/beginning of MoP (excluding the release spike): 9M. End of MoP/Beginning of WoD (excluding the release hype): 6.8M. Current: 5.5M. That's a 2.5M-&gt;2.2M-&gt;1.3M loss per expansion. The 3M jump we had right before Warlords made the sub loss seem MUCH worse. Not saying I like having had a downward trend since Cata's launch, but in the amount of time it took them to hit the 12M peak (6 years), we've only lost just over 50% of that, rather than it being "WoW is dead."

The point of it being this - when you exclude pre-expansion increases, the game has actually been declining since the start of Wrath.  The first decline the game saw was shortly after Wrath launched. Now, we don't know what happened in the second half of Wrath (Blizzard stopped reporting numbers at the start of 2010 and didn't report again until the pre-Cata patch hit and we hit the 12M mark)... but what had been happening in Wrath was an initial spike up to 11.75M (from 11M), then a drop to 11.5M, then it held steady at 11.5M for all of 2009. That was the first drop. Then it's been a rather steady (rather than plummeting) decline it looks like when you see the spikes pre-expansion.No thank you. They do a crappy enough time with balance as it is, for them to do that, they'd have to balance the different weapon specs perfectly. Otherwise it would be "well, I got this great new mace, but mace spec is so far behind sword spec that it's not worth equipping."Different games have different iterations of it, but basically it's a mode that lets you play through "older" stuff when you've passed it.

In Diablo 3, Adventure Mode was added so you could go to any of the zones and just kill mobs. You didn't have to follow the questline for the entire area.  It came with rewards for doing them (boss kills gave special rewards, and they had "bounties" in every major zone to give a reason for going there).  If you were tired of the storyline, you could still level your character by doing Adventure Mode (and it was actually better, but that's beside the point).

The thought for WoW would basically be where you go into Adventure Mode and you would scale down to the level for that zone and be able to do the zone "as is."  You would get rewards for your current level character, but be doing a level 30 zone... Similar to Timewalking.  It might even be that the zone would be a phased version of the zone that would have quests and "bounties" that would come back daily, but be different every day.You're probably right, but they only said HFC is the last *raid* we'll have.  No one expected there to be something like the upcoming valor/Timewalking patch, so it's not a complete stretch to think they might put in some sort of tide-me-over content patch.Or void storage? OR YOUR BANK!? I'd spend 120k on a yak if it gave access to my bank.I'd be good with that. I'd not like it if I always scaled down. That's one of the things that makes me not enjoy playing GW2... I've leveled up, I'm powerful... and I'm getting killed by this pack of level 20 wasps again. &gt; not even dk's visit there after start quest anymore

You've never played as a DK, have you?Incorrect.  

WoW went from 11M to 11.75M right after Wrath launched, then dropped back down to 11.5M in the first quarter of 2009, which it held at until the pre-Cata launch where it went up to 12M.  It wasn't a huge loss, but it was the first loss the game had experienced.

From MMO Datas Blog, which tracked all sub numbers industry wide until 2013:

http://users.telenet.be/mmodata/Charts/Subs-1.png

The sub loss in Wrath happened in the first quarter of 2009, not at the end.

From the MMO Datas Blog, which used to track all subs industry wide until 2013.

http://users.telenet.be/mmodata/Charts/Subs-1.pngDrakes and Algalon?  There you're talking about hard modes.  ICC? The very end of the expansion.

The complaint people had wasn't over the final dungeon, or doing hard modes. It was the end game content for the non-serious raider.  Doing drakes is serious stuff, doing Algalon is serious stuff. That is hard mode stuff that was difficult even for hard core raiders.  However, Naxx, Eoe, Sarth (no drakes)? That stuff was a cakewalk.&gt; The 5mans were harder when no one had any gear

I was AoE festing the 5-mans in Wrath in my T5 gear from TBC.  They were easy from the start, with a few specific exceptions (Loki, the trash after the second boss in OK, the gauntlet in UK).  

&gt; And the only thing that made BC 5 mans hard was because class design and tanking mechanics were broken 

Yes, but that was part of the problem.  They made things like CC irrelevant in Wrath, which made the dungeons boring. Even if things could kill you, you still needed no strategy to beat the instances.  I didn't have trash mobs that I feared the way that I feared some of the trash in TBC heroics.  

&gt; naxx didn't become puggable until people already had naxx gear. You are acting like it was fully cleared in a pug on the 3rd day of the expansion, and that's not True. That and EoE wasn't puggable until Ulduar gear on my server. You had to be certain classes to do 10 man 3D burns until you could super outgear it. 

I had my first naxx clear three weeks into the expansion.  Naxx gear was of equal quality as heroic 5-man gear (all 200 ilvl). I'm not saying it was puggable on day three (though it did only take 2 days for the world first clear of it).  EoE though? There was nothing difficult about that fight.  Sarth?  Yeah, 3D burns couldn't happen up front, but that's Sarth's hardmode  0D kills?  Easily puggable within weeks.  

It really wasn't until Ulduar came out that a raid was added that, without activating hard mode, pugging was problematic. And that was 5 months in.  The T7 stuff was largely not a problem (except, like I had said before, the new people on Sapphiron/Kel and if you did hard modes) within a month after the release, which left another four months of "what do I do now?" There was very minimal gearing up process as we'd had in TBC (which, to be fair, was also easy in comparison to the gearing up needed for Vanilla raiding).  That was the problem a lot of people had with Wrath at launch - where was the sense of progression? When I'm able to do heroics and raids shortly after hitting max level, it doesn't feel like *progress*.  It was when they shifted the progression path away from "gear up while leveing -&gt;Gear up in normals-&gt;Gear up in heroics-&gt;Gear up in raids" to "Hit max level-&gt;Start getting into raids as fast as possible-&gt;Gear up through progression raids."&gt; There was still somewhat of a character progression in Wrath, up into ToC. IN patch 3.3.5, you geared yourself up through the ICC 5 man heroics, a little bit of ToC Pugs, while saving your EoF's for Tier gear if you were a casual player. 

But here, once again, you're talking about how the expansion was much later in the expansion.  At launch? That wasn't the same. Hell, Naxx10 gear was the *same ilvl* as heroic 5-man gear.  The only benefit of Naxx10 gear over heroic gear was tier gear.  

They made the model better as the expansion went on, but there was a lot of issues before that.  Even when Ulduar came out, which was 5 months in, it didn't come with anything additional for the non-progression raider.  It took nine months for that to happen (with ToC's release).  Imagine having done 9 months of WoD with only heroics and Highmaul as options if you weren't a True raider... and have Highmaul drop gear that was of equal quality as the heroic gear.

ToC started to make things better, with a new and difficult 5-man (which dropped gear better than what you could get before)... and then ICC was done extremely well with 3 new dungeons that had normal modes that were difficult, even.  By the time of ICC, there were a lot of progression paths for the non-raider, along with catch up mechanics for the raider. But that was at the end, not the beginning.  That didn't come until 13 months into the expansion.Gotcha.  I have 12 toons, so I tend to only get on one once per day, so faster doesn't benefit me nearly as much, but I get that :)[Actually no, sub numbers went up to 11.75M when the expansion launched, then dropped to 11.5M in the first quarter, THEN plateaued before spiking up to 12M in the pre-Cata patch then dropping again.](http://users.telenet.be/mmodata/Charts/Subs-1.png)We're talking two different things.  I was talking about T7 for the pugs, of which I had no issues with, in pugs, except for hardmodes (like 1, 2, or 3D) and Sapp/KT if people had never done it.  With Ulduar, I said I was in a guild group, but we were a rather casual guild and had no issues until Yogg himself.&gt; The only gear that came out of 5 man heroics that was ilvl 200 was the epics that dropped off the final boss. 

Go back and look again.  The blues that dropped from heroic 5-mans was also ilvl 200.  

&gt; And if it was easy as you claim it was, everyone would have had undying and immortal titles by the time Ulduar came out, but that was saved for better Raiders.

You're making a HUGE gap between the hardest achievement in the raid and "not failing."  I never claimed people didn't die, or wipes didn't happen.  Of course they did, that happened in Kara too. Hell, that happens in LFR and I don't think anyone would try to argue that LFR in WoD is harder than Naxx was.  But pugging and clearing the entire place? Absolutely.  

&gt; Wg was also fun as hell. 

If you enjoy PvP at all. I, personally, hate PvP in all iterations. I hated WG, but not due to how it was itself, but due to requiring winning WG to get into VoA.

&gt; And what has changed? You have always gone from. Heroics to raids, nothing has changed at all.

Even before 6.2, you could bypass heroics altogether.  Hit 100, get some crafted pieces and maybe a BoA, and hop right into LFR.  I'm not saying that's a good progress path, but the path *has* changed.  At least in Wrath, there was a purpose to running heroics even late in the expansion: Badges. You needed badges to get the catch up gear pieces, and the quickest way to get badges was running heroics (especially after they introduced LFD).

&gt; I'm not saying the game was even hard it's not a difficulty issue, I just know that everyone I played with had fun having shit tons of stuff to do for an entire expansion.

There was a lot to do, and I've never claimed otherwise.  *However*, the difficulty issue was a problem.  For many people in TBC, raiding was not the path they wanted to take. Maybe the occasional Kara run, but that was it.  If Blizzards statements are to be believed, a small percentage of the playerbase saw Sunwell beyond the trash at the beginning.  For the average, non-raider in TBC, heroics were *the* end-game content.  You had dailies and you had heroics. But the heroics were challenging and took time to complete, it wasn't uncommon to have a heroic take over an hour (and one of the heroic challenges for the questline/title was managing *to* complete it in under an hour, and that was after the first boss).  When Wrath came out (not nine months later when ToC came out, but when Wrath came out), the heroics were not challenging.  On my T6 geared toon, I was clearing it the day I hit 80, on my T5 geared toon I was only replacing a few pieces before running them. On my non-raiding toons, I was still AoE-festing heroics within the first month. That left 8 more months of easy-snooze-fest heroics before they brought in a new one that was challenging. *That* was the difficulty problem in Wrath. Not the raids (though we've talked about T7, especially Naxx), but the non-raids.  And I think it was a terrible mistake to bring in the tabards to get rep and make the shoulder (or was it the head?) enchants BoA - it made doing dailies for reputation almost moot.  It was the first time I found myself leveling alts out of boredom (where before my alts were leveled for their professions, to supplement my main).I agree, however I think the badge system was too strong at the start.  The Badges of Heroism, which dropped from heroics, could purchase ilvl 200 gear, which could make Naxx10 gear irrelevant, the Emblems of Valor, which dropped from the raids, purchased 213 gear, which was Naxx25 level.  It was entirely possible to be Naxx10 geared without ever setting foot in there.  

When Ulduar came out, I think the system was in the perfect place.  The prior badges and methods for obtaining those badges were still there, and they added the Conquest badges.  But they didn't make the catch up mechanic present yet, so you still had to run heroics for the 200ilvl badges and T7 for the 213ilvl badges... but you're right - ToC came out and they added in the Triumph badges and made Ulduar/T7/heroics all drop Conquest. At that point, there was *very* few reasons to run T7 or even Ulduar. Yes, you could go for the weapons/trinkets, but it was a better bet to spam heroics to get into ToC.  

Overall, I liked the system before ToC a lot better, but I've not been a fan of "catch up" translating to "skip."  And I definitely liked the TBC/Wrath model of running old stuff for badges to get up to a tier behind the current tier a LOT better than the MoP/WoD model of "go to this place and get free tokens that give you gear to bypass dungeons and prior raids all-together.In a vacuum? Or in comparison to what happened later?  No, a 25k loss is nothing.  But for a game that had seen nothing but increase for four years?  It was a big deal at the time.

Not to mention, Wrath had the record for first day PC sales, beating out even TBC.  While we don't know what the total sales were (I stand corrected from a previous thread on the matter there), you can make a pretty good assumption that the sales didn't stop at day one.  But to set a record like that (and one that held until D3 came out) and only go up by a small percentage, and so much less than the prior expansion, and with the amount of advertisement they did during Wrath (that was during the whole "What's your game?" ad series), to go down at all, and then to plateua for the entire expansion, it was the first time people started decrying the death of the game.  Obviously, it retrospect, it was nothing compared to what would happen in Cata, MoP, and WoD, but it was a huge deal *at the time*.Again, I'm not saying that pugs didn't die, I never did. But I never had a pug that wasn't able to get through the entire place.  There were wipes, absolutely, but falling apart? 

&gt; But pugs weren't full clearing Naxx in week 3 of the expansion.

Some were, but even then, you had 5 months of Naxx. There were plenty full clearing it with little difficulty within a couple of months, leaving a rather long period of time with nothing else.  And that's not even to talk about the poor setup of having the 10 man raids be a lesser difficulty than 25 man raids and what that meant for the average pugger.Ah, good to know. I have an H/P and a P/S, so wouldn't have even thought about that.Yeah, but how they act is as though they've never even seen the race or the history.... and often times conflicts with the "we know who you are, but don't like you" lore they built up...

Like Loremaster Cho - on Horde side when you're doing the quest where to light the incense so he can learn about your history.  If you're Pandaren - 

*Cho:  I would very much like to hear about your ancestors, stranger. Light the incense and let's reflect on where you came from, hm?*

-Now this right here already annoys me.  He *knows* where they came from - the Wandering Isle. Or you'd think he knows.  He would at least know that they were Pandaren, maybe wonder how they got caught up with this "Horde," at a minimum, but not be looking at them like complete strangers.

After lighting the incense: 

*Cho: Ah, but you're no stranger to your past! A Pandaren from the Wandering Isle. I admit, I thought your homeland was just a legend. Pandaren from the Isle are far more adventurous than those on the mainland... it's in your blood!*

-This annoys me even more. 

First off, he's a LOREMASTER.  He would not think the Wandering Isle was just a legend. He knows very well that the stories are based in truth.  Secondary (and this part, I'm not sure of), it hasn't been *that* terribly long since the Isle last came to Pandaria.

But finally, and this is the big one, others seem to know about the Wandering Isle.  I know, at least, in *Vol'jin:Shadow of the Horde*, there are statements that infer this, from Chen talking to Vol'jin:

*Most pandaren from here see pandaren who gre up on Shen-zin Su as 'wild dogs.'  We look like them, sound like them, smell like them, but we're different.*

He's talking there about the Chiang Sisters, who claimed to be old enough to remember when Liu Lang first departed from Pandaria.  Granted, they were probably lying, but it's clear that they know of the Isle and the people on it, as did many others.  So, to have a Loremaster seem baffled that the Wandering Isle was real just was off.
Sword-Chucks - Almost as deadly to the opponent as they are to the wielder.How is no one talking about banks!?!  

I can put this legendary super rare item into a bank in Orgrimmar, then hearth to my garrison in another UNIVERSE and there it is. 

WHAT IS THIS MAGIC?!?

I mean, at least the Void Storage is explained as some sort of interdimensional storage... but the regular bank?I think the issue I have is the number of times you find instances of Pandaria Pandaren already having pre-disposed biases against Isle Pandaren.  It really came out in Vol'jin's book, since Chen and LiLi spend a lot of time fighting (or in Li Li's case, embracing) the stereotype.  Had it just been people thinking it was a legend, it wouldn't bother me, but to have someone like Cho say he thought it was a legend, but then have a statement like Chen's of "Most pandaren from here see pandaren who grew up on Shen-zin Su as 'wild dogs.'", it just doesn't seem to fit. 

Edit: Also, I couldn't really find a timeframe - how long ago Shen-zin Su started going from and stopped coming to Pandaria.  Some of the stories make it seem like it was centuries ago, some not so much.  Like the Chiang sisters in Vol'jin's book claiming to be old enough to have been there when Liu Lang first departed Pandaria and Chen saying he just "didn't know if he could believe that."  If it was thousands of years ago, he would simply laugh it off, but he doubts rather than simply says it's not True.  Obviously, that's just those two, but to even be able to claim any connection to it indicates to me it wasn't *that* long ago when, at least, he stopped coming.

Now I'm going to have to reroll another Pandaren and redo the starting area just to double check if there were any references I missed to the time frame.I can't confirm or not confirm that.  I don't personally recall him mentioning that (and at least on the Horde side, he seems completely dumbfounded at most of the races).  

I know it was just how it was written, and I'm reading too much into it, but I would have liked it if he had said things to certain races to fit Pandaria. Like looking at the Tauren and realizing they greatly resemble the Yaungol, or trolls and realizing they resemble the legends of the Zandalari, that type of thing.That happens on the Alliance side, but it didn't feel like that on the Horde side.  After you defeat Ook Dookem, you go into his cave and drink his tea so he can tell you a bit about Pandarian history... then you follow him to the stones and he tells you some more (and you defeat a Saurok that attacks), then he keeps talking to you as you go to the incense shrine and you light the incense so he can get to know a bit about your history.  If all you're doing is missions and the JC daily, that takes maybe a minute per character, unless you need to moves mats around for the JC daily.  

It takes me an hour to do full garrison on my 12 characters (mining, herbing, all buildings, shipyard, etc). You're probably doing more than them.  I have a spreadsheet (yes, I'm THAT guy) to know when the last time I went around and did actual garrison stuff.  I do "full" garrison once per week, and rotate every three days on going to pick up work orders or do open crates.  

Log in at the table, finish missions. Master Plan makes that super fast.  I have my missions sorted by reward so I can make sure I get all the 675 rewards that sell well first, then gold missions, then Oil missions (unless it's the 150 oil mission and I don't have any good gold missions). With Master Plan, I right click to set tentative parties, then set them all out.  Entire process takes less than a minute.

If I'm on one of my toons with a JC hut, I'll run down and do the daily.  

All my garrisons either have a bank or they are engineers with Jeeves, so I never need to make a trip to the bank. And since I only do "other" garrison things every three days or so, I don't need to worry about opening crates until it's that toons turn.I think people forget this.  If you were to exclude the jump right when any expansion just came out, the game is pretty much been a on a steady decline, not some plummet like people like to think.  End of Wrath/beginning of Cata (excluding the pre-Cata spike, which is where the game hit the 12M mark): 11.5M. End of Cata/beginning of MoP (excluding the release spike): 9M. End of MoP/Beginning of WoD (excluding the release hype): 6.8M. Current: 5.5M.  That's a 2.5M-&gt;2.2M-&gt;1.3M loss per expansion.  The 3M jump we had right before Warlords made the sub loss seem MUCH worse. Not saying I like having had a downward trend since Cata's launch, but in the amount of time it took them to hit the 12M peak (6 years), we've only lost just over 50% of that, rather than it being "WoW is dead."It's because something hypes up for the return.  Buddy of mine always unsubs for extended periods of time (he's a general game jumper), but he'll come back for specific reasons - he resubbed when BrF came out so he could give it a go, but was gone again once he cleared it on LFR (he's not a raider and never will be). He didn't come back for 6.2, but he's planning to come back for the next patch since he'll be able to "finish" his character out before Legion. He'll be back for Legion and he'll probably make it about 3 months before he unsubs again.  I concur. I do LFR on at least three toons a week, but I will not even queue for Archimonde until I get to that part of the Legendary.  I'd prefer waiting another week for a chance at another tome than set foot there again.It's not as bad as it looks, IMHO.  If you were to exclude the jump right when any expansion just came out, the game is pretty much been a on a steady decline, not some plummet like people like to think. End of Wrath/beginning of Cata (excluding the pre-Cata spike, which is where the game hit the 12M mark): 11.5M. End of Cata/beginning of MoP (excluding the release spike): 9M. End of MoP/Beginning of WoD (excluding the release hype): 6.8M. Current: 5.5M. That's a 2.5M-&gt;2.2M-&gt;1.3M loss per expansion. The 3M jump we had right before Warlords made the sub loss seem MUCH worse. Not saying I like having had a downward trend since Cata's launch, but in the amount of time it took them to hit the 12M peak (6 years), we've only lost just over 50% of that, rather than it being "WoW is dead."It'll be the fifth time I've done it lol!  But the first time was at the start of MoP, and the times after I wasn't exactly reading all the quest texts... and the three years since, I've obviously not remembered it :)I don't think 9-12, but we do have quite a bit of time still. &gt; Outlands should have been part of the game from the beginning. Same with Karazhan, same with Black Temple, same with the Emerald Dream.

Insert "THANK YOU" meme here...

I remember when TBC came out. I hadn't started the game yet, but my buddy was playing and trying to convince me to play.  I decided to do a bit of research on the game to see if I wanted to start playing.  There were a good number of fan blogs I came across that decried all of TBC as content that "should have been in the game already for free," because most of TBC had been uncovered through code digging before TBC was even announced... and especially the people complaining about Black Temple not even being in the release (even though no one could have gotten in) since the files were clearly already there.

Edit: I decided I did want to play, and TBC is, to date, my favorite expansion.I don't know why you got downvoted on this. Until 2010, they gave sub numbers out in two chunks: WoW West and WoW east.  WoW West hit its peak in just under 5.5 million at the start of 2009, then declined to just over 5M at the start of 2010. WoW East was at just over 6.5M at the start of 2009 and just under 6.5M at the start of 2010. Then they combined the sub numbers into one lump sum when they next released date (the Cata pre-patch), when they showed the 12M mark being hit.You could make the same argument for any point in the game, though.  There's simply no way to verify how many people are actually logged in and playing.  For example, when WoW hit the 12M mark, half my guild was still subbed but rarely logged in. We had cleared ICC10, but we didn't have the numbers to move on into ICC25, so it was the occasional log-in and then nothing.  &gt; WoW peaking at about 12 million subscribers is an anomaly among MMO's..Most are lucky to get a few hundred thousand.

Very much this.  When MMOData.net was still active and tracking all sub numbers for all MMOs at the time (went until the end of 2013), WoW was at 12M, the next closest MMO at the time was Aion at just over 4M.  I don't know what has changed since then, but it was an anomaly to hit that high of subs.  MMOData.net ended up closing down because so many games went FTP and it was getting harder and harder for them to get actual numbers from companies.I think with WoW, people just expect more than they'd expect in other games. I think it comes from two parts:

1) People have been begging Blizzard for more transparency in the development process for a long time.  The amount of beta access alone (and I'm not including the MoP beta access for all annual pass people) means people see a lot of the game before it's ready... but a large number of people who get into beta aren't going in to test and make it better, their going in to test it to see if they like it.  But you also have things like MMO-C that datamine information long before it's meant for general knowledge (and no matter how much they preface their posts with "this is datamined information and may change," people don't listen)... then you have the massive number of youtube channels that will broadcast anything and everything.  All of that means we are getting a lot more information about their plans up front, and if those plans change people throw a fit.

2) Entitlement. I know people like to throw that word around a lot, but the amount of people that pull the "I've paid $15 a month for 10 years playing this game...." is insane.  People feel entitled to perfection and feel entitled to exactly what they want in the game.  That's not the case in a lot of other games.  Skyrim is a good example - stuff that they added in later (like dragon riding and personal built housing) was stuff that was originally going to be part of the game at launch. I'm sure some complained, but not like they do in WoW.  Skyrim is riddled with bugs, and Bethesda isn't fixing them anymore, yet it's not decried as a failure.  I'm not saying that Blizzard shouldn't try for better, or saying WoD didn't have problems, but if WoD had dropped in 2006 instead of TBC (in other words - if this was the second expansion and we didn't have 10 years of expectations), not nearly as many people would have freaked out over things like "cut content" and the like.&gt; Not to be a fanboy here, but what does 5.5 million subs mean when x% could be using tokens to "pay" for their time?

Doesn't matter.  Both potential scenarios is the same, and one is even better from a shareholder perspective:

**Scenario 1 (Original Model):**

Person A: $15/Month Subscription

Person B: $15/Month Subscription

Total: $30/Month Subscription Fee. Two Subscribers.

**Scenario 2 (Game Token Model):**

Person A: $15/Month Subscription + $20 game token

Person B: $0/Month Subscription + Gold bought game token.

Total: $35/Month / Two Subscribers.

If people are paying for their sub using game tokens, someone else is purchasing that token from the store. To purchase the token and sell it on the AH, you need to be an active subscriber.  

Edit: Formatting&gt; It's actually a trend right now for companies. Not so much damage control as it is getting with the times.

This. WoW was pretty much the only company that consistently DID give sub numbers.  MMOData.net used to track sub numbers of all MMOs, but shut down at the end of 2013. In the creator's final message, he said the largest part was having difficulty getting numbers from companies.  

People should also remember this isn't the first time WoW did this.  They stopped reporting numbers during Wrath at the start of 2010, after the game saw the first decline in subs during the first quarter after the expansion released. They didn't report numbers again until the pre-Cata patch hit when subs hit the 12M mark.  There were tin-foil hat theories all around saying that they did this because sub numbers kept going down and they were in this massive marketing campaign getting new people in and they didn't want to deter new customers by them seeing ever decreasing numbers.That's me, except Wrath. I never unsubbed during TBC, and WoD has been the first xpac since TBC that I haven't unsubbed.  It's completely and utterly normal.  It's likely the biggest reason why they aren't wanting to report numbers. Even from Wrath, the trend was there - sub numbers decline during the expansion, spike for a new expansion, decline again. Sure, they've been declining more than going up, but it's nothing new.  I've tried that, especially when tanking... but I tend to get more of the same problems.

Ironically, the most frustrating runs have been those that have a good number of "real" raiders - people with a good amount of normal/heroic gear.  They take the perspective of "lol it's LFR" and don't follow mechanics, so while Archi's health is going down a lot faster since their DPS is so much higher, the adds are dying too slow, there's fire everywhere, and the tank gets killed by the demon that spawns on him because none of it goes down fast enough.The elves didn't join much until the second war, but they had taught humans arcane magic before the first war ever started, during the troll wars.  They were around, just not prevalent or full allies yet.&gt; True but doesn't that further validate that sub numbers aren't a good way to measure the revenue of the game?

Absolutely! I apologize, I was not meaning to infer that sub numbers was a good number to use for shareholders.  I think it's a terrible reference point.  


What a shareholder cares about is how well the company is doing overall... i.e. how much money am *I*, the shareholder, going to get from this company?  Sub numbers don't do a good job of showing that, especially with various sub methods out there.  But, when you hear quarter after quarter that the subs are falling, it can decrease shareholder confidence that the money will keep coming in.  Exactly.  I said this is another thread:

&gt; If you were to exclude the jump right when any expansion just came out, the game is pretty much been a on a steady decline, not some plummet like people like to think. End of Wrath/beginning of Cata (excluding the pre-Cata spike, which is where the game hit the 12M mark): 11.5M. End of Cata/beginning of MoP (excluding the release spike): 9M. End of MoP/Beginning of WoD (excluding the release hype): 6.8M. Current: 5.5M. That's a 2.5M-&gt;2.2M-&gt;1.3M loss per expansion. The 3M jump we had right before Warlords made the sub loss seem MUCH worse. Not saying I like having had a downward trend since Cata's launch, but in the amount of time it took them to hit the 12M peak (6 years), we've only lost just over 50% of that, rather than it being "WoW is dead."

The point of it being this - when you exclude pre-expansion increases, the game has actually been declining since the start of Wrath.  The first decline the game saw was shortly after Wrath launched. Now, we don't know what happened in the second half of Wrath (Blizzard stopped reporting numbers at the start of 2010 and didn't report again until the pre-Cata patch hit and we hit the 12M mark)... but what had been happening in Wrath was an initial spike up to 11.75M (from 11M), then a drop to 11.5M, then it held steady at 11.5M for all of 2009. That was the first drop. Then it's been a rather steady (rather than plummeting) decline it looks like when you see the spikes pre-expansion.No thank you. They do a crappy enough time with balance as it is, for them to do that, they'd have to balance the different weapon specs perfectly. Otherwise it would be "well, I got this great new mace, but mace spec is so far behind sword spec that it's not worth equipping."Different games have different iterations of it, but basically it's a mode that lets you play through "older" stuff when you've passed it.

In Diablo 3, Adventure Mode was added so you could go to any of the zones and just kill mobs. You didn't have to follow the questline for the entire area.  It came with rewards for doing them (boss kills gave special rewards, and they had "bounties" in every major zone to give a reason for going there).  If you were tired of the storyline, you could still level your character by doing Adventure Mode (and it was actually better, but that's beside the point).

The thought for WoW would basically be where you go into Adventure Mode and you would scale down to the level for that zone and be able to do the zone "as is."  You would get rewards for your current level character, but be doing a level 30 zone... Similar to Timewalking.  It might even be that the zone would be a phased version of the zone that would have quests and "bounties" that would come back daily, but be different every day.You're probably right, but they only said HFC is the last *raid* we'll have.  No one expected there to be something like the upcoming valor/Timewalking patch, so it's not a complete stretch to think they might put in some sort of tide-me-over content patch.Or void storage? OR YOUR BANK!? I'd spend 120k on a yak if it gave access to my bank.I'd be good with that. I'd not like it if I always scaled down. That's one of the things that makes me not enjoy playing GW2... I've leveled up, I'm powerful... and I'm getting killed by this pack of level 20 wasps again. &gt; not even dk's visit there after start quest anymore

You've never played as a DK, have you?They have 1H versus 2H (and that's even going away in Legion anyway). That's quite a different story than axe vs sword vs mace.  Wooosh.......Well yeah, those are better things, of course!  But similar to how a transmogger is a "use on occasion," so would be a void storage :)We had destroyed the portal once before, and it ended up stranding many good soldiers in Outland, including Alleria and Turalyon (who haven't been seen in years) and Khadgar (who was missing until we went back through in TBC).  With Outland's connection to the Nether, there was simply too much risk of letting our guard down there to simply leave and let forces build back up.

From a Lore perspective, though, we defeated the demons that are at the gate and defeated the forces there, so there aren't still hordes of demons pressing at the portal.  Also, remember, from a lore perspective, it is not easy to get back and forth via portals from Azeroth to Outland - the easy portal creation of mages and the "permanent" portals are done purely for gameplay... without that portal to Outland, it should be much harder to get back and forth.

That's what I think, at least.Really depends on what you mean by "low level dungeon" and how you intend to farm gold.

Some people make a killing on the transmog market, but it involves patience on the items to sell and knowledge of what sells.

If you're talking about just running through the dungeon and vendoring everything, Cata raids are likely your best option.  I easily solo all Cata raids at level 100 (and have been since hitting 100, so don't let the ilvl be a deterrence). There are a few bosses that can cause problems, depending on your spec and class (25H Spine, first boss in Firelands, H Shannox, H Belorac), but most of them are easy to crush quickly.  Vendoring everything you get will net you a good amount of gold, and then you can sell all the mats (like cloth) on the AH for some more.

Dungeons themselves? I don't find most of them worth it, personally.Use the wow.gamepedia.com site provided by /u/egosumFidius, not the wowwiki site. It is updated more frequently. While the First War page might be identical, if you keep reading from the site, you'll be better off.

I also recommend heading to youtube and finding Nobel87. He has the absolute best youtube lore channel I've come across (might be what Mohzillator provided, but I can't access youtube at work).  His videos go really in depth on just about everything WoW, from individual characters to events, and covers games, books, comics, everything.Same with offhands for a caster :)This.  Though, they might just nerf them if you're over level 100... either way, there's no way they'd still have people being able to get things like Blingtron's Vault, otherwise everyone would feel compelled to keep going back to the garrison for the free gold.So my process on my most recent 100s has been to do the investment, but not put a LOT of effort into it. Just what benefits me the most:

Level 3 garrison - Allows level 3 buildings, the extra plots, and unlocks Tanaan, which you'll want to go to in order to get your ilvl up to unlock the 675 rare missions (I'm not positive that's required, but I keep being told it is)

Small buildings: Bank (lvl 1), Salvage Yard (lvl 3), JC hut (lvl 2 w/ follower).

-Bank for obvious reasons. JC Hut for the daily, since it's roughly 200g free every day. Salvage yard was nerfed, but just vendoring the lower level greens you get and disenchanting the higher level stuff to sell the mats brings in a decent sum everyday, gives follower upgrade tokens, and gives a reason to run the XP missions when your followers are maxed.

Medium: Trading Post (level 1) and Inn (level 3)

-Trading post gives you free resources with your extra mats, but more importantly you can purchase mats with your extra resources to sell on the AH or use for things like the JC daily.  Inn gives you recruiting treasure hunter followers and gives you more gold missions.

Large:  Barracks (level 3) and war mill/bunker (level 2) (possibly to be replaced later, see below). 

-Barracks gives you the extra 5 followers, which is ideal for more gold followers for more missions. War mill level 2 lets you use resources for work orders to get follower upgrade tokens.  If you think you might ever raid on that toon, then go to level 3 so you can get your free roll token once per week.  Once you have all your followers at level 675, if you don't plan to recruit more, you can replace it. The only think that really warrants replacement to me is a level 1 or 2 stables, for the ability to mine/herb without dismounting or being dismounted by mobs.  

Herb garden / Mine - I keep them at level 1, but I have so many extra herbs/ore sitting around it's not worth the extras.  However, if you are low on either, it's worth leveling up.

I don't bother with the shipyard. While you *can* get some great gold or AH items, it's much more rare, takes a lot more work, and you'll use up a lot of garrison resources putting on ship upgrades. Those resources, to me, are better spent on mats from the trading post to sell on the AH.

While it is a lot of gold up front (5k for the level 3, and another 10k or so to get the buildings to the appropriate level), just going in and doing your missions every day, the JC daily, and selling your extra mats, you'll make it back in a few weeks. Once your followers are up to 675 and you start getting rare missions, you'll see it come pouring in.  

Just to give some examples:

4k gold for Blingtron missions if you have 3 treasure hunter followers.

I sold a Medallion of the Legion (the 1k rep token) for 8k yesterday.

I sold the PvP medallion for 10k gold last week.

Oil caches and resources caches usually sell for between 1k and 5k depending on the day.

Overall, unless they surprise us and say Legion will be ready in January, you'll easily make back the initial investment and then be making gold LONG before Legion comes out.Teasers are not made to be finished product. Go look at the teasers and trailers they released before Guardians of the Galaxy or Jurassic World. Same thing happened. 

They're on a production and advertisement timeline. It's not worth the time to get a teaser or trailer polished for the advertisement timeline. Cutting out those small blips from the production to polish those would affect the final production timeline.  This is normal.Unfortunately, no, if you're talking about *just* WoD dungeons.... But read on:

5-man progression currently goes as follows (First ilvl is the required to enter/recommended to enter, second is what they reward):

Normals: 600 ilvl (Required to queue) - Rewards 615/Warforged to 621

Heroics: 610 ilvl (Required to queue) - Rewards 630/Warforged to 636

Mythics: 660 ilvl (Minimum recommended, but most prefer 675+) - Rewards 685-705 (soon to be higher in the next patch)

That means you have to bridge a gap of at least 30 ilvls before you can realistically do mythics after heroics.

HOWEVER, **there are some options for you!!!**

* Timewalking Events: These happen every month.  You are scaled down to level and can do select Timewalking Dungeons. There is no ilvl requirement to enter, and the gear that drops is ilvl 660 with a chance of warforging up to 675. They also drop Timewalking Badges, which can be used to purchase 675 gear.

* Tanaan Jungle: Baleful tokens in Tanaan Jungle are ilvl 650 with a chance to upgrade to 675. For 20k Apexis Crystals (which you get from doing dailies in Tanaan) they can be empowered up to 695. In the next patch, they also have a chance of automatically upgrading to 695.

* Crafted Gear: You can upgrade all the way to 705 (weapons) and 715 (other slots).  They start at 640 (630 for weapons) and upgrade 15 ilvls per upgrade.  You can only have 3 equipped (four if you include a shield or offhand - not dual wield weapons but a focus/shield/book offhand type).

Ultimately, you *can* gear up purely in 5-mans, but you'll have to wait until a Timewalking week. If you don't want to wait for those and you don't want to raid/LFR, then Tanaan and crafted gear are your only other options.

Edit:

&gt; How are the mythic dungeons? If I am not in raid gear could I still do them and would they still be challenging?
Are the timewalk dungeons as fun as they look? They look like a nostalgic blast.

Mythics are hard if you do them at the "appropriate" gear level: 660-675. Not "omg brick wall" hard, but you have to use CC and CDs and such.  At 675 and above, they get easier real fast.

Timewalking is a lot of fun, in my opinion, but they are NOT like doing them back in the old days.  Ironically, I find the Wrath dungeons harder than the TBC dungeons (which is backwards from what they were like back in the day).  They do get old pretty fast, though, since it's only a few options.So really, there's a TON of stuff that has changed, so it's not really something that can just be typed out.  

I won't go into specifics, but basically almost every single zone in Azeroth was changed in the Cataclysm. Besides the actual zones themselves, quests are more streamlined.

If you're planning to level an Undead, that's a great choice. I'm not sure if you leveled Forsaken initially, but no more running back and forth from Brill to the other side of Tirisfal... you'll have quest hubs out places.  It has a very good storyline (although it does assume you completed Wrath of the Lich King).

The biggest changes you'll find is to talents. Rather than a "talent tree" like what you had in 2008, you pick your spec and your spec determines certain major changes. The biggest one for a demo lock: You'll get your felguard at level 10!  Then, as you level, your talents (starting at level 15) will be a choice of three things - each one does something slightly different. For example, at level 15 you get to choose between a talent that increases the healing of drain life, a talent that makes your shadowbolt put a shield on you based on its damage, and a talent that gives you a healing CD.  

A lot of people don't like the changes to the talent trees. It is a shock, especially if you left in 2008... but most of the "talents" you used to pick were passives that now come automatically as you level.

Also, you get regular riding at level 20 now and epic at level 40!

Here's what I recommend: the game is cheap to get all the way to level 90 (the "base" game now includes everything up to the most recent expansion). Buy it, buy a month, and start playing.  People have various opinions over the game, but ultimately it's a personal thing. I LOVE leveling, and you might too. You might also decide that it's changed too much and just not worth it for you.  But give it awhile before you decide.&gt; Sweet, thanks! I'm a bit iffy about how people have been saying the quests have been streamlined. Are they anything like the quests in Guild Wars 2?

Oh no, nothing like GW2. Well, kind of, I guess, if you consider it being like having multiple quest hubs per zone, but you still have actual quests, not random events or "things to fill up" like you do in GW2.

Take the Forsaken starting area:  In your past days, you got to Brill and you had a ton of quest givers. Those quest givers would send you up north to the farm, or west to the tower, or east to the other farm, or south to the spiders.  And each time, you'd need to run back to Brill to turn in the quest then run back out to the farm to do the next part... then at some point you'd get a quest that sends you to Silverpine and you'd run all the way through Silverpine to the base and then you'd have a quest that would send you all the way back to the start of Silverpine to kill something, then back to the base, etc. It was a lot of running around.

Now, you get the Brill and get a quest to send you to the farm. At the farm is another quest giver that gives you a quest to kill something at the farm, then back to the quest giver, then back to the farm, back to the quest giver. So rather than running all the way across Tirisfal over and over again, you have that min-quest hub.  Then, when you get the quest to Silverpine, you go there and there's a whole area right inside to kill the things right inside Silverpine, and it doesn't send you to the actual base until you are done there.  

The zones also have more connections. It doesn't feel as much like you go from one story to a completely different one with the change of a zone. Tirisfal's quests seem to lead right into Silverpine's quests, which lead right into Hillsbrad's quests, which lead right into Arathi Highland's quests. You feel like it's one long continuous story.

&gt; Is it now canon-wise after the whole defeat of the Lich King/New Lich King plotline for every player, or just for the player's storyline progression?

This is where it gets confusing.  They made no changes to Outlands or Northrend.  So the "player story" goes like this:

New Character starts just after the Cataclysm happened. The Lich King is dead and Deathwing has risen.  Everywhere you go, you'll find that the world exists in that time frame, so people will be talking about the recent fall of the Lich King, people will be talking about the threat of Deathwing.  At level 58, when you go to Outland, you go back in time to Outland during TBC.  Nothing there has changed, so Illidan is the threat, we've not fought the Scourge, Deathwing is that dragon that came to Outland years ago and created the Nether Drakes, that's it.  At level 68, you go to Northrend. It takes place exactly where it was during Wrath.  We've returned from Outland, Illidan was defeated, and we're fighting Arthas in his home land.  At level 80, you go back to Azeroth, to the "new Azeroth" zones created during Cataclysm. At this point, you're back in the world you were in from level 1-58: Arthas is dead, Deathwing is going to destroy the world, and you need to stop him.  At level 85, you head to Pandaria, and the world exists as it did at the end of MoP - Deathwing is dead, we've just discovered Pandaria and are discovering it's beauty and deadly secrets.  Then you'll get to 90 and join us in Draenor as we are today.

It's confusing, I know, but it's not that bad if you just think of TBC and Wrath's levels as existing in their own time bubble, like you're doing a glorified Caverns of Time dungeon for 10 levels or so.&gt; How does the "pay your subscription in in-game gold" work?

There are tokens on the AH you can purchase with gold.  On US servers, they're hovering around 32k, they are double that on EU servers.  

&gt; When is the next expansion releasing? 

We don't know, hopefully Blizzcon this weekend will reveal that.

&gt; If I play from level 1, will I still have the opportunity to experience all the WoW lore, or is it broken up?

It's pretty broken up.  Level 1-60 zones are in "Cataclysm" in terms of the timeline, 60-70 are frozen in TBC timeline, 70-80 in Wrath's timeline, 80-85 back in Cataclysm, 85-90 in MoP and 90-100 in WoD.  However, if you do all the quests, you'll still get what's going on, it's just confusing when you head to Outland and Northrend because you aren't in the same timeline as you are the rest of the time.Affliction locks probably have the most instant casts due to their dot usage, but honestly all casters are pretty stationary. That was a conscious change they made in WoD - take away caster mobility. 

I'd also recommend a hunter - ranged but very mobile.It is at level 100, but not if you're a new player. I make 10-20k a week and I'm not a "gold maker" by any means. Just doing garrison missions, selling the occasional thing on the AH (and I don't track the market, just undercut the lowest seller and sell it). I'll farm stuff here and there, but it's mainly just general playing and I make it.&gt; Also if it was designed to be in the LFR-style system like I mentioned, that would make it a bit less time consuming to make due to the low standards of LFR.

With how many people bitch about LFR being mind numbing easy mode, that would not go over well.  

It's a lose-lose.

You create something LFR-style, but LFR-style rewards, people with better gear have no reason to go there.

You create something LFR-style, but higher rewards, people get angry that non-raiders are getting gear that is as good as high level raiding (similar to the complaint about mythic 5-mans soon to be rewarding gear higher than mythic raid gear).

Create something hard with good rewards and it does nothing for all the non-raiding players in the game, and it takes development time that is better used elsewhere.

Create something with multiple difficulties and it really pulls time away from development elsewhere.&gt; Onyxia's mechanics are child's play these days. 

Agreed. What made Onyxia hard back in the day was the threat issues the tank faced with knockback and the lowering threat ceiling as the fight went on, inability for tanks to control the adds due to AoE capping on threat generation abilities, and fear.  Deep breath killed a lot of people, but in this day and age, needing to move out of the way of an AoE attack that will one shot you is normal.

When they re-released Onyxia, she was extremely easy to down. Exactly!

If they were to add more content to WoD, add Farahlon and a new quest area.  People don't need more raids, they need more things to do when *not* raiding!We don't need a one-boss raid. No matter how good it is (and let's be honest, if they did one, it likely wouldn't be good because they aren't going to throw a lot of time at it), it's not going to take up a lot of time.

Assuming they could somehow get a magical creation of a good boss, tune well across multiple difficulties (they wouldn't do an LFR style boss), with good rewards... if everything about the boss was somehow perfect.... it would still take maybe an hour to do (assuming lots of trash like Halion).  Then we'd be right back where we are right now for the rest of the week.

Raiding is not the problem. People need things to do outside of raiding. Tanaan, even if you liked it when it came out like I did, is now boring - the same things over and over with no real reward anymore. Compared to things like the Isle of QD in TBC and even the Argent Tourney, which still had people running those dailies regularly even after ICC was old news.  If they were to spend dev time adding something, add Farahlon, put in new quest hubs and objectives (and *real* ones, not "go here and fill up this bar). Meanwhile, WG is always controlled by the other faction when I go... and realm hopping doesn't seem to change that at all.Back in TBC, a good friend of mine and I made an agreement: I'd use all my summons on Headless Horseman and pass if the mount dropped for her... This was back when you used a daily quest to summon him rather than zone in, and the mount was free roll...  Then after she got it, she'd do the same for me.

So, two years of that and she got it. We started doing it for me. Wrath comes out, she hates it, and stopped playing the game all together. Still no HH mount.

Edit: Biggest regret, though, was not moving guilds in TBC when mine died.  We were a progression guild and had gotten to Council in BT when we broke apart due to issues with healers and tanks leaving - we just couldn't deal with gearing up new ones through T5 and early T6 again. Most of my raiding buddies went to another guild to continue progression, downing Illidan and KJ by the end of the expansion. I switched mains from my warlock and started doing T4 and T5 on my paladin tank. I wish I would have gone with them to the other guild and finished TBC.Not VoA itself, but Wintergrasp is. I've used realm hopping to get into a realm where my faction controls Wintergrasp before, get to the entrance and leave group right as I enter to get inside before my character moves back to his normal realm. Unless normal cross realming just happened to switch over right when I entered.&gt; People have plenty of things to do outside of raiding, they just don't want to do them.

Tell me what I can be doing. I'm not being facetious, either. I'm genuinely curious what you consider as the "plenty" that there is to do.

&gt; People in forums tend to equate "There's nothing I want to do" with "there's nothing to do."

It's the same thing.  Having a ton of content that people don't enjoy doesn't mean it's content.

Cataclysm was a perfect example of this. It was severely criticized at launch for the lack of new content. The response was "well, look at all the new stuff they did in the 1-60 zones!"  That's great, except all my toons were level 80+ so it didn't apply to me.

I don't PvP. 

Grinding reputations through mob kills (Draenor launch reps) is not fun for me.

I've got exalted with all the Tanaan reps on three toons.

I already have over 200 pets at level 25, and I've no desire to camp the few rare pets I have left to capture to get the zookeeper achievement.

The thing is: if there are a lot of people that do not have things they want to do, that's effectively the same thing as there *is* nothing to do.  It's like the people that say "well, you haven't cleared mythic HfC, so you have plenty left to do in the game!"  Technically, that's True, but I am not a hardcore raider anymore. I might pug a normal here and there, but I'm never going to do mythics. That content might as well not exist for me.I disagree. Removing threat generation as a primary game mechanic is what allowed them to focus tanks on things like active mitigation.  It's not like threat was exactly an interesting mechanic.  When I tanked back in the day (and to be fair, I started when TBC launched, not Vanilla, but they didn't change the threat mechanics until much later), it was "let tank pull and get some threat, *then* you can unload."  On a warrior, it was "wait for 5 sunders." On a druid it was "wait for mangle debuff," and on a paladin it was... oh who's kidding, paladins could load their threat up front by TBC that there was no waiting, just see the shield fly and then unload.

The only reason Vanilla bosses were harder in the threat category is that they made almost all of them immune to taunt.  But there was nothing interesting or fun about the tank getting knocked back and having their threat drop and have their maximum threat ceiling drop.  That's right, they actually made it so it was literally impossible for the tank to continue to raise their threat higher.  That wasn't interesting, nor was threat as a mechanic. 

But even *if* they changed it back, Onyxia would still not be an interesting fight.  Phase one is a simple tank and spank with the tank's threat reducing continually throughout the fight. The only real "mechanic" to worry about is making sure as a DPS/healer that you don't get tossed into the eggs.  Phase two was a simple add phase - whelps that spawn that have to be AoE'd down (and since threat generation on all the whelps was impossible, it was simply AoE and use defensive CDs to not die) and a big add that had to be burned. The only interesting part of that phase was moving out of the way of Deep Breath, which is a mechanic that is so commonplace now it wouldn't be a slight issue (and likely DBM/BW would paint an arrow so you know exactly where it was going to hit). Phase three was nearly identical to phase 1, except add in the occasional fear and the ground fissures.  It wasn't a difficult fight, and especially with the kind of mechanics we see today, the mechanics of that fight are easier than many 5-man fights.

I'm not normally one to point out popular youtubers and their thoughts, but Preach had a fantastic video about a month ago or so on threat. I recommend checking it out.&gt; It's not really mean't to take up a lot of time, but it would still give you something more to do if it was a means of progressing your character or alt, and having a variety of ways to do it.

But then what would be the point?  Why spend the development time on something that isn't going to give people a lot to do?  That's why people point to Halion as such a shit fight. It's not that the fight itself was bad, it actually was quite a bit of fun IMHO, and had some interesting mechanics with the void realm or whatever it was called.  But during the ICC content drought, everyone was so excited to be getting something new and then it was something that took up an hour or two of your week (less than that if you were already geared and/or already had the fight down)... the net result was that people look back and say "that was a shit way to 'tide us over' until Cataclysm."  At least when Cataclysm's pre-patch hit, there were the hourly elemental raids on the major cities and the new mini-bosses we could go kill.

&gt; I 100% agree on the filling up the bar thing, I feel like they took that from recent MMOs, but honestly I just think it's boring and doesn't feel like it delivers.

Exactly.  I see the benefit, especially from playing GW2. You don't have to fight as much for specific objectives, you can get progress doing whatever you want in that area.  But ultimately, it feels very unrewarding to just see your bar fill up... and in some zones the disparity between the amount you get for kills versus other things is insane.  Like the Fel Forge - I'll fly around finding bombs and bombing the cannons long before I start trying to kill things because you get SO much more progress.  Having actual objectives - kill X number of this mob, collect X number of this item. Kill this specific named mob, etc. That gives me a solid path of what I'm going to be doing, rather than just running around doing *whatever.* And, actual quests let you decide how much you are going to do.  Pick up the quests and start, but if you decide you aren't going to have time to finish all of them, you can just go kill that one named mob or whatever.

I think Isle of QD did this the best.  You had a lot of different quests you picked up, but if you didn't have time to do them all, you did all the ones in one specific area and then turned in, so you at least got *some* rep and *some* reward.  The Legendary thing, I think, was a terrible move in both MoP and WoD.  I primarily run LFR and I say that the Legendary shouldn't be obtainable in LFR. At least, not "current content" LFR. Well, really, I don't think the Legendary should be easily obtainable by everyone lol.

I think TBC did it the best in terms of content being added.  With the daily limit of 10 dailies, and with so many reps at max level, by the time they launched Sunwell and the Isle of QD, there were still plenty of people working on getting Skyguard, Ogrila, and Netherwing rep.  You would choose every day which reps were important enough to work on. The reps that gave "power" items, like gear and recipes, were able to be worked on via dungeons. The reps that were purely cosmetic (Skygaurd, Netherwing) had a good amount of dailies and provided rewards that were exciting to see once you got them (you didn't have everyone riding around on Nether Drakes). They didn't feel grindy, but at the same time you couldn't just spam yourself to exalted.I agree with all of these.  

I'd also recommend Western Plaguelands, Southern Barrens, Stonetalon (at least on Horde side, cannot speak for Alliance side), Worgen starting zone (tells, essentially, the other side of what is happening on the Forsaken zones). 

In TBC, I always recommend Nagrand on Horde side, get to see a lot more of where Garrosh came from. 

Cataclysm - If you can stand the underwater aspect of it, the actual storyline of Vash'jr is awesome (and explains why you are in the dungeon when you get there). I also recommend Mount Hyjal to completion and at least the starting questline in Twilight Highlands.

MoP - Finish Jade Forest. You'll level out of it, but the ending of that zone is awesome. If you can gather up the gumption to do both Krasarang and Valley of Four Winds, it has a pretty epic ending as well, but getting to that point kind of sucks. 

WoD - if you've not finished Frostfire as Horde, do so, it's probably my favorite ending to a zone in all of WoW. Finishing the assault on Shattrath in the Talador questline is great (you don't need to do all of Talador, just follow the quests laid out by Khadgar). Lore wise, Spires is awesome to learn more about the Arrakoa (and helps makes sense for Skyreach a bit more). &gt; Well there isn't really precedent for it

Well, there is Valeera Sanguinar. While she never officially switched sides, she was a blood elf that was in the gladiator team with Broll (NE Druid) and Lo'gash (aka Varian's stronger half).  She continued being a part of "their team" even after they left the gladiator arenas and Varian was re-united with himself, and they went to AQ to rescue he-who-must-not-be-named.  She was probably the closest to a full fledged Alliance Blood Elf we've seen.It would depend on the race, to be honest. But they were likely be met with *enormous* distrust even if they managed to join.

Horde going Alliance:

Orc - No Alliance would ever trust an orc 100% to be part of the Alliance, no matter what the circumstances. This is especially evident in their completely-reasonable-but-still-no-trust in Thrall. For all he's done as a neutral  Shaman to heal the world, he's still seen as Horde.

Troll - same with Orcs. They are just far too ingrained in the Horde to ever have them be trusted as Alliance.

Tauren - likely a trial period of some sort. Tauren, of all the Horde, would be the most likely to be accepted due to how honorable they are.  But Tauren are too honorable to actually turn their backs on the Horde, as evident by how they still reluctantly followed Garrosh because they put Horde above themselves.

Forsaken - The only possible way I could see it is if it was a Forsaken with living relatives still in the Alliance. But due to the events at the Wrathgate and Sylvanas' general bat-shit craziness, they would likely never be trusted under any circumstance.

Blood Elf - They were almost going to be re-joining the Alliance during MoP.  Varian had been in talks with Lorethremar and they were going to leave the Horde because of Garrosh. When Jaina responded to the betrayal of certain Dalaran blood elves in the theft of the Bell by killing or imprisoning every blood elf in Dalaran, it ruined that. Now, they'd likely not want to join back in.

Goblin - I'm not sure the *Horde* even trusts them. 

Alliance to Horde:

Humans/Dwarves: Would never be trusted. Too much bad blood.

Night Elves: The only way would be if the Tauren could vouch for that specific Night Elf. But the history would likely be too deep for Orcs to ever trust Night Elves.  Possibly if it was one of the remnants of Shrendralar, since they've not been part of the Horde/Alliance conflicts.

Gnomes:  Let's be honest, if a gnome wanted to join the Horde, the Horde would let it happen. You can't help but trust those little guys, and enough of them are crazy like the goblins, they'd enjoy it.

Worgen: The only way the Worgen would be accepted is if the Alliance was showing the same distrust/disdain for those "monsters" as they showed toward the Forsaken, or they were used like the Blood Elves.  Otherwise, no way would they be accepted due to the fighting between the Forsaken and the Worgen.

Draenei: Never. Too much history on both sides for that to *ever* happen.  Now, an eredar/draenei warlock? A broken? Maybe.

And finally:

Pandaren: Let's be honest, if this was "real," the Pandaren wouldn't be 100% trusted by either side.  Two cubs that grew up together make a choice at the last second to join a faction after knowing the factions for a few hours/days?  No way would either side truly trust that they wouldn't just go and support the other side in an instant.Main issue would be somehow making her hostile towards the Alliance as well.  Kul Tiras basically part of the Alliance, and if they rose again and she attacked UC, there's no way the Alliance would try to stop that, and most likely would join in that.  

But they'd have to have the Alliance oppose Kul Tiras for some reason, otherwise it just becomes a story about the Alliance going to fight for Lordaeron, which sounds awesome at first, until we realize how one sided the story would be.  It wouldn't have any lasting power; and let's be perfectly honest, they're never going to have the Forsaken lose Undercity. &gt; I was always more of an epic quest adventure kind of guy. I enjoyed the journey as more than the rewards. Those days are over, and they are not coming back, which is cool I guess.

Eh, not necessarily. They could have done it with Tanaan.  Many of the "rares" in Tanaan could have simply been named mobs. You get quests to go kill them, and destroy things, and kill mobs. Imagine, for example, getting the Fel Forge as your daily. Instead of one quest (go disrupt activities at the Fel Forge), you get four - Go kill Forgemaster Whats-her-name, go destroy 3 cannons, go kill 8 warlocks, go kill 12 engineers.  It would feel like the type of quest they used to have. 

&gt; The one point I will stand firm on is that automatching, the nerfing of the world, and crossrealm convenience absolutely destroyed the community as a whole.

I see both sides of it. I remember the days of not being able to finish certain quests because I just couldn't find a group. It was terrible. I had a few elite quests in Icecrown that sat there for weeks because I was never on when my guild was on (they were west coast and I was central) and people didn't want to join up.  I remember sitting in Shatt/Dalaran for an hour spamming "LFG H MgT" or "LFM H Nexus" or whatever.  It wasn't fun when I'd be in a dungeon and lose someone and then have to have someone hearth out and start trying to find a new group. 

But, at the same time, I've nothing to make me care about who else is on my server. The only name I know is the name of a person notorious of racist/homophobic/sexists statements that I block on every alt I have.  

&gt; even with regular questing gear I am far too powerful vs the mobs I encounter.

Agreed.  The only point in WoD that I felt challenged in regular questing gear was when I got to Nagrand. If you went there at level with the appropriate level gear, getting dismounted by a pack of wolves or accidentally pulling extra clefthoofs was bad news. But two or three pieces of gear later and it was easy again.  I will say it sometimes depends on your class/spec.  My priest died a lot while leveling because she's so squishy, couldn't burn things down, and her self healing was lacking.  My warrior sometimes had issues because of self healing issues. But my hunter, warlock, paladin, and DK were stupid easy.&gt; PvP

I've never been a PvPer. Was not an issue in prior expansions. I still had plenty to do.

&gt; Battle Pets

I have over 187 max level battle pets at rare quality. I have collected every pet available in the game except the super rares like the mini-infernal.  It also is primarily *past expansion* content. It takes 15 minutes to complete all the trainers in Draenor and another 15 for all the Tanaan pets.  

&gt; Collections (mounts, companions, transmogs, etc.)

Running old raids for mounts is not WoD content, that's old content. I have all the droppable mounts in WoD except Poundfist (and camping for a rare mob for hours upon hours is *not* content). The only mounts I am missing from WoD are the raid mounts (which falls under the raid category).  I have every companion obtainable by simply playing the game (or could obtain if I wanted to spend the gold on them). The only companions I could still be going to collect are Inn companions. Is going to my inn once a week and pressing the "recruit" button really considered content?  I also have double the number of companions inactive since there is a max of 25 active and they do not bring new and interesting traits because you recruited that one new guy.  I have all the unique transmog specific items from WoD. Again, running *old content* for transmog is not content *for WoD*.

&gt; Challenge modes

There is one. Which also requires an organized group of people to do. Challenge modes existed in MoP, but I did not feel compelled to participate in them because there was plenty of other things to do.

&gt; Titles

Like what? What WoD titles are there that do not involve raiding to work on?

&gt; Achievements

Again, like what? What WoD achievements are there that do not involve raiding?  And again, with both this and titles, if you're having to resort to some obscure activity to point out content, it's showing a severe lack.

&gt; No, that's not at all True. By that logic, I can say that League is a shitty game because lots of people (myself included) don't play it. That doesn't make me right.

That's not even a close comparison.  It would be more like the various featured Game Modes of League. Every year, League comes out with new modes.  Most of those modes end up being temporary because, as League says themselves, they have an immediate splash of popularity and then wane, so they remove them so they can make them better.  Some modes, the ones that players did not like, never get re-introduced. They just disappear.

&gt; All of the rest of your comment is exactly what I'd said in my original post: you just don't like the content available, and that's fine. WoW isn't for everyone, and there's thousands of other games you could play.

Here's the issue with that statement: This was not a problem in the past for me, and it was due to a game change.  I've been playing WoW since 2006, and this is the first expansion that I've hit max level in and found a lack of things to do.  

In TBC, I had a plethora of 5-mans that took time and were challenging, I had factions that had a variety of dailies that took time to complete, there were various world challenges that I could participate in, I had to actually work at my professions and getting what was needed to craft things, I had to work at obtaining gold to be able to buy things.  In Wrath, I again had a variety of factions and dailies I could do, I again had a plethora of 5-mans that, while much easier than TBC, were still fun and with the amount of them could take an entire day to do all of them, I again had crafting and gold making that actually took time to do, and a world PvP zone that even as a non-PvPer I had a vested interest to do because of the fact that it unlocked a raid boss for the PvE gear I crazed.  In Cataclsym, at launch, there was a lack of things to do at max level, but the 5-mans were challenging and took a lot of time and there were a few factions (not nearly as many as the prior two expansions, but a few), there was still crafting and gold making to be done, and as the expansion went on they added even more to do, with new 5-mans and a massive amount of dailies with the Molten Front and Hyjal, and another PvP zone that enticed us PvE'ers to do for the raid boss inside (not to mention even the rewards you could get from Tol Barad).  In MoP, I had a *massive* amount of dailies I could do (and if I wasn't a raider, those were fun rather than obligatory), and some of those factions provided very unique mount rewards (the dragons, the crane), and there was again a goal of money making for things like the Yak mount. World bosses that still held an appeal even late into the expansion, Two of the three major content patches added a huge amount of new quests to do, with new scenarios, reasons to go out to those areas even if you'd maxed out your gear and your rep (especially Isle of Thunder), and new world bosses that were actually challenging and not loot pinatas.  

Now?  I log in, I do my garrison (and even then, I don't do the whole thing anymore since I don't need the mats I needed early in the expansion), I can do the one single daily offered from my garrison command table (which is another "fill up a bar" quest for a whopping 800 apexis crystals). I can go kill a single named mob or do a 15 minute quest from Harrison Jones (which provides nothing for me, since I have already obtained him on all 12 of my level 100s). I can go to Tanaan, but for what? Like I said, I've hit exalted on all the factions on three toons already. The only benefit to increasing my rep on any character is for the Oil Rig, so I can get oil for a shipyard I no longer need to use (I have finished the legendary, I have the pet, the only thing missing is 2 of the 3 rings, but since I cannot actually "grind" for them, it's a crap shoot if it will show up even).  I don't even need the gear from Tanaan because I already have all my gear maxed out for non-raiding content.

All of that was *content.*  Are you really calling pet battles, farming for mounts, transmogs, achievements, and farming for "rare things" as content?  

Even if you do, *all* of that existed in past expansions, *and more*.  So even if I grant you that all of those things were truly "content," where is the rest of it?  Where are the multiple daily hubs? Where were the new zones as the expansion went on?  We got one, and it is extremely short lived and rather shallow.  Where were the new dungeons? When you have to resort to things like *pet battles* to bide your time, that's pretty pathetic. 

Edit: And don't get me wrong - I do not hate WoD.  I've not unsubbed and don't plan on unsubbing. I do a lot every time I play, but a lot of what I do is old stuff or pointless stuff. I enjoy playing the game, and I'm not a "WoD was the worst expansion ever" person, that was Cataclysm to me.  I've defended the expansion a lot. But I'm also a realist - this expansion has lacked content. It lacked it at launch, and they've barely brought anything new into the expansion since it launched. 

Edit2: Went back and checked the number of battle pets, I'm "only" at 187 max level rare battle pets.  I thought my number was high.  I am, however, at 354 rare pets and 595 total pets.

Edit 3: 

&gt; My turn for a question: What exactly is it that you consider "content," 

Variety and choice. Things that don't involve needing to create activities or find things to do. Things that don't involve going back and doing old content.  Things like new dungeons (and while I love Timewalking dungeons, they are old content redone, not new content). Things like new zones with actual quests (Tanaan was a good start, but 1/2 the quests are just "go to this area and fill up a bar."

&gt; why do you think 100% of the playerbase wants that?

When did I say that I did?  I'm not saying that the stuff that we have is not fun.  I enjoyed Tanaan (I'm tired of it now), I enjoyed the heroics. I enjoy mythics 5-mans. The stuff that we have I either enjoy or enjoyed at some point.  There's just not enough of it. That's been the problem. 

I've never had an experience in the game like I did in WoD, where upon hitting max level I would finish all the organized max level - non-raid content within a week. (OK, crafting too me longer than that, but that was because I had no choice but to wait for my daily CD to level up my profession more). Within a week of hitting max level on my first character, to be going back to old content to farm mounts, or pet hunting, or interesting achievement hunting (some of which you couldn't even do unless it happened to be for the apexis zone that was offered as the daily that day), means there was lacking.  

Those are the types of things that should be enticing as things to do after you've had a few months of experiencing the content, not that you should be doing in the first month of the content.  And we had that same content essentially until 6.2.  Sure, 6.1 added a couple of quests, but the Harrison Jones quest and the "random elite" quest the garrison offered in 6.1 was a *very* small addition when you compare to things like the Molten Front in Cata, the Argent Tourney grounds in Wrath (both the "small" addition with Ulduar and the main addition with ToC), and the Krasarang daily hubs in MoP. &gt; I would argue that is a positive thing in an MMO. You shouldn't get your way all the time. Failure is what makes winning mean something. I feel like in WoD, I win almost the time except at the very highest level of the game and that is a very small portion of the overall content.

It's a Catch-22.  I think WoD is too far in the "too easy to win," but required group quests, on the other hand, could be very frustrating.  Not because they were hard, but because if you couldn't find a group you were simply stuck.  Ironically, with cross realm grouping and group finder, I think they could bring back group quests.  I think in WoD, they should have made the "scenarios" that ended zones be actually difficult and player-killing. Not impossible difficult, but more than just "sit there and kill things with no threat to you."&gt; Velen shows us that he can forgive anyone, even those who kidnap his Intergalatic Windchimes and siphon their magic for sustenance. Not to mention, the Draenei always manage to team up with the Blood Elves in some manner, even if it is tenuous (TBC), but post TBC they are pretty chill.

Velen is, but the majority of the Draenei haven't shown that level of forgiveness. Look at Maraad versus Velen.  I think teaming up and cooperating is quite a bit different than a full fledged switch of allegiances.

&gt; Valeera is proof that you don't really need to be Horde to be a Blood Elf, she's kinda there doing her own thing

Yeah, but by that regard, you could make similar arguments for almost any race. Forgiving Draenei like Velen, a Worgen who felt pushed away due to his "animal" nature, a tauren who doesn't like the ferocity of the horde, etc.  There are outliers for everyone. Valeera is the exception. And even for her, there was a lot of reference to the fact that she pledged no allegiance to the Horde, but to her people she did.  For the people as a whole, they felt betrayed by Jaina for her actions in Dalaran, and cut off talks of peace.

&gt; Haven't been to Stormwind much, have you? The Trolls have had representatives there since I believe Cataclysm when the Hostile Trolls started to reemerge. The Darkspear Trolls, are pretty respected by the Alliance, almost as much as the Tauren.

Unless it's recently changed, the troll I saw there was on the docks with a contingent of soldiers with weapons pointed.  It's also an in-game reason alone - from a lore standpoint, that fight is over and there is not a troll representative still hanging around. They were there due to a greater threat.  I mean, I have humans hanging around in my garrison, but that doesn't mean a human would consider joining the horde or that the Horde would truly accept them.  Overall, the Darkspears *are* respected by the Alliance, but they are also seen as a core to the Horde. If a Darkspear showed up wanting to flat out *join* the Alliance, they'd be wary - why would one of the central cores of the Horde (especially now with Vol'jin as Warchief) turn there backs on that same Horde and join with the enemy?

&gt; It wasn't so much honor that kept the Tauren following Garrosh... it was more so Baine not wanting his people to get his people murdered. He is still fighting against the Centaurs, Gnolls, and what have you. They couldn't afford to fight the Orcs as well.

True, and I may be wrong, but I seem to remember in Tides of War when Jaina offers asylum to the tauren, that the response given was also that of their commitment to the Horde as a whole as a reason for not being able to take it. I'd have to re-read it (and I only have it as audio), but I'm almost sure of it.Well, V4W we didn't cause the problem... but Jade Forest we most certainly caused everything!Even as a DPS, it still wasn't much of a "mechanic." Especially with all the classes that did get threat drops (sorry warriors and shamans) by TBC. It was almost always just "wait a few seconds, then you're good to go."  The only time it became an issue was if you strongly outgeared your tank (or if your tank so strongly outgeared the content that they couldn't get rage in order to generate threat, which started the whole "tank without your pants" problem).  

Yes, there was some care you had to give, but even as a warlock that only had a 50% threat dump, if I could pay attention for just the first minute of the fight, then soul shatter, I wasn't going to catch back up under any circumstance.Truth. My buddy who raided in Vanilla would tell me all the conspiracy theories of what causes Deep Breath.&gt; How much /played do you have?

Not that much, per character.  That's the exact problem. That I *can* complete the content that easily and that fast.  There was simply too much that was either 1) Time gated, or 2) Spammable, or 3) Account wide.  Take the reputations for example.  I didn't grind that out right away, but once I had it on one character, what was the drive to do it on another?  The pets and mounts were account wide, the toys are now account wide. They serve no purpose.  

This was the first expansion that I'd run out of things to do on a character and have to move on to the next.  I mean, you hit level 90 in MoP and you had hours of dailies you could do before even finishing that first day at level 90, and it just got more and more as the expansion went on.  When it was time to level an alt in MoP, I had to bench one of the max level characters because there was simply too much to do.

I don't even play nightly. Between all 12 characters, I'm sitting at around 400 days played since 2006, which is hardly large potatoes, and a majority of that time was pre-WoD.  But you can hit ilvl 675 in  *single day* now with Tanaan, especially with all the BoA tokens you get from various activities.  

&gt; WoD did two things well: Leveling experience and raid experience. But, still. If you've sunk that much time into the game, unless you were doing AND not having fun, I'd have to say WoD was successful.

I've not said once that I haven't enjoyed the expansion. I have, very much so. I'm not sure when you replied versus my edit/additions, but I've not unsubbed and have no intention of unsubbing. I've not claimed WoD was a failure, I think it's been a great expansion.  But its been a great expansion to have 12 alts to play around with.  My wife would have been unsubbed a long time ago if not for buying time with gold... she plays once per week due to her school schedule and work schedule, but with two max level characters (technically four, but two of them she just got to 100 so they'd be ready for Legion), she's done it all as well. 

&gt; If you have 12 toons to 100, completed all of the WoD content with them all and geared them out to pre-raid gear quality

I've not geared them all out or completed it on all of them, just to point that out.  Thing is, though, is that I shouldn't *need* to switch over to alt after alt to redo stuff. I shouldn't have been able to run out of actual content in the first month of a brand new expansion. I shouldn't be having to resort to stuff like "finding transmog outfits" or "searching for rare stuff" or "old content" because there's nothing else to do in that first month of the expansion.Really?  Oh man, it was so commonplace back in TBC.  

As a warrior and druid, you got rage from taking damage and only taking damage. As a paladin, you got mana based on how much health you gained when you were healed.  If you did heroics in T5 or especially T6 gear, you didn't take enough damage, so you'd not get rage or you'd run out of mana because you wouldn't be getting effective heals, so you couldn't use your threat gen abilities. The easiest way to compensate for this was just unequip your pants (or whatever other piece of gear you wanted) so you'd take damage again.  Or /sit so you'd get a guaranteed critical hit.I enjoyed it, but I had a goal and had quests to do, even if the quests were "fill up a bar," but now I go out there just to get oil and rep on the alts that still need the oil rig, and hate it.  

Timeless Isle was a boring grind for me. It was "run around and kill stuff and hope you're close enough to that rare when it pops."  It was like Tanaan but with less lol&gt; The people being betrayed by Jaina is because of the actions of someone who went behind all of their backs for their own gain. Aethas' inaction with (this stuff was mostly removed from the game, though snippits exist still in game.) the knowledge he had that there was a faction of Sunreavers going to take action for Garrosh to obtain the Divine Bell from Darnassus is proof that the Blood Elves have a habit of falling for half truths from within their own leadership let alone the Horde, Alliance, and what have you.

Oh, I wasn't commenting on whether her actions were justified or not, but it just adds to the reasons why Blood Elves would never (now) be able to join the Alliance.

&gt; Outside of some minor spats and skirmishes here and there. Can we really say the Horde and Alliance are truly enemies anymore?

I've been saying this for a LONG time.  In reality, it never truly came back. It's felt shoehorned for a long time.  Every time it gets to where no right-minded person would think there's a real conflict, they do something to "fan the flames" : Wrathgate, Garrosh being a general idiot at the end of Wrath/Beginning of Cata, Theramore, "Landfall."  The worst, to me, was *War Crimes*.  At a time when everyone was actually united against one person - Garrosh - they just seemed to shoehorn in the need for Horde and Alliance to hate each other.  I especially hate what they did to Jaina. I understand where they are making her come from, but of all Alliance leaders, she was the only one who was ever able to look past the actions of individuals in the Horde and see that Orcs/Tauren/Trolls/etc are not inherently evil, but that bad apples within do bad things.  Then Theramore happens and "all Horde is bad and must be destroyed."

&gt; I think Baine might have became one of my favorite leaders, and I didn't realize it until just now.

Agreed!  I loved Cairne before him and love him!

&gt; The idea of crossing the faction line, and if you'd be accepted is intriguing for sure. Of course trust would have to be earned, but I think many of the Horde could cross that fence to join the Alliance with very little issue.

Someone like Baine? Sure. But what I gathered, the OPs question was more of an individual type thing, not one of the major lore characters.  I had two goals when Tanaan opened: get the achievement for flying so I'd be ready when it came out, and get the mount for 150k crystals. Once I had that, the appeal rapidly dropped off.

&gt; Did you run the rarespawn timers in Timeless ?

Yeah, but it still just felt like a rush around grind.  Too often I would be doing one that I just wouldn't be able to get away from and to the next one before it was going to spawn...  I think it was the lack of what felt like "fun" quests. Collecting the stones and killing X mobs and Y rares just seemed to drag on.  

Though, I still need to go back and get my rep for the mount....Ha!  

Also, I feel dirty if I go back and do the 5-man with Yulon's battle in it and have her child as my active pet... Like "hey, I know my people caused this corruption and that's why I'm now fighting you, but look! I brought your baby!"&gt; you don't like the content that's available to you.

You aren't listening.  *I'm not saying I do not enjoy that content.* I've done it, it's been finished. It was finished it a month!  

What I'm saying is that the amount of content they provided was simply not enough. You are completely ignoring the disparity between every past expansion's available content versus WoD.  That's the complaint, not that the content that is there is not good.

Every thing you mentioned: PvP, Battle Pets, Collections (mounts, companions, transmogs, etc.), Challenge modes, Titles, Achievements....  All of those things were also available in past expansions.  But past expansions offered significantly more *beyond* that.  

Look at the offerings between MoP and WoD:

At launch:

MoP - at least a dozen daily quests (actually much more, but I'm not going back to count all of them), which became even more once you got revered with Golden Lotus. 8 Factions, all which had rewards that could both be applied account wide (once mounts were account wide) and character (VP/Rep gear). Two world bosses. 9 dungeons. 7 scenarios. 6 master pet masters and three legendary pandarian spirit pet masters, 10 legendary pet battles. 

WoD - One daily quest. Four factions, one of which is *only* available for PvPing in Ashran. Rewards are purely cosmetic, many of them account wide (pets, toys, mounts). Two world bosses. 8 dungeons.  A re-doing of the already existing brawler's guild (a few new bosses, but at the removal of many of the old bosses)

First patch:

MoP - A new faction.  Zone changes with new quest hubs. 6 or more daily quests for these zones. PvP objectives in these zones. New questline/storyline that progressed as you progressed through the zone. A new faction. 4 new scenarios. New/more gear. New/more mounts. Brawler's Guild with 6 ranks of fights.

WoD - the Selfie Camera (and don't get me wrong, I *love* the selfie camera, but it's a toy, it's not content). Garrison update.  The daily garrison visitor which gives you - 1 Account Wide pet battle daily. 1 daily to turn in resources for primals. 1 daily to do a dungeon (that rewarded Garrison Resources, which at the time was not lacking in the game). 1 daily to kill a random elite mob out in the world (with no achievement attached, and the reward was a small sum of gold). 1 daily that actually gave a decent set of short quests.  Of effective *things to do*, it gave two things: the elite mob and the Harrison.  No other additions.

Second Patch:

MoP - An entire new island, unlocked through solo scenarios and gradually by the entire server. Daily quest hub that sent you to various other quest hubs. Elite mobs to kill for more rare rewards. A solo scenario (separate from the ones that unlock the zone). New faction. A zone based questline that unlocks as the zone unlocks (part of the solo scenarios mentioned before). A *second* island of elites with grinds/quests to obtain various pets and a mount. Two world bosses (at least one of which was very difficult).  Two new ranks of Brawler's guild.

WoD- An entire new zone, unlocked through a questline, and all at once. A daily quest hub with a set of 5 dailies, three of which are copy/paste "go to area and fill up bar." A weekly quest. A slew of elites, four of which drop mounts, the rest of which drop gear *of a lesser quality than the random drops and purchased gear for the zone*.  A world boss (which is arguably one of the easiest world bosses I've seen, but that's beside the point). Three factions, all but one of which are only achieved through the same 5 quests you get from the one hub (i.e. no separate hubs per faction). A four part questline that unlocks weekly regardless of what you've done. 15 Legendary pets to battle for the pet battler. Timewalking Dungeons (fun to do, but they are, quite simply, doing old content).

Third Patch:

MoP - An entire area of quests in preparation for the final raid. Four new scenarios. Heroic scenarios. 

WoD - Flying. Some new rare mobs in the zones that you now could fly to. 

Fourth Patch:

MoP - Another entire island with a small number of dailies, endlessly respawning rares, a questline leading into the next expansion, yet another faction. Two world bosses (technically 5, but I'm counting the Celestials as one since you can only loot them once). Proving Grounds. Item upgrades (giving reasons to run dungeons again)

WoD - (Expected) New Timewalking Dungeons (again, I love them, but it's doing content I did years ago). Item upgrades (giving reasons to run dungeons again).

______

An none of that is to talk about the PvP side of things, which from what I've heard (remember, I'm not a PvPer), WoD offered no new BGs, MoP offered quite a number. WoD offered no new arena maps, MoP offered a few.  Ashran was the only thing added for PvP in WoD, and if I believe what I read it was a disaster at the start and they've not added to it, only changed things to make it less disastrous.  

______

So tell me, can you truly look at a list like that (and that's what I can recall without going in depth into the patch notes on each patch) and say that they've even slightly come close to the amount of content they provided in prior expansions in WoD? 

Again, everything you've mentioned as content also existed in prior expansions (well, not everything, since some were added in MoP and some in Cata). But the amount of stuff beyond those things available and added throughout WoD versus MoP is ridiculous. 

And if I went back to Cataclysm, Wrath, and TBC, I bet I would find the same thing.  You cannot honestly look at what they've put in the game during WoD, both launch and in the patches since, and say that it's been anywhere close to a comparison of the previous expansions.That's what they should have been doing from the start. Adding something like a "gateway raid" at the end of the expansion wouldn't provide a benefit to anyone.

I think the thing they could do for "gateway raiding" would be to actually have the regular raids be winged instances like LFR is.  One of the issues of trying to progress from LFR into normal is the feeling of commitment. I can queue up for LFR, get in and do three bosses, then be done for the night, no harm done. If the next night I want to continue, I just queue up for the wings I haven't done yet.

Normal?  Sure, I *can* join a raid and leave when I'm done, but then that leaves the raid I was with needing to replace me (not as bad now, with flex mode integration, but if I'm a healer or a tank...). If I do the first three bosses, then when I want to do one again, I need to find a group either in the same spot I was in, I have to redo a boss I've killed already, or I have to skip a boss.  

If HfC was set up as "wings" like LFR (they could even lead into each other like the ICC 5-mans did, so people don't have to leave and go back in if they want to continue), then I could search for the wing(s) I still need rather than trying to find the one boss that I was at.There we go, I like it!I might be wrong, but I thought they specifically said that drop rates for Tomes was no different in different difficulty modes?  I can't search through past blue posts to find it...

But either way, I think being able to get the Legendary through LFR was a mistake (and again, this is coming from a person who mainly does LFR).  That is the only thing that I really think they should have made exclusive to "real raiders."  Of course, I also think they made LFR gear TOO shitty, since it has provided a nice progression path for many people who don't have an interest in "real" raiding (especially trinkets and set bonuses).  I think they should have made trinkets that are at least fun (just have to not make them good enough to entice raiders to run LFR for them early on) and make set bonuses for LFR sets not count towards regular raid sets.&gt; Then why did you list off all the content you didn't finish?

What? I didn't list off content I didn't finish. I listed off content I *did* finish. 

&gt; maybe you can refresh my memory about all the fun stuff you did in MoP? 

I did, in the last post. Did you not read it?  

&gt; Remember SoO alone was out for longer than all of WoD.

And?  SoO came out 1 year 5 days into the expansion.  We are at 1 year 1 day into the expansion.  We were *just now* getting ready to get our last major content patch of MoP.  When 6.1 hit in WoD, we were already 112 days into the expansion. It came with the limited amount of stuff I already mentioned.  We were already a month into the *Landfall* patch by that point in the MoP cycle.  When 6.2 hit in WoD, we were 231 days in. We were two months into the Isle of Thunder patch by that point in the MoP cycle.  It took another **70 days** for them to add in 6.2.2 in WoD, with all the amazing things it added (see prior post if you cannot read the sarcasm there).  In MoP, we were had just started the *Escalation* patch.  It took longer for them to add in the flying patch from 6.2 to 6.2.2 than it took them to make all the additions they added in 5.3 from 5.2!  We're already 65 days into 6.2.2, with no release date scheduled for 6.2.3. In 9 days, it'll take longer for them to add 6.2.3 from 6.2.2 than it took to add in the SoO patch!

&gt; I'm not saying WoD had less "stuff" that MoP. I'm saying that complaining about not liking the "stuff", like PvP, doesn't mean there's no "stuff."

To be honest, I'm starting to think you're purposefully ignoring everything and just going back to "if you don't like it, that doesn't mean that it's not content."

So let me phrase it very simply:  **Everything you've cited as content existed in prior expansions, but prior expansions also provided significantly more at launch and in each subsequent patch than in WoD.**  

Do you get it?  

PvP in prior expansions? Check.

Pet battles? Check (as of MoP)

Transmog? Check (as of the last patch of Cata)

Mount hunting? Check

Companions? Okay, no check on this one. So there's a +1 to WoD since Garrisons didn't exist (though my prior point to the fact that all the companions do not each bring some unique measure to your garrison still is valid)

Challenge Modes? Check (as of MoP)

Titles? Check

Achievements? Check

Yet, WoD had fewer dungeons (8 vs 9), no scenarios (and therefore no heroic scenarios), no new BGs, fewer reputation factions (7 vs 11), fewer new zones added in patches (1 vs 3, or 4 if you count the change to Krasarang as a new zone), fewer max level daily quests and questing zones (1 daily at launch vs dozens, 7 added vs dozens again), fewer world bosses (4 vs 6/9 if you include each celestial as a different boss), fewer rewards for the reputations they did have, fewer cosmetic rewards (like mounts and pets) and the rewards in WoD have been heavily criticized for their lack of differentiation (but that is purely subjective), fewer pet battles (trainer/legendary).

In every case available, the content available in the last expansion far *far* outweighs the content available in WoD.  You can make the "just because you don't like it doesn't mean it isn't there" argument all you want. Here is a fact: there is less available now than there was. That has nothing to do with whether I like it or not, it has to do with the fact that there is simply less.

It's like going to McDonald's and ordering a Quarter Pounder with Cheese meal. If every time I'd gone before, it came with a Quarter Pounder with Cheese, large fries, and a large drink; then one day I go and it comes with a Quarter Pounder without cheese, small fries and a medium drink.  I've gotten less. I can like or not like everything that's there, but the fact of the matter is that there is less there than the last time.

And like I said: I do not dislike WoD! I've loved it, I haven't unsubbed, and I don't plan on unsubbing! I still play as often as I can between work, training, and this past month watching baseball... but there is simply less to do in WoD than there has been in any prior expansion.&gt; Maybe tying the Legendary into the XPac story was the bigger mistake. The more challenging Legendaries required a lot of work, and while that work was related to the story of the xpac it wasn't at the core of it.

I think that's my biggest problem.  If you didn't do any of the Legendary, you'd have a lot of major holes in what is happening in WoD.  MoP wasn't *as* bad, but between the dagger line in Cata and the cloak in MoP, it's the only questline that's explained Wrathion. If you'd not done either or watch videos, you'd have no clue who he was or why he matters.&gt; You know, out of all of that, I'd argue the most baffling of the skirmishes isn't even all of that... it's Ashran. It just seems to be a penis waving match for the sake of it. So I like to head canon Ashran into being a non-lethal friendly battleground styled training thing for soldiers to blow off steam between fighting the Iron Horde and to work on skills

I've not done Ashran (the only time I do PvP is when it unlocks something for PvE, like TB/WG or the legendary cloak), so I've honestly no idea of the story there :)Yeah, but there's nothing to that quest after its done. He hatches and names himself during the Rogue questline, if I remember correctly, so as far as you know when you finish that quest (badlands, i think), the red dragons are just taking a purified black egg for safekeeping.ITT: People that take comments way too seriously.Not to get, though.  Even if the mounts require epic flying to use (which I thought they had removed, but not having any toons without it, I cannot test it), rolling a DH and farming them would still be fine.

Also, they likely *will* start with the 280 flying. They did that for the level 90 character boost, they'll likely do it for the level 100, and it wouldn't make sense to not do that for the DHs.They've said the current plan is to start at or around 98, so you'll get to 100 by the time you leave the starting zone, so you'll be able to jump (or double jump har har) right into Legion content.No necessarily True.  Any of the multi-roll classes can have a completely valid reason for having more than one of the same class, if you don't want to have to respec every time you want to switch from PvP to PvE or vice versa.Gold and farming things.

If I make a DH and can jump right into the end of WoD/beginning of Legion, then I can make a lot more gold than I could with a fresh toon or a DK.  I can build up my garrison and make garrison gold, or I could just farm stuff that I couldn't farm otherwise.

I could also make a server of DHs and run old raids for mount farming without having to actually level up to that level.  That goes for any other "farmed" item from old raids.Leveling hasn't had a point since at least Cata. &gt; would I be able to get legendary rings on my alts without catch up mechanics like LFR. Probably not, there are little to no pug groups for HM or BRF as Tanaan has better options.

An easy solution to that would be to have LFR be just for catch up.  When the raid is current, it does not drop the items for the legendary, but once the next raid/tier releases, the old ones drop it.  Between that, the shipyard/mission table, and the tanaan weekly, it would no longer be a problem, and you still don't have people like me, who only do LFR, running around with a legendary ring. 

Or, another option would be to give the quest "upgrade options." Similar to the Archimonde upgrade tokens... If I finish, say, stage 1 on LFR, I get a 655 version of the ring (better than regular drops, but not as good as the normal ring). If I then do HM on normal or above, I get an upgrade token (guaranteed drop for everyone that does it) to upgrade to the regular version.  Same goes for every stage.  I finish the legendary questline in HfC on LFR, I get a 715 version of the ring, which lower stats etc. If I do HfC on normal or above, then I get an upgrade token to 735. Oh, I agree that the Legendary process as they are now sucks.  It felt at least a little bit better in MoP - I liked having the various things you got while you worked through the quest - the socket for the weapon, the meta... and the cloaks, I felt, were better because they were procs rather than a raid wide CD.  

I understand *why* they did what they did. Too many complaints from people who worked as a guild to get the Legendary for one person, then that person either quits the guild or the game or just raiding and there's nothing they can do. 

I think I honestly preferred the "random drop" legendary.  You do the raid, and if it drops, then you get to decide who gets it. Sure, still a lot of drama, but at least then you don't worry about spending months trying to get all the pieces for one person only to have them leave. Or, like what happened in my guild, you are half way through for one person and they leave and you have to start over.

But really, Legendaries in general I think are bad if they are not "personal loot."  The WoD/MoP iteration means that the further in the xpac you get, the more they become mandatory for raiding and joining guilds. The "work as a raid for that one item" causes the aforementioned drama. Same here, I don't have this on anyone.Either way, her wiki also says "The result was a child that, as it would be discovered later, looked surprisingly human."

Edit:

Also: On the wiki for the movie, it says "Paula Patton as Garona Halforcen, a strong-willed survivor caught between the Alliance and the Horde. Half-human and half-orc, she must decide where her True loyalty lies." https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Warcraft_(film). 

Granted, we all know the truth, but if you'd never played the game or read the lore, it would be easy to get confused."The birth of Garona was orchestrated by Gul'dan, who "bred" one of his orcish warriors to a draenei female. The result was a child that, as it would be discovered later, looked surprisingly human."

http://wow.gamepedia.com/Garona_Halforcen"The birth of Garona was orchestrated by Gul'dan, who "bred" one of his orcish warriors to a draenei female. The result was a child that, as it would be discovered later, looked surprisingly human."

http://wow.gamepedia.com/Garona_HalforcenThe lore was originally that she was half-human. They retconned it to make her half-Draenei.  Either way, though: 

"The birth of Garona was orchestrated by Gul'dan, who "bred" one of his orcish warriors to a draenei female. The result was a child that, as it would be discovered later, looked surprisingly human."

http://wow.gamepedia.com/Garona_HalforcenEdit: Sorry, wrong thread.

I'm just pointing out that even in the retcon, she looked human.Much easier to explain away her looks than go back and change everything about how she looked.  She had been established in stories as looking human far too much already.ALL ABOARD!!!!!Yes she can. She just can't (or doesn't) control them.  Replay the Forsaken intro. Everyone resurrected gets a choice. Of course, that choice is either join the Forsaken or die (unless they get away).I had the same thought.  "Varian, Once Ruler of Stormwind. Now the Hand of the Dark Lady, ruler of Lordaeron!"If we're just talking cinematics, the WoD cinematic was pretty damn awesome.So go back to every story and re-write it so she no longer looks human? You really think that would be a better option than simply saying that orc-draenei mixes look surprisingly human? Because it's an easier fix.  "Like most others, she believed she was half-human until the truth was revealed to her."  It's easy to say people thought she was something different, including her, because of her looks.  It's a lot harder to suddenly explain away why everyone thought she looked human and then suddenly didn't look human.And? We're talking about Garona's looks here.

Or if you're just talking about how she looks in the movie, she *is* half-human/half-orc in the move:

"Paula Patton as Garona Halforcen, a strong-willed survivor caught between the Alliance and the Horde. **Half-human and half-orc**, she must decide where her True loyalty lies."

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Warcraft_(film)I was under the assumption that we're talking about her character in the warcraft universe, not in the movie.  She has a long history in the Warcraft universe, going back and just changing her just wouldn't make any sense.  The fact that they retconned her to be half draenei was due to the realization that it was impossible for her to have been half-human, since she had come through the dark portal already aged and there were no humans.  They even started that process in *The Last Guardian*, with Khadgar and Medivh saying she might be mixed with a "human-like race" on Draenor.Do you not pay attention to the lore at all?  Go read through her wiki or something.

From her wiki entry: "Gul'dan had her magically aged and tortured, later also placing controls on her mind to ensure obedience." Citation From *The Gathering* comic. Night elves don't come into the mix until the Third War, when the Legion invades. Where did you get that?  You said she's too old. She was too old to be half-anything. All the events of the pre-Azeroth invasion would have made it impossible for her to be half-orc/half-human *and* half orc/half-draenei.  The timeline when WC1 came out was not fleshed out enough, and when it was, this was a glaring error, no matter what her other half was.No, where did you get me saying she's not half draenei? 

&gt; Also I said she was to old to be half human.

She was aged magically. Whether we're going original lore or retconned lore (i.e. whether we go with her being half-human or half-draenei) she was too old. 

In the LORE, she is half-draenei, which caused her to "surprisingly look human." She was aged magically, as even being half-draenei she would be too old to exist in the first invasion.

In the MOVIE, she's listed on the wiki as half-human. We don't know if they'll explain her age, but you can make the assumption that it would still fit with the aged magically.  Or, they don't provide her backstory as to why she's a half-breed and the timeline isn't fleshed out enough to matter.

So if we're talking the LORE: aged magically.

If we're talking the MOVIE: probably also aged magically.That's what they would have to do. I can't imagine Alliance players in any circumstance being OK with Varian becoming a powerful force for the Horde.How long do you think passed between when the orcs started warring with the Draenei and the portal?  It wasn't that long, not long enough for her to be a fully grown adult.

&gt; saying she is aged magically is a terrible cop out

They did it to all the orc children. It's in *Rise of the Horde*.&gt; There is no reason for "aged magically" to exist other than to work around the timeline.

The orcs needed warriors to fight the Draenei. That had nothing to do with timeline.  Yes, applying that to Garona was to serve the timeline, but the concept of aging magically was not done for some timeline workaround.

&gt; Is it only possible for an orc and a draenei to have sex is if both races are at war with each other?

Her entire background was, from the start, based around her being a mind-controlled tool of Gul'dan. She wasn't ever some love child of an orc and some other race. But, even then, if you read *Rise of the Horde*, prior to the wars, the two races did not do anything together.  The only time any of the Orcs come into contact with the Draenei was when Durotan and Ogrim are rescued when they are attacked by an Ogre. They'd not even heard of the Draenei before then.

But whatever, it's clear you think Blizzard storytelling is shit.  Not even sure why you're watching a trailer for the movie.  I guess some of us don't expect that the first time they made a game they'd have a fully fleshed out lore as in depth as would come in the 21 years since that first game.  I don't see how it's a half measure.  She was a character in the first game, when they didn't have 90% of the story of this universe worked out.  At that time, they had made her half-human/half-orc because of her role as the assassin that would be able to get in with the humans to get close to King Llane to kill him.  But they didn't *have* a lore at that point, so it didn't matter.  I mean, at that time, the orcs simply came from another dimension, not another planet.  

As they fleshed out the lore, it became clear that they couldn't have her be half-human.  Once they determined the orcs to come from an entirely new plant, they couldn't have a grown creature somehow be half-human. So they were in a pickle - they had created a very important character who was only half orc, they couldn't retcon her out of the story altogether since she had killed the King, but she couldn't be half-human as stated before.  At that point, she was still referenced as half-human, but Khadgar and Medivh had said they thought she might actually be half-orc and half-some human-like creature from her home planet.  At this point, they still did not have Draenei or the Eredar even as part of their lore.

So, now they also had the problem that the lore they had created: Garona could not have been half-human, but they didn't have anything on the other side of the portal for her to be.  Enter WCIII - we meet the Draenei (who at that time were just Broken led by Akama).  Now the theories started up that maybe the Draenei were who the "human like" creature that was the other half of Garona. Only it didn't match up at all because the Draenei (at that time) were very much the "Broken" that we know today, so physically provided nothing to make her appear human.

However, now we had a race on the other side of the portal that is humanoid.  A bit later, we have The Rise of the Horde written which provides a backstory for those Draenei, along with the original Horde.  However, at that same point, the story creates a timeline that has the orcs not having any connections to the draenei other than Durotan/Ogrim's interactions with them.  In the same book, they had the "magical aging" happen when the Orcs adopted warlock magic.  

So, the theories grew even bigger, with the thoughts that Garona was possibly this "new Draenei" as her other half, it matches with the models they made in game for female draenei a year later (very feminine, torsos and facial features not being too out there).  But now the timeline doesn't match - the Draenei didn't interact with the orcs, and there wasn't a lot of time between when they start interacting and when the war all out starts.  So, how can they resolve this?  There's been far too many references to her looking "almost human" already, in games and books, so they can't just undo that.  So, in the comics, they had her be the result of breeding experiments by Gul'dan, and they used the same aging magic that had been introduced in Rise of the Horde to explain her age at the time of the First War.

Personally, I think it was done quite well, considering we're talking about a character who they'd created for WC1.

**********

None of this, of course, applies to the movie. We have no idea what kind of depth they'll go in to on the backstory for her in the movie.It was the name she gave herself, iirc, because she was pretty much shunned by everyone due to the fact that she was a half-breed.  Like wearing it as a title with pride type of thing.The way I was understanding it is that *you* select which additional  challenges to add, based on which keystones you add, not that it would be random.  So, rather than it being "I need my Holydin this week and my resto  shaman next week" it'll be "I need this keystone on my holydin and that keystone on my resto shaman."I've giving leeway to a story that has had to evolve over 21 years, and not expecting the creation of a character in a game in the mid-90's on a brand new world of lore to have been 100% fleshed out. 

But you've proven what I said.  You have, in one post, called Blizzards story telling terrible and in the next say you like the Warcraft story. You have told me I was wrong when I said you think Blizzard's storytelling is shit, then in the next post called it writing a shitty story.  I guess you know what it's like for them, now... changing your story because you forgot what you said.  You have no business being here. TIL.... THANK YOU!!!!!Likely it'll work like heirlooms do. You won't lose the items you have, they'll just be added to the transmogs available. I didn't know that ETC was a in HotS. I follow Blizzard a lot, but they've added so much in HotS that it's rather easy to miss stuff. I'm not saying that excuses Wheaton, since I would expect the host to Blizzcon to do some damn research. That doesn't mean she won't show up in other regards. They said we'll find out what she's been doing all those years through the Marks Artifact quest, but they haven't said that she won't have more to everything than just that.I'm a *huge* Sylvanas and Forsaken fan, I love her story, but I disagree.  You know who else has said that everything they did was for the sake of their people?  Illidan. Kael'thas. Arthas. Garrosh. 

The ends justifying the means doesn't mean the the means are not bad or borderline evil. Yes, what she has done makes perfect sense for her and the Forsaken, and I'm not complaining about her story, I think it's fantastic, but it's borderline villain actions.Not to mention DA:O and Mass Effect 1 used the exact same engine.  IIRC they even touted DA:O as a "fantasy world Mass Effect" back in the day.  Thing was, if he waited until just before the last boss to do it, he spent more time stopping to initiate the vote kick and kick the guy than he would've saved by just having the guy stay there. Initiate it after the first boss if you're going to do it, there's plenty of things so see if a person is competent or basically AFKing before the first boss of a dungeon.Keep backtracking. It's cool. &gt; Will Wheton was not the man for this job.

Oh, I agree there, I'm not defending him.  But not for not knowing ETC, but for just being terrible.

&gt; Borderline villain from our moral compass. She's a Forsaken, shes undead, the rules surrounding her are completely different. That's my point.

What you're missing is that the same could be said for so many villains we've fought.  Illidan did everything he did for the sake of fighting the Burning Legion. We killed him. Kael'thas was (until Sunwell) just trying to save his people. We killed him.  Arthas was trying to save his people, he was deemed a villain (by the time we actually kill him, there was no more trying to save his people). Everything Garrosh did, he "did for the Horde."  We killed him.

There's no such thing as moral relativism. If there was, then there is no such thing as a villain.  Even the Burning Legion is not evil because they are doing what is right and necessary for *them.*  

&gt; The only morally good choice she could make, from our moral viewpoint, is to let the Forsaken die out.

Not everything she's done has been done to increase her people's lives. Yes, the raising of the dead is part of what she's doing, but she's also continued to develop versions of the plague (something that was even expressly prohibited by the Horde). The attack on Gilneas. The bombing of Theramore. The experiments on living creatures in Undercity. Not sure on the beta, I didn't participate in that. He wasn't in the technical alpha, I was on that and he wasn't an option there.Murder is murder, as the saying goes. Maybe i should have been more specific: moral relativism in WoW does not exist.  You either accept moral relativism, in which case you must also accept that none of the "villains" we fight are the bad guys, or you acknowledge that there are absolutes. If you declare Deathwing as a bad guy, or Arthas, or the Legion, as "villains," then you've already denied moral relativism.I agree. That's why I was being very clear: I love Sylvanas, her story, and the Forsaken. That's the thing though: with relativism there is no debate. Your moral compass is not mime, nor Illidan's, nor anyone else's.  Who are you to say the interests of Deathwing,  or an Old God, are wrong or right? If you can claim Sylvanas's actions are justified because "her people," then you have to also accept Deathwing's actions because you have no authority to determine that his actions were any more wrong. Where do you get the authority to determime they were 'purely self-interest?" After all, our existence is due to some interstellar beings forcimg their version of order on the Old God's world. And even if you call it self-interest,  why does your interest trump his?&gt; You're not looking at that objectively as a third party.

We play characters in the game. We aren't a third party. We are the ones affected by the actioms of those in the story. It's not a case of us watching a movie and having an opinion on it.  

You keep talking evil, but that's not what we're talking about. We *are* talking about whether something is right or wrong and whether that is villainous. But you point out the flaw in moral relativism in your own response. Right here: 

&gt; To the inhabitants of Azeroth, Deathwing and Arthas are entirely Villains. As their well being is directly threatened by them.

This is your flaw. To the factions we play for, this is True.  What about the Cult of the Damned? What about the Twilight's Hammer? They do not agree. To them, Arthas and Deathwing were essentially saviors. To Guldan and the Shadow Council, the Legion is great. Who decides which inhabitants' views are the "right" ones?

If we are truly a spectator, then we have no rights to declare any of those actions right or wrong,  but we do anyway. 

&gt; Are early settlers evil human beings for owning slaves? No. Was it wrong? Yes. Should we in hindsight look back and judge them as horrible people for doing something that was culturally acceptable? Absolutely not.

Do we then say that the beating of those slaves was okay because it was socially acceptable? But it's also not an even comparison to the Forsaken's actions.  What they are doing is more akin to Germany's experiments with people in the 30s and 40s. They, too, were just trying to find ways to better their people, to survive to the future. But I would argue we can absolutely judge them now, no matter how many Germans believed it right and good at the time.&gt; The victor, as it has traditionally been.

No, the victor writes the history books. The victor doesn't determine which views are right and wrong, good and bad.  If that was so, then groups like the Native Americans would have no grievances against "the white man" for what has been done since colonization started because "they lost."  Those remaining members of the Cult/Twilight's Hammer/Shadow Council don't suddenly disappear when the overall war is lost.

&gt; Arthas' decision to purge Stratholme was the right thing to do, but it was morally wrong. That did not make him evil. Murdering his Father and destroying Lordaeron, however, did.

Something the game's lore conflicts with.  Arthas's decision to purge Stratholme has been called *the* point where he turns, not the murdering of his father. (In fact, it's been argued that Strat was the worse of the two, because *he* made that decision rather than being controlled by Frostmourne).  Whether it was the *right* thing to do has been another debated topic - do we know how many were plagued? Even if in retrospect we do, did *he* know how many were plagued?  

&gt; Right because I'm drawing a parallel between being Evil and being a villain and saying right and wrong arent the only indicators of that. ... There is more complexity to what makes someone a Villain/Evil than simply adding up their wrong actions.

That's kind of my point. We make decisions of what we think about the actions of a person in the game/lore and decide if it makes them villainous.  If we can justify it in any way, then we decide it isn't villainous.  Malygos was trying to save his race and all of Azeroth by stopping the rampant usage of magic, which was responsible for so much death being brought to the world. Villain and deserving of death. Sylvanas is killing people and raising them from the dead and using plague bombs on places like Southshore and Gilneas to save her people and prevent the end of her race. Justified and heroic.  

&gt; What? We are a third party. Because our characters are impacted doesnt mean we can't take a step back and look at it objectively. Again, my personal well being is not effected by anything going on in WoW. My characters, however, is.

I apparently take the RPG aspect of the game more seriously. But even past there, the logic does not make sense. My well-being was not personally affected by Pol Pot or Hitler, I am not personally affected by ISIS. But by all aspects I can say Pol Pot, Hitler, and ISIS are all evil for their actions, no matter what their justification they have. 

It's the flaw of moral relativism I keep talking about - there is no such thing as evil, bad, good, hero, villain if moral relativism is held True in the game. We are just as much the villain for wiping out groups of people who follow their beliefs as they are for trying to wipe us out for opposing their beliefs. That's why I keep talking about the "right to judge."  If we are truly pure spectators, if we truly take the position of a pure third party, the conversations like this shouldn't even happen. Just like you talking about looking back at slave holders and we shouldn't judge them as horrible people. We have no right to judge people for doing what was culturally acceptable a few hundred years ago, we have no right to judge the actions of characters in the Warcraft lore if we are pure spectators to that world. 

********

We're talking in circles a lot, so this'll be my last post. (It's been a good discussion, thank you for that. Most people just get into name calling when you start talking stuff like this :) )  I'll end with this:

I've never claimed Sylvanas' actions to be evil or that *she* is actually a villain.  However, I do maintain that her actions are villainous. From the objective perspective you mention, killing people and raising them from the dead, using a plague bomb, the invasion of Gilneas, her experiments in Undercity - those are all have villainous undertones.  I don't think that makes her bad, but likewise I cannot justify her actions as a "ends justify the means."  But, that's part of what makes her character, and the Forsaken overall, my favorite race/story. They are the outlier race in the WoW universe - they are forced to do things like that in order to survive as a race, they truly do not have a choice, but at the same time, their entire race shouldn't exist - they are simply freed undead from the works of the absolute villains of the world (the Legion and the Lich King).  We kill other undead on site, and everyone else that dies in the world is simply dead, the Forsaken are already dead, they already lost in the war against the Lich King, but they essentially got lucky (I know it's more complex than just luck), and got a second chance of making a new civilization, but one that has to go to extreme measures to survive. It makes it so much more complex than "this group hurt me so I will hurt them back" or "historically we fought, so we'll continue to fight," or what has seemed like, for years, to be the forced conflict between the Horde and Alliance. 

Take care :)Unfortunately, yes. Especially when it is written off something that has a strong fan base by so many people.  The same type of things have happened to comic book movies and TV shows, things like Lord of the Rings and the Hobbit... I mean, when Harry Potter's first trailer came out, Rowling had to make a statement that she never indicates the position of Harry's scar because the community freaked out that it wasn't in the center of his forehead like it was on the cover art of the book.You've apparently forgotten what the original LOTR trailer was like. It was extremely disappointing, gave nothing of how epic and vast the lore was, and the one actual dialogue we had was the most cliched dialogue from the movie.

https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kMD16QImEBI

The difference was that LOTR had a massive fan base that had been built over half a century, and was based on a book that was, at the time, one of the most sold books world wide. Warcraft has a good fan base, but it's small potatoes compared to that. I liked the ZA and ZG rehashes, but they weren't the same as doing them in a raid. With how classes have changed since Kara was relevant,  it too won't feel the same, even if they rereleased it as a 10 man raid... but having it as a 5 man changes the fights and the feeling of it.I said part of it above in your other response, but you seem to not understand what people mean when they say "ruining a memory. "

Say you go to a restaurant while growing up.  The food is amazing, the atmosphere is phenomenal,  the service is on point. Then you move away. That is your memory of that place. Now, say years later you come back to visit, and you cannot wait to go back to that restaurant.  You go, and the food is terrible, the atmosphere looks the same,  but feels completely different,  and the service sucks. While yes, your memory  of the place as a child is still intact, its now been tainted by this new memory of it: a terrible place that is just a disappointment.  

That's what people are talking about when they say they don't want their memories of Kara ruined.&gt; the new instance might be cool and might add new things to the lore or legacy of Kara.

There's a big difference between making more Kara related dungeons and remaking it for a 5-man, though. 

Like Godfather - You're talking a sequel, what people are concerned about is a remake. Did you know that a remake of the Godfather has been confirmed? [It's True](http://www.theportlygazelle.com/2015/09/10/the-godfather-remake-starring-johnny-depp-as-vito-corleone-confirmed-for-2016), with Johnny Depp as Vito. I, for one, think it's a terrible idea. Now, imagine if upon releasing this new "Johnny Depp's Godfather" movie, all copies of the original Godfather disappeared. You cannot go back and watch the Godfather you love anymore unless you get technically-illegal-possibly-dangerous-for-your-computer copies of it.  

That's what people are worried about.  Not that they'll make some Karazhan based dungeon, like the Crypts, to carry on the story or expand on the story, but that they'll *remake* Kara as a 5-man dungeon, so we lose the raid all together.

(And yes, I know the Godfather article is a hoax, but it was a perfect example :) )&gt; And I'm pretty sure if they did Karazhan as a new dungeon it would still be possible to do the old raid.

Every remade raid and dungeon they have done to date, the old raid has completely disappeared.

Naxx-40, ZA raid, ZG raid, Onyxia-40, Scholo, Stratholme, Scarlet Monestary (all of them), UBRS, Deadmines, Shadowfang Keep... even those they re-did not for max level like Stockades, Ragefire, BFD, RFK, RFD. Every single time they've redone or re-released an old raid as a dungeon or redone an old dungeon, the original version has gone away from the game completely.  Want to experience the original of any of those?  Have to go play on one of the Vanilla, TBC, or Wrath servers that are out there.

&gt; If they made a godfather remake, it wouldn't ruin the original. The original would still be great.

You're right, but like I said, if the original disappeared if they made a remake (see prior comment), then all you'd have is your memories of what it was like. If you were no longer able to watch the original Godfather because Johnny Depp's Godfather was made and released, the original would fade into the past.

&gt; Regardless, it is silly to get upset about something this far in advance when we have noooo idea how they're gonna handle it

It's not silly to express what is wanted.  Yes, some people go over the top (haven't seen it here much, but the official forums are littered with "if you do [insert thing here] then I'm not going to ever buy this expansion" posts), but expressing the concern of remaking Kara-10 into a level 110 Kara-5 now is exactly *when* it should be happening, rather than waiting for them to officially announce it, when they've already done it, and then it's too late.That's what I meant by "all copies of the original Godfather disappeared."  I mean, like *all* of them.Again, you are using the word "memory" too literally. No crap it doesn't actually change memories, no one is saying that.  It's not a literal change in memory. The phrase "don't ruin my memory of it" is basically "don't shit on my memory" or "don't ruin this place that gave me such great memories."

When they take things out of the game that are/were favorites, they are gone. If what they replace it with is a shitty version of what it was, then it sucks.  You may have liked the new ZA, I went there and thought "this is a crappy watered down version of what used to be a good raid."  Some people liked Deadmines 2.0, others sorely miss the original. 

If they make Kara into a 5-man and it holds up to what the original Kara was, that'll be great. If it doesn't, and the Kara so many know and love is gone, it's "ruining the memory," meaning "it's taking this great place that gave such great memories and destroying it."  *That's* the concern.&gt; Based on your earlier comments: Do you expect the dungeon to be a disappointment? If so, why?

Like I said in the other posts - they've remade lots of dungeons, and not all of them have been things that I've liked. I did not like the revamp of ZA, it felt like a watered down version of the raid. I did not like the revamp of Deadmines, Stockades, or Ragefire - I preferred the originals of all of those. When Wrath re-released Naxx as 10/25 man raids, a lot of people that had experienced the original Wrath complained that it was Naxx-INO - Naxx In Name Only. It had the same skin as the original, but it wasn't the original Naxx, it wasn't as challenging, wasn't as fun.  

&gt; Your Godfather example is terrible by the way. If there was a remake, then I'd watch it once, find out it's shit, then watch the original again

It's obviously not a one on one comparison. But in the hypothetical example, I said "Now, imagine if upon releasing this new "Johnny Depp's Godfather" movie, **all copies of the original Godfather disappeared**." Obviously in real life that could not happen, but it's a hypothetical situation, to show a comparison between the old/good version of something someone loves and a new version they might not like.

&gt; a scenario that is so exceedingly unlikely that it renders this entire discussion hilarious

Why? There's a massive precedence. As I stated in another post: "Naxx-40, ZA raid, ZG raid, Onyxia-40, Scholo, Stratholme, Scarlet Monestary (all of them), UBRS, Deadmines, Shadowfang Keep... even those they re-did not for max level like Stockades, Ragefire, BFD, RFK, RFD. Every single time they've redone or re-released an old raid as a dungeon or redone an old dungeon, the original version has gone away from the game completely. Want to experience the original of any of those? Have to go play on one of the Vanilla, TBC, or Wrath servers that are out there."  If their plan is to re-make Kara as a 5-man, there is *absolutely a precedence to think the original one would be going away.*  The closest thing to re-making or re-releasing old instanced content as something to be completed in newer expansions without deleting the original from the game has been Timewalking, and they've said directly they currently have no intention of making Timewalking raids.

&gt; But why would my memories of the original be sullied?

You apparently do not know what the meaning of "ruining memories" means.  Yes, it does not change your physical memories. Duh. The phrase means taking a place that built great memories and ruining it.  If they re-released Kara as a 5-man dungeon and the original disappeared, and then it ended up being a disappointment, then they've taken this place that means a lot to so many people and they've destroyed it. 

&gt; It's only fair to reserve our judgements until launch day.

I think it's completely fair to express concerns over a prospective change before it happens.    If people don't express the concern that something they love might disappear forever, and then Blizzard makes the change and it *is* bad, then at that point there's nothing to be done.  If voices are, by chance, heard in advance, then maybe they don't make that change. Maybe they make it a completely new dungeon, or they don't get rid of the original, or they do something different.  

I'm not saying that a new version *would* be shit. I'd judge it as its own thing. But it's the idea that the version I know and love would go away forever that bothers me.

Edit: I would also like to point out that what I am worried about relates to, and only to, them re-making Karazhan as a 5-man dungeon and having it replace the raid.  If they make Kara *related* dungeons, I will not be bothered by that. If there are new dungeons centered around what is happening in Karazhan, if they remake Kara as a 5-man dungeon but the original raid is still there and intact, or anything of the like, I have zero qualms and I welcome that.This is how I envision it. Go Void, drain all the way to 0, and right before your haste buff disappears pop Oblivion and go void again.

Assuming Void is as powerful as my imagining of it, that might make Oblivion too strong if it works like that... it might make Oblivion one of those "required" talents.They aren't listing every ability in these posts.  It *might* be gone, but not being listed here doesn't mean it is gone.But we don't know that the healing is going to be lower.  I'm going to assume that their healing is going to be balanced around the idea that they are healing via the damage.  If that's the case, they might become *too* strong - if you can get a disc priest causing 30% of a DD's DPS but still healing, then it will make them too strong due to being able to kill things too fast.  They do, also, still have straight up heals, remember.

*However*, I also have a feeling we're going to see some similar treatment with monks and *possibly* paladins.  I can see them buffing fist weaving and making that the common thing, so that they have two healing classes that are DD/Healers, that way they can balance around the idea of having at least one of the two in a majority of raids.I'm thinking they'll do something to make that not work, otherwise Oblivion may be way too powerful of a talent to ever not take.  Assuming the haste buff will continue stacking if you re-enter Voidform, you could get *insane* amounts of haste by the time your second Voidform ends.The way I interpreted that statement was that 70% of their healing would be True healing and 30% would be DPS, not that they would be 70% of a healer and 30% of a DPS, but I could be wrong.  &gt; My only concern is that I think the basic greys/whites of the loot table should go to the first person who tagged it otherwise it could inflate or crash the economy of the game

I think stuff like that is exactly why they haven't done it.  With how most classes work in GW2, it's not a huge issue, since AoE isn't a major aspect of that game... but I can imagine if all mobs were taggable by anyone, there would be that risk of things like a warlock running around dropping rain of fire all over the place or a rogue FoK, etc... basically easy to cast low damage, spammable AoE that they can get a hit on everything and suddenly they get credit for a dozen kills they've not actually done anything with.

You already see it with the rares (and I'll admit I benefit from it myself)... fly in and a rare has 4% health left and you get a single hit in before it dies and you're free to loot.The problem becomes when you are either in a group for something else or queued for something.  I'll be out in Tanaan doing the dailies or out trapping in Nagrand and someone invites me to a group, but I'm in a dungeon queue or in a group forming up for a mythic-5, I can't join up with that other person, but then we're competing for things rather than working together.Don't know why you were downvoted, it's True.  That was how I afforded epic flying in BC. I was making mooncloth and spellcloth and selling it while building up the mats for my shadoweave set, then once I got my shadoweave set I was selling those too.&gt; this is going to be very hard to balance

Truth. My guess is that is why they've not tried to make attonement healing more viable in the past.

My hope is that it will be similar to monks - can do decent if you aren't good at it, amazing if good at it.  When I started healing on my monk, I was finding myself absolute garbage... couldn't seem to keep my mana up, couldn't generate chi fast enough to use it to get tea brew stacks, couldn't seem to do anything right.  But I kept at it and got to the point where I was regularly topping healing charts with very minimal overhealing and ending fights with plenty of mana.  

My guess is that a lot of disc priests will be in the same boat I was in when I started monk healing - getting attonement on a couple people and then DPSing, but not doing great with DPS or heals... but then once people master the intricacies of it, it'll be a great heal spec to have...

But, as I said earlier, I think we're going to see something very similar with monk healing - more emphasis on the fistweaving aspect.  If they had two healing classes that were 70/30's, then they could potentially balance bosses around having at least one disc OR monk in the raid.  What I don't know for sure is if the void versions of the spells still generate Insanity.  For instance, if you look at demo locks right now, while in Demo-form, their abilities use DF and DF gradually decays... but certain things still cause them to gain DF (any corruptions up, killing things with Immo-auro).  In some AoE situations, I've seen my demo form extend for a massive amount of time because I'll hit a huge group with Cataclysm, getting a ton of corruptions up, and I'll pop immolation if it's going to hit a bunch of them and potentially kill them.  

So, if VT/SWP still generate insanity, and/or if Voidflay and Voidblast still generate insanity, making sure those DoTs are up on as many targets as possible and you are getting them extended through flay/blast will cause that duration to fluctuate... and since the decay rate of Insansity increases as time goes on, it'll be a bit harder to predict how long you'll have.

We'll see what happens, I'm excited to at least give it a try and see how it feels.  I, too, don't want "optimal rotation."  And I'm hoping that they don't forgo talents like CoP... while I hate it when raiding, I love it when questing and in 5-mans.Especially given that this was 25-man.  For those people that weren't around back then, 25M was not just a larger raid version of the same thing.  Raid progression was 10N&lt;10H=25N&lt;25H, so you cleared 10N first, then you worked on 10H or 25N, then you moved up to 25H.  They had cleared ICC10, they were very aware of how the fight was supposed to work. When they first saw the platforms respawning in 25, they should have immediately known that it was wrong given that the mechanics worked the same in 10... especially given the caliber of the guild.

I, for one, feel like this video was just a bunch of whining, and I'm not normally one to pass off something as just whining. He kept going on about "why would we cheat on NORMAL? It's too easy!"  Well, because you had to kill normal to start on heroic, and you wanted to get to heroic faster. It wasn't a flat out requirement, but you would not have the gear.  I never said that 10M was a requirement for going into 25M, I said that was the raid progression (as opposed to Cata and beyond where 10M and 25M dropped identical gear, just more of it, so they were considered the same difficulty).

&gt; Furthermore how would they have known how the mechanics were supposed to work?

They *had* completed it on 10-man already.  They had also had various attempts on alts prior to this, maxing out their attempts.  They also fully admitted on their own forums at the time that they knew something was bugging in the encounter.  Regardless of if they knew *why* it was bugging, they were fully aware *that* it was bugging.

&gt; This wasn't news to anybody, which is what makes the whole "They knew about it and blatantly exploited it"

Most people didn't claim they knew that saronite bombs would cause a bug.  The issue was that they had completed the encounter in 10-man, they knew how the fight was supposed to work, and when the encounter was clearly bugging out, they kept doing it. If you were around back then, they fully admitted they knew something was bugging out. They were fully aware that the encounter was not working as intended, but rather than stopping and reporting it (which given the close watching Blizz did on the world first races at that time, would likely have been fixed right away).  

&gt; Why would the best guild in the world, who also had quite a lead in the race, risk so much over a NORMAL clear?

In order to get into heroic for the heroic clear.  We already know from reading through the hunter preview that they aren't listing all abilities. I mean, BM hunter doesn't have Bestial Wrath listed, but it's clearly still a spell since Dire Beast reduces the CD on it.  

Again, there's a chance those abilities *could be* gone, but they definitely are not listing out every single ability for the class.And yet this wasn't the first time top guilds had been banned (or have you forgotten the Exodus ban from Ulduar). They were fully aware it was bugging out, they chose to continue, to say nothing. They actively decided to ignore adds that they were fully aware were part of the encounter because a bug in the encounter was allowing them to ignore them. That was all choice on their part.

&gt; How does a boss get fixed inbetween a pull if Blizzard is not watching your guild?

Reporting said bugs.

&gt; They did report it but kept on going because nobody cared about normal mode.

Proof? Because you saying it doesn't make it so.  They *fully admitted* they knew something was bugging out. There is no debate there.  They said nothing of the bug until it was hotfixed a day later, then they came back and said "oh yeah, this was happening on our kill."  They even had a member of their own guild admit to covering stuff up and their knowledge of it.

"The initial covering up was because we figured the encounter was bugged and we didn't want 1000 other guilds going in and claiming another kill straight after us." [From the MMO-C thread](http://www.mmo-champion.com/threads/693400-Ensidia-suspended-for-72-Hours?p=7271693#post7271693)

"If there is a fight mechanic that doesn't seem to be working, you ignore it. Again, we ignored it because we thought the encounter was bugged. Would you, without having a clue that you were unwittingly bugging an encounter, have kept dps'ing adds that you didn't have to kill?" [Another post from the same member](http://www.mmo-champion.com/threads/693400-Ensidia-suspended-for-72-Hours?p=7271514#post7271514)

"We had no clue at all that it was the bombs triggering the bug. We thought it was just the encounter itself being bugged. We had no idea it was the bombs that bugged it until Blues said it was. We knew something was wrong, but we had no idea it was anyone in our own raid provoking it. How could we have known? We did 6 pulls in total, and some of those werent even with the bug included. I'm not excusing what we did, we knew full well it was bugged." [Same member](http://www.mmo-champion.com/threads/693400-Ensidia-suspended-for-72-Hours?p=7271231#post7271231)


Re: unlocking - The risk of losing out on their attempts on heroics was exactly what they bitched about back then, and was exactly what he's bitching about in this video.  

But, clearly, back then getting world first on NORMAL did matter:

"When you're going for a World First, you dont stop raiding to try and figure out behaviour that doesnt even occur on every try." [More from the same guy](http://www.mmo-champion.com/threads/693291-Lich-King-World-First-Kill-by-Ensidia?p=7268445#post7268445)

"Stop and wait for a fix? Did you ever in your entire life try going for a world first?" [Same guy](http://www.mmo-champion.com/threads/693400-Ensidia-suspended-for-72-Hours?p=7271354#post7271354)

And the fact that this is still an issue for this guy 5 years later, clearly people cared.

Tell you what, rather than rehash the same arguments that happened years ago, how about you just [go read the 67 pages of back and forth that happened then](http://www.mmo-champion.com/threads/693400-Ensidia-suspended-for-72-Hours).&gt; they knew SOMETHING was wrong but not what caused it and they simply did not give a fuck.

That's exactly the problem. They knew something was wrong and didn't give a fuck. They continued the fight, exploiting the bug. It doesn't matter if they knew what was causing it or not, they knew there was a bug that was causing the fight to be easier. They'd done it on 10M, they knew full and well what the encounter was supposed to be like.  They cared more about getting the world first kill.  Again, missing the point - They **had** killed him on 10M already. Doesn't matter whether they needed to or not, they **had done it**.I would call a bug that completely trivializes an encounter gamebreaking. You would not?  &gt; As for whether or not normal mattered to them, well...do you remember who got world first normal highmaul?

To be honest, I don't care about World Firsts no matter what the difficulty level. But even then, if it doesn't matter, then why are we talking about it 5 years later?  You have to remember, this was the first expansion with normal and heroic versions, and this was a time with 25N was a more prestigious kill than 10N. We've become so accustomed to the multiple difficulties where only Heroic (now Mythic) matters that we forget it was something completely different.

 &gt; I think you're being silly if you're trying to argue that they would risk getting suspended

You ask what I am arguing - this is exactly it.  A prestigious world first contender guild of that caliber, knowing full and well that there is a bug in the encounter (regardless of what is causing said bug to occur), was risking suspension to get that world first kill. They knew exactly what they were doing - exploiting some bug to make the fight easier so they could be the winners of that race. Where did I say Ensidia wouldn't skip 10M because they wouldn't have the gear? 

I said "Raid progression was 10N&lt;10H=25N&lt;25H, so you cleared 10N first, then you worked on 10H or 25N, then you moved up to 25H." That was talking general raid progression for those who were not around, as I specifically stated.

You responded with "You did not need to do 10N first before doing 25N."  Okay, I never stated as such. I stated that was the progression path of raiding.  I even said "It wasn't a flat out requirement, but you would not have the gear. I never said that 10M was a requirement for going into 25M, I said that was the raid progression."

At this point, we have not brought up Ensidia's progression at all.  World first guilds always progress at a different rate than the average raider. I kind of thought that was a given.  

So let's make sure we're on the same page here: Raiding progression in Wrath was 10N-&gt;10H/25N-&gt;25H. That does not mean that 10M raids were required for 25M raids, nor does that mean any of the world first guilds followed that.  It means that was the progression path of raiding. There are plenty of people that are not aware that the raid size meant different difficulties in Wrath. You *are* a cherry-picking reader, aren't you.  Let me say it again: A prestigious world first contender guild of that caliber, knowing full and well that there is a bug in the encounter (**regardless of what is causing said bug to occur**), was risking suspension to get that world first kill.&gt; I asume Ensidia did too since they did report it.

Again, proof of that?  Their own member admitted to covering it up, as quoted previously.  

&gt; normal mode is trivial and it was even more trivial back then hence why nobody in top guilds cared.

Funny how the posts they made back then seem to contradict that.

&gt; Being stuck on a boss due to morals is not something we care about when circumstances of the bug is not severe enough.

Exploiting a boss to get a kill is not severe enough? Come on. The only reason they didn't do anything is because the bug helped them and didn't hurt them. If the bug had been "valkyrs instantly drop people off the ledge" or "ledge disappears before intended time," you can bet your ass they would have stopped the raid, reported it, and waited to find out what was causing it.  Again, was talking about raid progression. Just like if I said "Raid progression in WoD was normal-5-&gt;heroic-5-&gt;Normal HM-&gt;Heroic HM-&gt;Mythic HM.  Plenty of guilds skipped that progression, but that doesn't mean it's not the progression path.  

So, tell me again where I said "Ensidia could not have done it without the gear."  Again, give me any proof that they reported the bug. I'm more apt to believe Blizz wouldn't just willy-nilly ban a guild if they'd shown anything other than intent to exploit, especially given the popularity of the guild in question.  Everything they said back when it happened infers they simply passed it off because they wanted that world first.

&gt; I have said this already but nobody from top guilds cared

And again - what they were saying back then contradicts that.  I can agree to that. I more apt to believe there was sufficient evidence of intent to exploit if they got banned, especially given their popularity at the time and the shitstorm that was the Exodus ban during Ulduar and the Anub potential exploit (can't remember which guild did that). &gt; World first anything is cool as shit for the average joe and people "care" for the first two days but in the grand scheme of things nobody remembers you unless it is actually hard

I literally quoted one of their members, multiple times, stating how they didn't stop because of the fact that it was for a world first.

"When you're going for a World First, you dont stop raiding to try and figure out behaviour that doesnt even occur on every try."

"Stop and wait for a fix? Did you ever in your entire life try going for a world first?"  

Clearly, it mattered, *at the time*. Does it matter in the long run?  No, it doesn't. Did it matter to them when they were doing it? Yes, it absolutely did.Different work sites get blocked differently.  My work blocks anything they can directly tie to video games (which I think is crap, since they don't block anything sports related, but whatever)... but reddit isn't a video game site.Well, I could see binding heal not being part of Serendipity because of its healing of two targets at once as a targeted heal.  Basically, a choice - use a full AoE (benefits from Serendipity), but risk that heal not hitting you. Use a single target heal (benefits from Serendipity, but doesn't hit you). Use Binding (doesn't benefit from Serendipity, but guarantees you also get healed).

For CoH, you're probably right, but CoH also heals for less on a shorter CD.  Since HW:Serenity is such a long CD (even when accounting for CD reduction from Serendipity), and PoH has a cast time, I could see it still being there, but as another choice - Cast time AoE heal that reduces CD on serenity, instant cast AoE that doesn't reduce CD on Serenity.&gt; There was no "potential exploit" there was mutiple exploits that were all used where no one got banned

If you were really around at that time, then you know very well that there was massive debate over whether the stunning issue was an exploit or not.  It was using an ability exactly as the ability was intended to work.  

You cannot truly consider using an ability exactly as the ability is described is even remotely the same thing as continuing through a fight with an obvious bug causing the actual encounter itself to behave differently.  

I don't even know what you're trying to point out with the other examples. Those are different bosses, in different expansions, in different circumstances. The fact of the Lich King 25M fight was Ensidia knew full and well that a bug causing one of the mechanics in the fight to no longer behave the way it was supposed to behave and they were so pressed to try to get that world first kill (even though it "didn't matter") that they chose to continue with the kill then promote themselves as having achieved the World First kill. So because people exploited other fights, that makes the LK25 exploit OK?  Is that what you're trying to say?  

&gt; I dont understand why you think that normal LK should have a worse punishment than all other bosses.

I've not said other fights did not deserve punishment, have I?  This discussion has been about this particular exploit and this particular ban.

&gt; Paragon, Method and Ensidia/Nihilum are the 3 worst offenders of exploits of all time

The perhaps they all should have been banned, or banned permanently like Exodus was. Obviously, them being banned at any moment has not seemed to curb the behavior.

&gt; Someone else linked this atrames video which im sure you decided to ignore, this was not a one off, this is what the ENTIRE top 20 did.

I didn't see the Atramedes video because I've not been back in the thread, I've been responding in the inbox. But it has *no relevance on this discussion.*  You want to start a discussion on whether other guilds should have been banned for their various exploits as well, then by all means, do so.  But *this* discussion has been about Ensidia and the exploit they used on LK25N.&gt; The arguement that you keep pushing is that they deserved the ban. In order to establish whether or not they deserved the ban you need to set a frame of reference for what is ban worthy.

No, we don't. They exploited for a world first, they got banned. They deserved it. Whether other guilds deserved bans for their exploits or not is irrelevant. The question of whether they deserved a ban is one of "were they exploiting by the terms of the game."  If yes, then they deserved a ban. Actually, what they *deserved* was to be banned. What they *got* was a 3 day suspension. I mean, it was Ensidia that was crying out for punishment on Exodus for their exploit (which I completely admit was considerably worse of an exploit). 

&gt; The problem in this case is that Ensidia got the second worst ban in all of top tier raiding history for something that does not even matter for the top tier raider.

So? If you don't want to get punished, don't cheat. Plain and simple. You want to talk whether the punishment was too much or not? Sure. Again, that's a different discussion and not the one we've been having. There were also guilds that did get permabanned (I stand corrected on the Exodus one), Martin Fury incident. There were also plenty of exploits or potential exploits that other guilds did that potentially deserved punishment (including Ensidia in Ulduar with things like Flower Power).

&gt; And based on people I know/talked (including kungen himself), Ensidia did not know how to fix the bug that was occuring while Exodus spent months trying to come up with a foul way of killing Yogg.

Still doesn't make it right. They were *fully aware* that there was a bug making the encounter easier.  They had done the fight in 10M, they knew that the floors were supposed to be gone and the Valkyr were supposed to drop people off the edge. They got the world first and broadcast their success to everyone. Once the truth came out they backtracked and admitted that this bug what happening. Whether they were aware of what was causing it or not means nothing - they were aware they something was causing the encounter to bug out and chose to continue. Plain and simple.&gt; They had reported it to Blizzard, they had a ticket open, but decided not to wait, as it was taking too long.

Again,  proof? I believe I've asked three times now. 

Why could they not wait? You stated repeatedly no one cared about a world first for a normal mode kill, so rather than exploit a clear bug, why not wait?

&gt; Regardless, they knew the fight was bugged, they did not know what caused the bug. 

Again, here was their mistake. No one was claiming they should have known the bombs were causing the problem. What they *did* know was that the fight was bugged,  and they exploited that bug.

&gt; you could just pretend Kungen didn't explain all of that in the video

I'm fully aware of what he said in the video. I also call horseshit on ot. He said they had no idea it was bugging out. Lie. They've admitted to knowing it was bugging. Hell, they had done the fight on 10M, they'd seen how ot went! I don't believe for a second any of the whining he was doing. If they had a single shred of evidence to support that they weren't cheating,  that they had reported tickets, or anything, their guild would have been restored as world first.No, resolve is going away completely. They said abilities that currently interact with resolve will be changed around to compensate.&gt; I predict holy paladins mostly avoid mastery and continue to simply heal from the back rather than getting in melee range.

Possibly... but could also depend on what other talents they have. If they keep Beacon of Faith and can still pick up the talent they previewed, could be strong having a beacon on a tank, a second beacon an melee, and a good amount of mastery. Extra heals for everyone.Not saying it's an exploit, but what they're talking about was a bit different. Mages would go to Freya's room and spellsteal [Pollinate](http://www.wowhead.com/spell=63059/pollinate), then get warlock summoned and then they'd pull (or they'd kite the trash to Hodir and then spellsteal it).  There's been various types of encounters like that, I recall a buff in UBRS from priests MCing certain mobs, a mob in dragonblight that gave a haste buff, etc... so it wasn't just a "stole a spell and used it," but rather a "stole a spell in a completely different area of the game, got summoned in for the fight to use it.

Again, not saying it is or is not an exploit, just clarifying what they're talking about.Minor glyphs are staying. And also they will have glyphs that affect specific spells, applied to the spell itself, and are consumed on use. I've a feeling scribes will have a lot more work come legion.&gt; Innocent until proven guilty rings a bell? You're the one accusing them, you're the one that has to provide prove, not the other way around.

First off, this isn't a court of law. Second off, they were determined guilty. By Blizzard. When they were banned.  They are the ones trying to claim that they did nothing wrong, they have to provide the proof to contend with that. 

&gt; Also, not knowing what causes the bug =/= exploiting.

You apparently do not know what constitutes an exploit.  Since you've apparently missed every post before: *They were fully aware that the fight was bugging out and causing it to not work how it was supposed to work. They made a conscious decision to continue, knowing that the fight was bugging out.*

It does not matter if they know *why* it was bugging, and that's not been the contention. The fact is: they were 100% aware that the fight was bugged, and rather than stop, they decided to continue.  They've even admitted they knew that the bug was making it so they did not have to kill the Valkyrs, and they knew how the encounter was supposed to go since they'd done it on 10M.  

It has nothing to do with the fact that they were using Saronite bombs. It has everything to do with the fact that they were aware that the fight was bugging out and chose to continue.They were 100% aware that GMs watched their encounters. They were also 100% aware that Blizzard was willing and able to ban people for exploiting bugs. Yes, in that circumstance, knowing the fight was bugging out, I would absolutely stop and wait for the fix. They knew it was bugging, that it was trivializing a part of the fight, that the bug was allowing them to ignore adds. They could have stopped.

But they didn't. They continued, then broadcast to everyone how they got the world first LK25N, and only admitted that there was a bug in the encounter when it was fixed and everyone had learned about their ban.

As Bluetan has stated multiple times: no one cared about world first on normal, so why *not* stop and wait for the fix?  *Especially* given the fact, as Bluetan has also pointed out, heroic/hardmode would not unlock until the following week.  So if the world first on normal didn't matter, and they weren't going to be able to progress to the next difficulty immediately anyway, there was literally no harm for them to have waited. None.That's going to make consistent play much more important for a destro-lock. In its current iteration, I sometimes will hit a Conflag, but not start casting (either due to movement or stuns or whatever), but I can still easily get my three charges off. Makes me not think about when I hit conflag. New iteration will force me to think about when I hit conflag to make sure I can make use of the 5 second buff.That's how I read it. You just can't have more than one havoc up at a time.If they brought seed back to TBC style, I'd love it.  Back when seed explosion could pop another seed. There was nothing quite like throwing seed on a bunch of mobs, the first one explodes and sets off a chain reaction where they all explode.&gt; And they also nerfed Havoc

I think you're reading Havoc wrong.  It's a buff.  

"Mark a target with Havoc for 8 sec, causing your single target spells to also strike them."

No more charges, no more limit.  Just a flat 8 seconds, all single target spells. That means if you have your shards built up you can hit them with a couple of chaos bolts, you can immolate, incinerate, conflag, whatever. You don't have to worry about putting it up and wasting a charge or anything.I couldn't remember if it was there in Wrath, I switched mains to a pally to heal/tank in Wrath... but if it did go back to that, I'd be happy... not as happy as if they gave back Harvest life, but still happy :)&gt; Makes you wonder - where is Fel Flame? I'm betting it's coming back in a talent.

Maybe?  I hope they at least give something for using it on the move.

I could see them having a talent or one of the "spell specific" glyphs to essentially revert backdraft.  "Backdraft now lasts 30 seconds, but only has three charges"I would love more voice acting, but if I could not hear my imps chattering constantly, that would be greeeeeeaaaaaaat.  After awhile, I want to punch their little faces in.Absolutely agreed. Especially if 5-mans are coming back as something actually important... I love and prefer playing affliction, have in every expansion I've focused on my warlock, but doing 10-20% less damage because of short living mobs sucks.  I might trump everyone on a boss that lives long enough, but I get yelled at for "low DPS" since I can't cleave/AoE like everyone else.TFS is the best.Or a Saibeman?You know, something that I hadn't thought of, but could drastically change both demo and destro locks from what we're currently used to: they haven't said how soul shards will work out of combat, have they?

If they generate out of combat like they do currently for affliction, that would mean destro/demo would start at max soul shards.  Image that for your starting rotation?

Destro:

*5 Soul Shards*

* Immolate

* Chaos Bolt

*3 Soul Shards*

* Conflag

*4 Soul Shards*

* Chaos Bolt / Chaos Bolt (Buffed with Backdraft)

*0 Soul Shards*

* Start rotation of incincerate/immolate/conflags to start rebuilding.

Demo:

*5 Soul Shards*

* Curse of Doom

* Dreadstalkers

*3 Soul Shards*

* Shadow Boltx2

*5 Soul Shards*

* Hand of Gul'dan

*0 Soul Shards*

* Start rotation of shadowbolt/Dreadstalkers/HoG

******

Seems like it will be a much better opener than either spec currently has.I think that Haunt going away will be good, same with DS/MG... reason is that they can balance the DoTs alone. As it was, there was a huge variance on damage if you had haunt up or not and if you were channeling or not. This caused/causes problems in multi-DoT scenarios. Having them have a base power, and having that power be strong, means we won't suffer as much on cleave fights trying to maintain DoTs on multiple targets but not being able to utilize haunt or channel on any of them.I would greatly prefer that over the current iteration. It sucks when you don't have embers/demonic fury at the start of the fight and BL is popped and it's half way done by the time you can start nuking... It was worse with Demonbolt when it was king, and it made Charred Remains feel mandatory as destro.&gt; It doesn't matter whether it is a court of law, you are the one making accusations and telling others to prove otherwise. It does not work like that.
&gt; And yes, Blizzard banned them and that decision caused plenty of controversy, least by the fact that they made it public. The reason they were banned has been debated plenty of times by plenty of people and the majority believe Blizzard made the incorrect decision and it is a decision that was dodgy to say the least.

They are the ones who got banned, the burden of proof is on them to prove that the ban was invalid, not the other way around.  *I'm* not accusing them of anything. They were banned for exploiting. If they or you are claiming that the ban is invalid, they've had six years to provide evidence showing otherwise. The fact that the achievement for world first was never given back to them indicates pretty clearly that they did not have any proof.

The public nature of it?  Ensidia was extremely happy when it was *made public* that Exodus was banned for their Yogg-0 exploit. Ensidia was crying out for bans on Paragon and Stars for their usage of paladins to cheese Anub in ToGC.  They didn't seem to have a problem with the public nature of the ban until it was them getting caught.

&gt; where's your proof in this? Provide proof that they said what caused the bug and were fully aware of it.

I did not say they knew what caused the bug. I said they were aware the fight was bugging and chose to ignore said bug.  They also covered up the fact that said bug existed.  I've already provided that proof, but if you need it again:

"The **initial covering up** was because we **figured the encounter was bugged** and we didn't want 1000 other guilds going in and claiming another kill straight after us." [From the MMO-C thread](http://www.mmo-champion.com/threads/693400-Ensidia-suspended-for-72-Hours?p=7271693#post7271693)

"If there is a fight mechanic that doesn't seem to be working, you ignore it. Again, **we ignored it because we thought the encounter was bugged.** Would you, without having a clue that you were unwittingly bugging an encounter, have kept dps'ing adds that you didn't have to kill?" [Another post from the same member](http://www.mmo-champion.com/threads/693400-Ensidia-suspended-for-72-Hours?p=7271514#post7271514)

"We had no clue at all that it was the bombs triggering the bug. **We thought it was just the encounter itself being bugged.** We had no idea it was the bombs that bugged it until Blues said it was. **We knew something was wrong**, but we had no idea it was anyone in our own raid provoking it. How could we have known? We did 6 pulls in total, and some of those werent even with the bug included. **I'm not excusing what we did, we knew full well it was bugged.**" [Same member](http://www.mmo-champion.com/threads/693400-Ensidia-suspended-for-72-Hours?p=7271231#post7271231)

I've also provided proof that the reason they ignored it is because they wanted that world first.

"When you're going for a World First, you dont stop raiding to try and figure out behaviour that doesnt even occur on every try." [More from the same guy](http://www.mmo-champion.com/threads/693291-Lich-King-World-First-Kill-by-Ensidia?p=7268445#post7268445)

"Stop and wait for a fix? Did you ever in your entire life try going for a world first?" [Same guy](http://www.mmo-champion.com/threads/693400-Ensidia-suspended-for-72-Hours?p=7271354#post7271354)

&gt; And no, a fight bugging, but still being able to be completed should not be punished.

You keep telling yourself this.  If the fight was bugging for them and they couldn't complete it and they lost the race because of that, you can bet your ass they'd be raising hell about that bug.  They had a bug that worked in their favor, so they ran with it and got caught.  A guild of that caliber knows better than that. Especially when you're a world first contending guild, you don't simply ignore a clear and definitive bug that is happening, then turn around and start claiming world first.

&gt; ou're asking others for proof, but you're failing to provide your own. Whatever you think, we do not have to provide you proof, you have to provide proof otherwise.

Again, *they* got the ban. Blizzard doesn't willy-nilly ban, and especially one of the most competitive guilds of that time.  You want proof? The proof is in the ban. The proof is the fact that they admitted they were aware that there was something bugging out the fight. The proof is that six years later, they've not had their status as world first restored because *they've not been able to refute it.*

I don't have to prove anything, they were deemed guilty by Blizzard. You want to call it salty? I don't care. If they got the achievement restored to them, I still wouldn't care.  I cracks me up that six years later, Ensidia defenders are coming in claiming they did no wrong, and that Ensidia members make videos like this one where they completely contradict the things they said six years ago trying to make themselves look better.  

You are saying I'm disregarding whatever anyone else says? What have I disregarded? A leading member of Ensidia claiming they did no wrong (even though his reasoning in the video contradicts what they said in the past)?  I'm sorry if I'm not going to believe the person that was banned unless they can provide anything to support what they're saying. I don't believe it when the person who gets caught botting claims they didn't know the program was there. I don't believe it when the person caught account sharing claims they didn't know someone else was using their account. I don't tend to believe the person caught doing the wrong when they just proclaim innocence unless they can back up that innocence.

You want to argue whether the punishment was too much, I've said openly in prior responses that would be a legitimate discussion.  But to try to claim they were some innocent party that did nothing wrong?  Come on. Their own members didn't agree to that back when it happened.

Edit:

In case you want the entire thread - [go read the 67 pages of back and forth that happened then on MMO-C, where those quotes were obtained](http://www.mmo-champion.com/threads/693400-Ensidia-suspended-for-72-Hours).&gt; They did not know Saronite Bombs caused the bug, they thought the fight itself was bugged.

I've never once claimed they knew *what* was causing the bug. The fact that they knew there was a bug and kept going was the problem. *That was the problem the entire time.*  

&gt; Regardless, if you're racing for something, you do not stop, especially if you're being chased closely.

But everyone keeps saying it world first normal doesn't matter! Either way - they still kept going when they were fully aware the fight was bugging out. They still broadcasted their world first even though they knew they did it on a bugged fight. They still attempted to hide the fact that the fight was bugged until it became public knowledge. 

&gt; Blizzard banned them for a mistake Blizzard made by having the platform have siege health and the Saronite Bombs do siege damage.

No, Blizzard banned them for exploiting a bug - they saw that some bug was causing them to no longer need to kill the adds, *of which they were fully aware were supposed to drop people off platforms*, and so they stopped DPSing the adds and ignored the mechanics.  If it were that simple, then Exodus should not have been banned for their exploit, after all, they were simply using mistakes Blizzard made.  The Martin Fury incident should not have resulted in a ban, either, since it was a GM mistake that gave them the insta-kill item.  

&gt; Logs were released by Ensidia on the very first page of the MMO-C thread you keep using for evidence showing Saronite Bombs damage on every boss encounter.

And once again, the use of the bombs was not why they were banned. The exploit of a bug is why they were banned. Whether you know what is causing it or not, they were aware the fight was bugging out. 

&gt; Blizzard covering up and lying? Well, I never.

What possible benefit would Blizzard have to ban a guild going for a world first?  It would have made zero impact on Blizzard to have returned the achievement and state "Ensidia was able to provide clear evidence of no exploit" and call it a day. It wouldn't have changed a thing. A newt?!I was envisioning the spikes from Anub in ToCWhich I wouldn't be surprised if they did... As it is, prot warriors have the least healing of all tanks, and 3 of the 5 tanks currently have a heal as part of their active mitigation... It seems this "50% of damage" heal is their new thing, so I wouldn't be surprised to see them merge shield block and barrier into one (shield block increases chance to block and reduces damage by X%) and then bringing in a new version of enraged regen (spend X rage to restore 50% of lost health / 50% of damage taken in the last 6 seconds). That would bring them in line. Well, they've said they don't want active mitigation to be as punishing if you mess up, so whether its counted as active mitigation or not, it being tied to runic power instead of runes should help a lot... I don't know how often I'm runic power capping just trying to spam out death coil and blowing my rune regens as fast as I can... seems i'm always either GCD capped or I'm rune starved, but never in between.  This will basically let you have one active mitigation tied to runic power (DS) and one tied to runes (Bone Shield)But also to be fair, Arthas did have Frostmourne. 

Really, Frostmourne takes the credit, Arthas was just the guy holding it. All of his power was due to the sword, as plainly evident by what happens when it was shattered.

Also, I can't completely agree it was all Ashbringer. He was encased in ice, but his dedication to the light allowed him to pray to the Light for a burst of power to escape from that icy tomb.Mages and warriors were really the only two real strong AoE classes.  Hellfire came with the life loss, which was a no go for warlocks (especially considering we already had to drain so much health for mana). Rain of Fire did decent damage, but you needed to be specced into destro pretty far for it to be worth it, and destro was not a viable spec to go that far down (hence, why Seed was added in TBC). It was also channeled then, and thus would cause warlocks to not be able to DoT targets.  

But yeah, AoE damage was not nearly as common or mandatory then. Anymore, not having AoE is a hindrance in 90% of situations, where then it was a niche thing.Truth.  A long while back I made a couple of detailed posts on it.  I could find one of them, the smaller one:

&gt; 1) The rules of a mak'gora are set by the one who declares it.

&gt; 2) Body armor is forbidden. ALL of it. So if you are wanting to claim "breaking of rules," then Garrosh also was breaking the rules as he was also using body armor. 

&gt; 3) Nothing in the Mak'Gora ever states no magic is allowed. Saying "can only use one weapon" means no magic means that when Garrosh fought with his fists, he was using a "second weapon."  Thrall is a shaman, magic is not a separate weapon, but a part of his combat abilities, just like Garrosh is a warrior, and using warrior combat abilities like charge or heroic leap are just abilities.  

&gt; 4) This was a continuation of the mak'gora that Garrosh declared just prior to the Lich King's attack on Org, where magic was also used.  That fight was witnesses by many members of the horde, and no one declared Thrall as a cheater for using magic then.

&gt; 5) This was not a traditional mak'gora, so saying he violated traditional mak'gora rules doesn't matter. When Cairne and Garrosh had theirs, Cairne specified he wanted a mak'gora with traditional mak'gora rules. That was never once specified either on the original mak'gora just prior the the LK or the second "half" done in Nagrand.

&gt; 6) It could even be argued this was not a mak'gora at all. A Mak'gora is a challenge for leadership. Thrall did not challenge for leadership of the Warsong (by this point, Garrosh already had lost leadership of the Horde). If this had been a mak'gora, then Thrall would not be leader of the Warsong by right. Ah, found the more detailed post:

&gt; If you are going to say that using your skills in battle is a "weapon," then Garrosh cheated by using abilities like Heroic Leap.  Magic, for a shaman, is a skill, not a separate weapon.  Shamans imbue their weapons with magic, they have magic shields constantly swirling around them.

&gt; Plus, if you are going to say that they needed to follow *those* rules to a T, then Garrosh was also using body armor (he had a belt and gauntlets on), thus cheating, and when he lost his weapon, he used fists, which is also a weapon (and considered thus in the game, as it was considered a weapon skill to level up).

&gt; You are also forgetting that the official rules of a Mak'gora are dictated by the person who declares it. This is not the first time Mak'gora was declared between the two of them, the original one was posed by Garrosh in the Pre-WotLK event.  They *both* go into that fight in full body armor with Garrosh wielding two axes, and with Thrall using magic.  Yet, no one (including Garrosh, who challenged him) accused him of cheating.  The start of both fights was nearly the same in terms of the rules set forth:

&gt; Pre-WotLK Event (Both combatents wear armor, Garrosh has two weapons, Thrall uses magic):

    Thrall: If this is a trap, it is one I will not blindly walk into! Do not make the same mistakes as your father, Garrosh!

    Garrosh: Afer all that he did for YOU and YOUR people? MAK'GORA!

    Thrall: You challenge me, boy? I don't have time for this...

    Garrosh: So you refuse? Is the son of Durotan a coward?

    Thrall: Inside!

    *They fight, two weapons for Garrosh, Thrall uses magic, both have full body armor, but are interrupted by the Herald of the Lich King*

    Thrall: We will finish this another time... son of Grom.

&gt; Now, compare that to the start of the WoD event. Both have armor on, Thrall uses magic:

    Garrosh: Thrall? You're too late, old friend.

    Thrall: No. No More, Garrosh. Just you and me.  I challenge you to Mak'gora.

    Garrosh: Very well, shaman. We finish this alone, where it all began... at the Stones of Prophecy

    *They fight, this time they finish the fight.


&gt; In **both** situations, they did not lay out the rules. In **both** situations, they were wearing armor. In **both** situations Thrall used magic.  Garrosh obviously did not see this as cheating, else he would have called Thrall on it at *some* point in the years that followed the initial challenge that *he* laid out.

&gt; But wait, there's more!

&gt; If you re-read *The Shattering*, when Cairne challenges Garrosh, he *specifically* says that he is challenging using the Old Rules, and Garrosh specifically accepts his challenge using the Old Rules.  Those are the rules you quote.  Those are the traditional rules of the Mak'gora, but they had not been followed for a very long time.  There were other instances of Mak'goras occuring with magic (one, of note, was in the Bloodsworn comic. Can't remember the two characters, but it was a BE Paladin and an Orc Shaman, both of whom used magic).  

&gt; End of the line is this: No one specified any rules to this Mak'gora, traditional or otherwise.  The status quo had been for modern duels when a Mak'gora happening. For Thrall, that precedent had been set by Garrosh's own Mak'gora challenge years before.  They fought in the same manner they had fought back then - in full armor, with the use of their weapons *and* abilities. There was no cheating.

Edit: Formatting :)

Edit2: The discussion I was having at the time was about whether Thrall cheated and the OP had used the same traditional mak'gora rules as his reasoning for why he had, hence why it is telling him "the rules you laid out" etc. Not attacking your position :)What you and /u/khrunix do not realize is that the issue of raiding and the appeal of LFR has nothing to do with the difficulty for most of the people there. It's the simplicity of group finding and loot.  You say pugging is easy?  An hour of me trying to get into normal groups last night and being declined counters that. The appeal of LFR for a majority of us that use it past the first couple of weeks is that we can queue up and get in, no need to worry about being rejected, no need to worry about some dickhead raid leader deciding since you didn't perform perfectly you need to be kicked. No need to search for a group using a loot method you agree to using, or any fear that said loot method will be switched mid-raid.  No need to try to find the group that still has the same bosses you have.

If normal mode was truly queuable, many of us would move up to normal. As it is, I'm not dealing with any of the raid drama associated with actual pugs.

Edit: And for the record, if LFR removed, I can speak for two subs that would for sure be lost: myself and my wife. I raided from TBC through the first tier of MoP, and she from the start of Cata through the same. But our guild has died due to IRL issues that caused the various members to stop playing. LFR has been my end game since then, and without it, I'd be out.Way to not even read the post! 

But to answer you:

Because for some, it is fun.

And for some, it is challenging.

And for some, it's the amount of social interaction they desire.

For many people, traditional raiding is not a desire and will never be a desire. LFR is for them. For others, they've moved away from raiding, LFR fills a portion of that hole. If you enjoy traditional raiding, great for you! You have it!  Those of us who don't have LFR.Except that it does answer that at all.  

The appeal of LFR has nothing to do with the challenge or social interaction.  Fun is completely subjective. The appeal for many of LFR has completely to do with not having to deal with the constraints of finding a traditional raid or the issues that often come with a traditional raid. 

And you cannot take that paragraph out without including the rest of the thought, which was "If normal mode was truly queuable, many of us would move up to normal. As it is, I'm not dealing with any of the raid drama associated with actual pugs."&gt; LFR should have never awareded tier loot, it just doesn't require any personal effort, not in finding the group and more importantly not in killing the bosses, i could afk LFR on my rogue and nobody would notice.

So, someone carries you in LFR and because of that, they don't deserve decent loot?  For every person AFKing in LFR, someone is picking up their slack. If you don't think so, then a group of 25 people together, pull the boss, and see what happens if all 25 AFK.

That mindset, right there, is why LFR has become shit. Because you "raiders" came in and said "hey this is too easy, I can AFK on it" and so you do. Meanwhile, those of us that actually do give a damn are going in and actually playing the raid. 

Why should it not have awarded tier loot? Because my progression path is less valuable than yours?  By that logic, maybe normal and heroic also shouldn't award tier loot, since really only Mythic is truly challenging. 

No, I'm sorry, but taking away loot from LFR only causes people to not run it, it doesn't make people go up to Normal and above.  Removing Legendary progression in LFR? Sure, I completely agree there. Removing interaction between LFR tier and normal+ tier? Sure. But me getting a whimptastic version of tier gear had no negative impact on the game, other than some ego trip that "raiders" have.And for those people who would not raid anyway?  What does LFR remove for them?

If you believe what Blizzard has stated about raiding in the past, a majority of players don't raid, and that was especially True in Vanilla and TBC, where subscription numbers rose the fastest.  

So, if the aspects of "normal raiding" are so valuable, then what did raiding do to entice *those* players previously?

LFR is for those people. It is for the people that *don't raid*. Either because they never did and never would, or because they did and they no longer do.

For those of you that do still raid, you have your raids sitting there waiting for you. For the rest of us, we weren't going to be raiding with or without LFR. And for many of us, LFR *is* our end-game progression, it's what keeps us in the game.&gt; Everyone in LFR can slack, that's the point, it's faceroll content that shouldn't reward tier

Like I said, take in a group of 25 like minded individuals and see how far you get. 

They reduced the difficulty in WoD because they had to be able to make up for the poor players, because the point is so people can do the content. 

&gt; i'm just saying i can and nobody notices because it's that easy, even with the typically low skill level of the players

And those AFKers were the ones being kicked constantly in the first tiers. Now? Absolutely. When everyone was coming in with 650 ilvl? Not on some bosses. 

&gt; It should not reward tier because it takes no effort, if it should reward tier because your progression path is as valuable as mine who commits time to learn the fights and my class and kill bosses where it's actually possible to fail on, then they may aswell make it obtainable for valor so even those that don't raid atall can get it, you know because their progression as equally important

It takes no effort *for you.*  For others, it takes a lot of effort. Again, I could make the same argument about normal and heroic.  For people like members of Method, Normal poses absolutely no challenge, but they're not coming in and saying "it takes no effort to do normal, you shouldn't get tier for it." 

And if it's because you can go in and get carried, you see that happening in Normal and Heroic all the time too. Hell, I was doing heroics on my LFR/Tanaan geared rogue out DPSing a normal/heroic geared rogue (both specced combat) by nearly 10%. Clearly, his "skill" was what got him that gear!

&gt; Also LFR had always been shit, don't try and make out that it's only happened in WoD, just now you get the gear rewards suitable for the effort required.

Whether it was shit or not is purely subjective.  But they *did* reduce difficulty in LFR between MoP and WoD. That's fact. Epics have been handed out like candy since TBC, so if that's "what drove you to raiding," then what kept you there for the past 9 years? 

The game has been casual since Wrath, so what kept you going for the 7 years since Wrath came out?

&gt; there seems to be a lot less to do even for casuals

That is something I can completely agree with. Starting in Wrath, the amount of non-raid / casual content available for the casual player has decreased, with WoD being the absolute bottom of the barrel.This is the best answer.

If you want to boost a resto druid, simply dual spec as Balance. Even if you don't like balance overall, all your resto gear will double (decently enough) as balance gear.

You will want to set your loot preference (right click your character pane, it's an option there) to Resto so you get resto gear while leveling.Even at the lowest I saw them, 15k, that's a lot to expect a new player to be able to obtain.  Sure, a level 100 with a full running garrison, hopefully on multiple alts, can get that easy. But if we were talking about new players coming in and expecting to buy game time with gold? Not a chance in the world.I don't think so. WoW has gotten a pretty bad stigma over the years, even amongst MMOs. I think initially it would skyrocket in subs, but it would die hard and fast.

It would, though, partially depend on the restrictions set in place and whether they still had a subscription for "perks."  For example, GW2 has the F2P option, but it's a single character slot option with MASSIVE restrictions (like no bank access to a certain point, no PvP until a certain point, etc), which makes people REALLY look at buying the box to unlock more.  

If WoW did something like that?  And they had enough in the game by that point to entice new players to stick around? Yeah, I could see it rise again.&gt; His argument is that Beast Mastery should be fundamentally altered, without even having played it mind you, to fit his personal vision of a one pet hunter and to appease these supposed melee players who would be angered by extra things in melee range.

No, that's not his argument at all.

His argument is that for the past 11 years, you have had the option of playing a hunter that could be summed up by saying "A ranged damage dealer with one loyal companion at your side."  But that is going away with Legion.  

*Hunters from Vanilla through Cataclysm*

* Ranged DPS with a single pet.

*Hunters in MoP*

* Ranged DPS with a single pet

* Talent options to summon more pets during combat

*Hunters in WoD*

* Ranged DPS with a single pet.

* Talent options to summon more pets

* Talent options to be ranged DPS with no pet

*Hunters in Legion*

* Ranged DPS with many pets

* Melee DPS with one pet

* Ranged DPS with no pets

**What is missing?**

*The ranged DPS with one pet that has been there since the beginning.*

He made a single side comment over melee maybe not liking all those pets, that's a side comment he made in it.  The issue is that the playstyle that has been the *basis of hunters since Vanilla* is going to be gone.

I'm sorry, but I have to disagree here.  There's a big difference between feedback based on *how* something plays, and feedback based on *fundamental class changes* that *change the core of the class.*

For example, like /u/YakaryBovine stated in a prior respose - If Blizzard announced today that Feral druids would no longer get Cat form, I would not need to actually see how they play to know that I would not like the change. Even if their rotation was identical to what it is right now, the fundamental aspect of being a feral druid is shifting into cat form. I would absolutely give feedback that I do not like the change.

The issue on the change for hunters is that a fundamental aspect of the class is going away. Since Vanilla, one of the concepts of being a hunter has always been "the lifelong bonds they form with animals of the wild." The idea given to hunters for a very long time was that they were ranged DPS with a companion at their side.  For many years, that was even pushed further by the whole "happiness" meter you had for your pet, which required even more strict attention to it.  With Legion, that entire aspect is gone.  

I, personally, am looking forward to the beast mastery hunter. But I also cannot deny the fact that it won't be me and Shalette, side by side, as it has been... it will be me and Shalette... and the multitude of other beasts I call during battle.You misunderstand. It has nothing to do with gameplay, it has to do with character play.  

BM might very well play perfectly fine, in fact, I'm personally excited for it!  However, it won't be "a hunter with his companion" anymore. It will be "a hunter with his companions."  The idea of a ranged DPS with his single trusted companion at his side will be gone.&gt; Do you know how many other classes are being changed to not have options they've had for years?

So that makes it good?  There are also people complaining about changes to Outlaw because they like Combat and don't want to be like a pirate. And people complaining about Frost DKs losing the option of going 2H over DW.  *edit: Or how about the fact that some classes have rec'vd changes that are now being reverted, like the loss of heroic strike for warriors?  It was iconic to being a warrior, it was removed in WoD, and it's coming back in Legion because people complained that they felt like they lost a part of their class.*

&gt; why does it even matter that you'll have other pets in addition to your main summoned pet when we have that now via stampede, dire beast, etc.

Those are currently options, not requirements. You can opt for Flock of Crows and Blink Strikes over Stampede (and in some situations those are better options, depending on the fight and the content you are running). You can opt for Steady Fire or the Focus Reduction talent over Dire Beast (and in MANY cases those are better options). 

&gt; His argument is against MORE utility.

How is he arguing for less utility?  Dire Beast is a DPS ability that generates focus. Have an option for a talent that does the same thing but doesn't summon a beast. Stampede is a DPS CD that summons beasts. Why not have an option for a talent that does increased damage without summoning beasts?

Or with the other specs, why not a talent that lets the hunter keep his pet out (if MM)? What reduction in utility does that bring?&gt; I mained a resto Druid in Wrath when we got the news that they were doing exactly that only with tree form. 

And what did they give you? At least a glyph that still allowed you to go tree form. 

&gt; Nobody is advocating for the removal of beasts except the OP who for some reason wants a spec inside the hunter tree that's restricted to a single pet.

You haven't been on the forums or on Twitter, have you? The OP is not alone in wanting the traditional "hunter with a single pet" option.

&gt; Which they will still have. In fact they will have more then one.

More than one is exactly the issue the OP has. 

&gt; Antiquated pointless game mechanics are not a good argument.

When their entire point of the changes is "class fantasy," pointing out something that was a major "class fantasy" is absolutely a good argument.

&gt; Except that they still have a summoned pet

Oh? I will be able to just have me and my pet and none other?  Tell me exactly how that works in Legion. 

&gt; There will be others joining in, further strengthening the idea that you MASTER BEASTS... funny how those words are in the very name of the spec.

You keep focusing on the BEAST MASTERY.  You are missing the point.  The point is not an issue with the spec of BEAST MASTERY.  The point is the loss of a ranged spec with your one companion at your side, that one companion that is you created your Lifelong Bond with.  Yes, BEAST MASTERY will summon more. But there *isn't an option to only have one* with any RANGED HUNTER SPEC.&gt; Which are brids... that's extra animals you know.

And blink strikes. Are you just purposefully being daft?  And come on, don't try to pretend like flock of crows even slightly resembles having a ton of new animals joining the battlefield. You can't even select them then they're there. That's like saying warriors can summon pets because of [Glyph of Crow Feast](http://www.wowhead.com/item=80587/glyph-of-crow-feast).

&gt; They have that, and more, it's called marksmanship.

Except Marksmanship is losing the option of having their single pet out. They will be petless. Meaning there will be no option of having a ranged DPS spec with their single pet.

&gt; Again, marksmanship, but also because the spec is called BEAST mastery.

Again, the issue is not with the spec of BEAST mastery. The issue is with the loss of a ranged DPS spec with a single pet, as is available now.

&gt; I have nothing against this idea. I never said I did.

Then your issue with the OP is???  His entire complaint is that Hunters will be losing the option of a spec that is ranged DPS with a single pet. He focused on the beast mastery changes in Legion, but if you actually read his post, the issue is the loss of the ranged DPS with a single pet.They have a talent which will have a chance of summoning a temporary undead pet.  

While that will give MM a temporary "ranged with a single pet" concept, it falls short for a few reasons:

1) It's not a pet they tame, which means the whole "hunters tame beasts of the wild" idea is gone.

2) It's not permanent, so while they will get a pet for periods of time, it won't be them running through the Broken Isles with a pet by their side.&gt; Not right away.

But they added it, right?  So why not be asking for something similar now, rather than waiting?

&gt; I never once said he was.

I must have misread "Nobody is advocating for the removal of beasts except the OP" as you saying the OP is alone in his desires.  

&gt; In fact I said there was too many people over reacting to things we haven't had a chance to even see in game yet.

Again, this is something that does not need to be seen in game. See prior comment regarding if they said Cat form was being removed. It's a change to the identity of the class.  It's a fact that as of right now, they do not have an option for a ranged DPS with a single pet. I don't need to play the specs to know that if I want to play as a ranged DPS with a single pet, that option will no longer exist.

&gt; Pet happiness was never a "class fantasy" it was mindless busywork designed to pad out the game and make it seem more difficult then it actually is.

It's a discussion over the fact that hunter pets were, from the beginning of the game, a bond you created with specific animals. The game mechanic of pet happiness was mindless busywork, but the fantasy aspect of it was "this is YOUR pet that YOU tamed and it's bonded to YOU."

&gt; Why is this even an issue. Why do you care if other pets are there? In the real world if you had a cat would you somehow be against all other cats?

Why was it an issue for druids to not be able to go tree form? Why was it an issue for warriors to lose heroic strike?  The reason I personally care is because when I play my hunter, I'm playing a hunter that formed a bond with the specific pet I have out, and she is my companion in our travels, be that to the frozen lakes of Winterspring to the deserts of Uldum, to the top of the Frozen Throne or to face off against Archimonde.  

&gt; Because like it or not the OP was focused on it even though he claims it could be any of the specs. I have nothing against them allowing a cosmetic option for marksman hunters to keep their pet by their side even though it provides no actual utility. 

Reread the OP, because you are apparently reading something I'm not.  "The best options I can see are to give MM the option of keeping their pet (as all Warlock specs do), or re-working the random animal summons of BM into optional talents, making the base of the spec the classic ranged + one pet."

Yep, that sure does sound like he's focusing on BM.  

&gt; You're also entirely too focused on having both RANGED and LIFELONG BOND with one pet. That lifelong bond exists for a single pet... it's called survival. You can't please everyone.

Which is melee, not ranged.  The aspect of a hunter that I've played for years is gone.  Why am I focusing on that?  It's the same thing the OP is talking about: *"The whole idea of the ranged class with one loyal companion is just... gone."*&gt; You still haven't told me why there needs to be one.

I did, you just decided not to read it. "The reason I personally care is because when I play my hunter, I'm playing a hunter that formed a bond with the specific pet I have out, and she is my companion in our travels, be that to the frozen lakes of Winterspring to the deserts of Uldum, to the top of the Frozen Throne or to face off against Archimonde."

Edit: But if you like, for more:  When I rolled a hunter, I rolled a hunter based on the idea of being a ranged DPS spec with my one loyal companion.  Why does a hunter need a pet at all? Why does a druid need to shift into forms?  It's been a part of that "class fantasy" that they are talking about on the blogs.  An aspect of class fantasy for the hunter has been, since the beginning, your loyal companion. Hell, the opening cinematic for World of Warcraft involved a Hunter with his single pet charging into battle with him. 

I can't *be* that hunter now. I either have to charge into battle with multiple pets, or none. I don't get the option, which I've had for 11 years, of just me and my companion. 

&gt; I don't think you're reading the same post I am.

I literally quoted it to you.&gt; If he was asking for something similar, a simple cosmetic glyph, I wouldn't have an issue with it, he's not. He's asking for class design changes.

He's asking for options of keeping a ranged hunter with a solo pet. He have ideas for ways he thought how. 

&gt; You absolutely misunderstood because you're not looking at the context of what it's in reply to, go read it in context again.

If I said "No one is advocating the hunter changes are good except you," how would you interpret that? 

&gt; Like the pet that will still be standing right beside you. They're not taking away that pet. You're acting like every pet you summon will be random.

Except that *I won't have the option of it being my only pet if I want to stay ranged*.  They are taking that away.

&gt; Because those things took away fundamentals of the spec. Removing pets would do that, not adding more pets.

I'm losing my pet if I'm MM. I'm losing my range if I'm Survival. How is that not fundamentals to those specs?  Adding more pets to Beast Mastery doesn't change the fundamentals, but that's not the only change their making. Their also *taking away my pet* if I'm not BM.

&gt; Nobody is saying to take that pet away. Having additional animals around doesn't change that. If you own a cat and buy a dog it doesn't suddenly erase your bond with the cat.

It does, however, change the idea of me being a hunter with my one loyal animal at my side. 

&gt; Keep reading beyond what you cherry picked where he makes it very clear that the marksmanship thing isn't what he's after.

Here's the entire rest of that post: "How to fix it? That's tricky. The best options I can see are to give MM the option of keeping their pet (as all Warlock specs do), or re-working the random animal summons of BM into optional talents, making the base of the spec the classic ranged + one pet. Neither would be a simple task for Blizz, I'm sure, but I really think it's worth the effort to keep an option open for players that want to stick with something like the hunter they know and love.

Anyway, that's the thoughts of one stubborn old hunter. Feel free to add yours."

Or in a different response:

"No, I want any spec to be the "classic hunter". Could be BM, could be MM, could even be SV although I can't see Blizz making a spec both ranged and melee. I just want "classic hunter" to still exist."

Or in another: "I am a longtime beast master hunter. The focus on random summons is a comparatively recent thing, and in any case I'm not advocating removing it. All I said was that making them optional might be one route to providing a classic-style hunter spec. It's not the only possibility."

Tell me where he's gone on to make it clear that this is an issue with BM and BM alone.

&gt; Hunters could melee for years. By your own argument this should be just as iconic to you.

Oh, I love that hunters are getting melee back, I've not said that I don't like that. But they are *losing the option of being a ranged DPS with a single pet.*  No, I'm not arguing for removing anything.  I'm arguing against them removing the way I've always played a hunter.  I don't care if they have a spec that summons a billion pets, that's not the hunter I play. I've explained why, you don't agree, fine. But quit acting like there aren't hunters that enjoy a class fantasy of just me and my pet.&gt; Your pet will always be there... you're not making any sense.

If I'm BM, and then there will also be other pets, which does not fit the class fantasy I've been playing for years of *just* me and my pet. When I saw the opening cinematic, it wasn't a dwarf with his multiple pets charging in as he shot his rifle, it was a dwarf, alone on the mountain with his ONE trusted companion,  fighting for his life against a tauren.

Again, I DON'T have an issue with BM getting their plethora of beasts, that's fine!  I DO have an issue of losing the ability to play as JUST me and my pet unless I go melee. I DON'T have a problem with a melee spec, or a petless spec. I DO have a problem with losing my spec, which is ranged DPS with ONE pet.There at least used to be a lot of free ones out there, too.&gt; So nothing can change from that sacred opening video? Also there's nothing to say he didn't also have access to other animals and he was at most level 60 and wearing white and quest green items so by your own logic your class fantasy should be keeping you low leveled and in shitty gear.

Are you daft, or just trolling?  It was what enticed me to roll a hunter,  and it is the "version" of hunter that many of us have been playing for 11 years. Maybe he did have access to others, I don't care. I played it like I saw him: lone hunter with lone pet. For ELEVEN years.

&gt; You are literally against the addition of extra beasts to a spec that's called beast mastery yet you argue on the grounds of "class fantasy"?

If you can't be bothered to read, don't be bothered to respond. In case you're too busy to go back ome post: "I DON'T have an issue with BM getting their plethora of beasts, that's fine!"

You know what, I'm just done.  You're clearly too dense to see the differemc3 between "I want an option, any option, to keep a ranged DPS with a single pet" and "BM shouldn't get all the animals." Have a good night, and learn to read entire posts.It's extremely difficult to try a minor as an adult in most jurisdictions.  Like stupid difficult. Usually, the only time it will happen is when the crime is so heinous that the courts cannot see any chance that the perpetrator will ever have a chance of reforming, or where the actions of the perpetrator show full adult faculties being utilized in the decision (which normally won't happen unless the person was very close to 18).

Just as an example, my mother was a prosecuting attorney when I was in high school.  A student in my class, 16 at the time, stabbed his mother to death.  The short version is that they were doing a nightly bible study and he stabbed her as many as 17 times.  She wanted to prosecute him as an adult, and received a lot of grief from the community for it because "he had shown no prior indications of violence, and at only 16, he needs to be treated and reformed, not locked away for life."  She ended up having to take the request to the state supreme court because the initial judge denied her motion on those grounds.As others have said, it will still likely be highly worth it.  I know the MoP legendary cloak was still worth it pretty far into WoD (granted, the ilvl jump from the end of MoP to the start of WoD was pretty small).  Even if they nerf the on-use past lvl 100, it's still pretty strong.

As far as time, I've finished 3 legendaries and gotten to the final part of 4 or 5 toons... but I only actually *tried* on the first two legendaries, the rest have just been from doing garrison stuff and more recently the tanaan stuff. It'll go super fast.Normally, when an item has no vendor value, it's a potentially rare item. I agree it's super annoying, but at the same time, they don't want people accidentally "selling" items that they would have difficulty obtaining again.I personally love using it to grow big... nothing like the cloak, but it's really fun using in when farming low level stuff just for the lols...

I haven't tried it with a giant's growth elixer to see if the size stacks... SOMETHING TO DO!And sap star, banish/seduce/fear nippleI can't find the link (at work, so I can't access 90% of the sites I go to), but I recall this information being posted a couple months back.  Basically, your ilvl is a "hidden stat" that just flat out boosts your power.  It doesn't affect things like your HP, crit, haste, etc, but it does just make you stronger.  It was part of why they had to change how heirlooms worked. Heirlooms used to be ilvl 1 no matter what their actual level, but when they did the ilvl change, it made heirlooms worse.I agree that this system is better than only having specific item slots. However, what I hate about it is that it overvalues certain items.  Trinkets for pretty much all roles, due to how much more rare trinkets tend to be (especially trinkets with strong procs or strong primary attributes).  And then for tanks/healers, rings/necks/backs due to the rarity and strength of bonus armor and spirit.  At least weapons won't be part of it this time, but I really wish they would separate "main gear" and "accessory gear" from the limit.  

I also wish engineering helms weren't counted, but only because it's always been a perk of being an engineer of getting one additional crafted slot available, and that's gone with the 3 slot limit.What's the date? I'm at work so can't view the video.I can say from my perspective:  I tank them on a paladin.  I ran my first one at 668 and it wasn't smooth at all, I *had* to use CC or I would die horrible deaths.  I'm now somewhere between 690 and 700 and only ever have any difficulty on the harder trash mobs - the spiders in SMBG, the flame dudes in Grimrail, the stupid imps in Auch... but overall I don't seem to run much risk (I do use my smaller CDs, but mainly for helping out, not so much out of necessity).Awesome, thanks!Oh, I get the point of it, and like I said, overall I like the current system better. I just liked that certain professions had some additional perks... with engineering it was the tinkers (still available, minus the damage boosting/tanking ones) and the goggles (none of the other professions had head pieces).  

And, like I said, the other issue was the power of accessory gear for healers/tanks. Since all other gear is homogenized (i.e. there is no "tanking chest" anymore), the only thing that distiguishes tank/healer gear is the bonus armor/spirit. That means a crafted piece that can have those stats, especially if you can upgrade them, is much more powerful for those two roles than any other item slot. It makes it so DPS can really choose a crafted piece for any gear slot, but tank/healers should be (early in the expansion when there are fewer gearing options) be choosing those accessory slots.Inevitably followed by someone putting a DoT on one of the sheeped targets so the mage just sits there re-sheeping until the DoT wears off.

Or the warlock who banished the mob again when it was time to kill that mob (before banish could be "removed" by casting it again), forcing everyone to wait for banish to wear off... ^not ^that ^I ^ever ^did ^that.I'm perfectly fine with it, the only thing that I wish is that there was still an option to be the ranged hunter with his one trusty companion... the dwarf from the into cinematic for WoW, roaming the mountain with his bear, sending his bear after the tauren, etc etc. Well, I can't view the images due to restrictions at work, but I'm sure I've had similar conversations...  

I'm by no means a master AHer, but I use Auctioneer to help me on posting things. I have mine set for a 1% undercut (I don't want to undercut too much), and sometimes I'll have someone whisper or mail me being angry that I undercut their auctions by so small.  

My favorite, though, is when I use the "Vendor" feature. I do this mainly on new servers (for me) where I don't have a lot of gold. I'll go in and buyout all auctions that have costs under the vendor price and sell them.  But the, if I have the gold, I'll bid on anything with a real low bid value.  The other day, I managed to pick up a crafted piece of gear that had been upgraded to 4/6... for 5g.  The poster had put it up for a buyout price of 10k or so, but had forgot to change the bid amount, so the bid amount was only 5g. I bid, and won... then I turned around and resold it for a few thousand. This guy sent me mail just yelling at me for how I'm a thief blah blah blah... then started whispering me to the point I had to report/ignore him.You had sober people in your raids?People were worried if I wasn't drunk... I tanked and healed better drunk, and only accidentally pulled the boss or passed out mid fight a few times!The Tauren, especially, would not have a lot of "city" in their past.  Pre-Horde, they were nomadic. Thrall/the Horde helped them settle at Thunder Bluff by helping them drive out the centaur in Mulgore. That's why most Tauren settlements you see are small, usually "tepee" style (they were largely based on Native North American concepts): They would typically have packed up and moved until the past 20 or so years.To add to what /u/-TheToad- said - it's not just that they are juiced up on the Fel (warlocks get that way too), they literally absorb demon power into them.  Part of the process of absorbing that power is that you are, in a sense, becoming part demon.  If you die during the DH intro area, Illidan will say to you (as you are spirit walking) something along the lines of "Interesting, it appears that you have gained the immortal soul of a demon as well. You cannot truly die, but must just find a new body to host your spirit."That's different, and goes into the backstory of Illidan and demons a bit more.  If you've done the TBC questlines and WC3, Illidan traveled to Outland to both hide from and prepare to fight the Legion.  Demons don't just blindly follow the Legion, either, but rather follow those of power.

Now, go to Outland, and specifically to Shadowmoon Valley, and you'll find a bunch of demons that are labeled as "Illidari."  These are demons that, for various reasons, joined with Illidan.  Mostly, probably, simply due to his power, but I'm not really 100% clear what he uses to entice them to join him. It might have something to do with Black Temple itself, as it is inferred from the Warlock green fire questline that there is something in BT that provides extrodinary power.

Whatever their reason, there are lots of demons that join up with Illidan.  You find them throughout SMV, and in BT (even some bosses, like Supremus and Mother).  So, those are the demons that come with the Illidari Demon Hunters to Mardum to fight the Legion.  They're part of Illidan's faction that is battling the Legion.The talent we currently have to make the demons stronger replaces our standard pets with "stronger versions" of the pets. So our Imp/Voidwalker/Felhunter/Succubus/Felguard are transformed into the Fel Imp/Void Lord/Observer/Shrivarra/Wrathguard.  That meant 1) the only way to have the different models was by picking that talent, and 2) You couldn't use the "original" model and have stronger pets.  Depending on the lock, some loved the new models, some the old.

In Legion, that talent reads differently. Instead of it saying that it transforms the demons into these stronger demons, it simply says it increases the power of our demons.  So, from this tweet, you can modify the demon based on the glyph. It won't change the power at all, it will just be cosmetic. So, I can have a Wrathguard and not pick the "stronger demon" talent, or I can have a Felhunter and have the "Stronger Demon" talent.I think, in this case when he's talking spec, he's talking about talent options (how you "spec" your Fire Mage), not Specialization.

From how the talents are looking, every class/spec combo is, at it's base, very simplistic.  The talents either are passive, which keeps the spec simple, or activated, which adds complexity.  

Numbers aren't worked out yet, but what it *should* be is that the activated talents will be "better," if utilized correctly. It will reward the "better" player by allowing them to do better DPS.  However, for the basic/new/unskilled player, using those talents will be a net loss since they don't have the skill to maintain them.

A good example in WoD I can think of for mages in the RoP/MI/IF.  RoP is the best talent in most non-heavy movement fights, but if you are not good at moving to new locations and dropping your new rune, then you'll lose out on a ton of damage. For that mage, IF is probably the better option even if on paper it is the worse option.Right?  Now, if he had asked me nicely, I may have been willing to give him some of the profit (not all, I need gold on that server, I don't have any level 100's), but since he was just a dick about it, NOPE!On my "main" server, I always check. I rolled new characters on a fresh server so my wife and I could level Alliance (I have all 11 classes maxed as Horde on one server), so I knew I didn't know anyone. If he *had* asked nicely, I may have been willing to split the profit some (not all, I need gold since I don't have any level 100's, or even WoD level toons on that server to bankroll me).&gt; Very unclear to be using "spec" to mean "talents".

Yes and no?  I mean, when people say "how should I spec," they are typically asking which talents they should pick. For many, it's a carry-over from the pre-MoP (and really pre-Cata) days of talents. "Your Spec" was the talents you chose.

&gt; I don't know why you'd want a 3rd talent column to be "PvP/middle of the road". **We're already getting a fully featured PvP tree**

You answered your question where I bolded it.  They don't want a single ability that is "the PvP ability," which is why they are giving *full* PvP talents.  I mean, for me it doesn't matter since I don't PvP, but I've hated the "this is a PvP talent and this is a PvE talent" problem that's existed since I started playing.

&gt; If they're a larger gap, it might feel mandatory to go with the activated ability.

Eh, difference of opinion :) I don't have a problem of talents that feel mandatory... because that typically happens at higher levels of play no matter what. (Note: when I'm saying "level" in this post, I'm talking about how good you are, not literal levels)  Having a talent that is passive, but is less effective, is great for the casual player and/or the lower levels of play.  My wife, for example, has trouble handling more than 4 active abilities (she often forgets her "minor" CDs even), she's extremely casual in her play.  Having something for those players, while having a better but more complex play style for heroic/mythic raiders is fine for me.

As for your example, I agree, I like that too. However, the two aren't mutually exclusive.  It basically allows for multiple playstyles.  If I'm a "less buttons" type of player, I might choose [a setup like this](http://beta.wowdb.com/talent-calculator#CV1L), which only has one extra ability (Consecration) and everything else merely modifies what I currently have and everything else simply modifies my existing spells.  Or, I might be a min/maxer (going for MAX DPS), and have a setup more [like this, depending on how theorycrafting works out](http://beta.wowdb.com/talent-calculator#ErbL). This has 4 extra abilities (one is "CC" based).  Or, I'm a "situational talent user," who selects the abilities based on the needs of the encounter or what I'm playing, in which case I choose something different for each one [like this for an add and movement heavy fight](http://beta.wowdb.com/talent-calculator#EuvL).  

Obviously, those are made up examples for what could be best in those situations, but the point of them all is that having a variety of ways to spec your retribution paladin allows for a multitude of playstyles.

No matter *what* they do, there is always going to be a theorycraft out there for what is best in every situation, but the key is that even with the single tree you pointed out, one option for every row has a completely passive option that requires no changes on the part of the player (for the lower level players) and has options that can be more useful for high level players to use in certain situations.&gt; So he is stating that he wants there to be a clear PvP talent. My opinion is that this is boring, the same as yours.

I apologize, by this point I wasn't talking about marcusblood's comment, but the design overall :)

&gt; By giving that easy, less good option, you're setting up a trap where players are given a label in the community. It also provides any easy route that doesn't necessarily teach people to become better with practice.

Can be, but don't we have that problem already, but without even having the option of bringing in that less skilled player?  Take fire mage as an example, since you brought it up earlier.  It is my favorite type of mage to play, but it's obviously much more complex (in my opinion at least) than the other two specializations.  Now, I've been playing long enough that I have a good understanding of how to adapt to these types of things, a good understanding of addons like weak auras, etc.  But newer players? They'll just suffer and get ostracized for being "bad."

Now, simplify the base system and it can let that newer/less skilled player can pull decent damage without needing to understand as much as they do now, allowing them to get in the door.

As for not teaching people to become better with practice... I don't think the talent system (whichever iteration is used) has a large part of that.  Look at how many people ask for the old talent systems back because they liked making those "unique" specs, even if they underperformed.  There are some people who don't care about "performance" and some people that do, no matter what.

However, if it's set up that the more complex system, when played correctly, does more damage, then those people who *do* care about performance might get through a dungeon/raid and say "why did Mage#5 do so much more DPS than me?" Then they might start looking at the differences between them, and see that they have all these different talents.  

I mean, that's what pushed me from just a player to a "real" raider back in TBC. I was a warlock (one of the easiest classes to play and do decent at the time).  When I went into my first raid, I thought I was pretty decent, but this other warlock did significantly better than me. That's what sparked me to, for the first time, start reading about the class and find out what the best way to spec was, and by the end of the expansion I was the class officer for a progression guild.  

Long story short, I think it can go either way. But I think having those "less button" options works well for new/lesser skilled players. While their talent options might cause them to get that label, that label would likely have happened anyway simply because they couldn't perform well with that more complex version of the class.They had posted an update on it. The ns.reddit is now if you *want* to hide spoilers, the www.reddit won't hide spoilers.That makes me think of the april fool's joke they did a long while back of playable ogres with the two headed ogres. Played by two people.&gt; My biggest worry is that by adding the "low skill, easy talent" to each row, you're essentially removing a talent option for other players (because a medium to high skilled player will skip that talent every time).

Agreed, but I think that is helped (not solved) by also having talent rows like what you showed earlier, of "situational" talents.  The low skill player likely won't be changing their talents for the situation as much, but you, the more skilled player, will know that Talent 1 is good for a stronger heal when needed, Talent 2 for movement, talent 3 for defense.  

But yeah, the other fear is that if the gap is too large between passive/active (or too small) then it will shove everyone one way or the other no matter what.  Let's be fair. It's a mount that drops from heroic at a 100% drop rate for *everyone* who doesn't have it. It's not an exclusive mount by any stretch of the imagination. No one is looking at people with the moose and going "Oh wow, he managed to get the moose!"  If it was a mythic mount, and/or if it was not 100%, and/or if only one dropped?  That would make it exclusive and something that people paying to be carried (or events like this) would cheapen it.Thank you to /u/Asmongold (and also /u/qauntumz and anyone else on Reddit that helped carry people). I wasn't able to get in, but I'm perfectly fine with that, it was awesome what you did. I know some people got mad, but I thought you were being 100% fair with the groups. You were doing this for free, so even if you hadn't been fair, it was free so don't mind the haters.

It was awesome, no matter what. You all are awesome, and congrats to all the people who got their moose! I ended up doing a portion of normal HFC after because of the thrill of the chance of getting in :)Yes please! I know it's a small QoL thing, but when all the other "crafting" items can be used from the bank, and can be put in the reagent tab, having these take up bag space (especially now, with so many races available) is annoying. Not gamebreaking annoying, just annoying!It made some sense, though. While Anduin Lothar himself was not a paladin, he was the first leader of the paladins. They were commanders under him when they were first introduced, with Turalyon being his second in command (and in fact, Turalyon took up his sword when Anduin was killed).  So, while not a paladin, he was vital to the paladins becoming a thing.Not confirmed. Velen told Tyrande that he thinks Elune is a Naaru because the description of Elune (in terms of her power and how she acts) matched one. Tyrande told Velen to never mention that again in her presence and the matter was dropped.Right, but likewise Velen hasn't ever talked to or seem Elune... that was my point: it was never confirmed Elune  is a Naaru, just Velen's conjecture and Tyrande's response. Right, and I agree. I'm talking about mass availability of purchases (or events like this one), which don't exist for Mythic.They can be. You don't have to have your mats in your inventory to use them. If they are in the bank, you can still craft as though they were in your bags.Even then, it was a pure conjecture on his part just based on the description, hardly him saying he knows it. Now, to be fair, he likely wouldn't make that pronouncement if he didn't truly believe it, but at the same time, it's not like he's seen or spoken to Elune either.

Awhile back (like during Cata), there was a tinfoil hat edition of engadget that touched on it. It speculated that both Elune and An'she (the Tauren sun god) are naaru, and both of them are the basis for "the Light" in Azeroth, with Elune taking a direct approach by flat out communicating and helping change the Night Elves from when they were Dark Trolls, and An'she taking an indirect approach (whispering in the minds/hearts of the humans/dwarves until they started to believe).  The Tauren basically fell in the middle - they knew Elune (by a different name) and An'she already, and followed both as gods of a sort.

Of course, there was also the speculation that Elune was once a mortal, based on Brann Bronzebeard's discovery that dark trolls evolved into the Night Elves and at least one troll became a Loa, indicating that it is possible for a mortal to have ascended into a god-like being. So, I wasn't the one who wanted to quit, but I was the cause of it.  

I was doing Kara on my mage back in TBC. He was an alt-alt (like the third one down, low on my priority list), but a buddy wanted to run Kara and I had no interest in doing it with my main (who was doing T6) and was already locked on my other alt.  My buddy was on his warlock.

Anyway, while there, this T6 geared spriest was rolling need on anything she could equip, even though she was WAY past geared for it, and my buddy kept losing to her. Mind you, we were the only 3 cloth users in there. So we get to Prince and the spellpower dagger drops, which was the main reason my buddy was there. I see the 